I have eliminated all but five distinct forms of signing. I will learn them all. Computer, show me gestural language designation M nine.
Interesting. A technique of communication which is both silent and covert. It could be very useful.
The use of gestures and hand signals pre dates the spoken word in most cultures. The major exception being the Leyrons of Malkus Nine who actually developed a written language first. Computer, continue presentation. Increase. Increase. Increase. Increase.
Come.
How's our mediator.
The same. He's withdrawn. He's very frightened. All of his life he's been in control, and now for the first time he doesn't have any answers. The doctor gave him a complete medical examination.
His condition is hereditary. His brain cannot receive auditory information. So all the prosthetics and surgical techniques I can use wouldn't work.
I don't know what we can do to help him.
I can't do anything.
It's up to him, and he's stopped cooperating.
Counsellor, couldn't you?
Confidence is faith in oneself. It can't easily be given by another.
You're right, of course.  Come.
Captain, I have reviewed and stored five distinct signing languages. Here is an example of the first. This is blue. This is a blue ocean. This is a blue ocean at sunset. This is two people walking along the beach by a blue ocean at sunset. This is two happy people in love walking along the beach by a blue ocean at sunset. This is two people
Enough. Let's talk to Riva.
Riva, Commander Data has learned your sign language. Talk to us.
It was my fault. I am responsible for their deaths. In my arrogance I thought no one could possibly harm the great Riva. I am such a fool.
You are not to blame. What happened appears to have been the work of one desperate man. It may not reflect the feelings of the others.
They were more than my interpreters. They were also my friends. They were a part of me. I did not realise how much a part until now.
We have been contacted by the factions on Solais. They want to renew negotiations.
I cannot. I will not.
Don't turn away. You have a chance to make some good come out of this tragedy. This could be the catalyst which binds them together.
Someone else will have to speak with them, not me. Not after what I allowed to happen/ How could I?
But Data can understand you. Use him. Let him explain your words.
When Data speaks for me, can you hear my anguish, my despair? Data is a fine machine, but he cannot take the place of my chorus. It took years to develop a communication. That cannot be easily replaced.
The Solari need you.
I cannot help them. Captain, please take me back to Ramatis.
That is regrettable. A lot more people are going to die.
It's possible to install optical devices which look like normal eyes, and would still give you about the same visual range as the visor.
Done? You say almost. How much reduction?
Twenty percent. There is another option. I can attempt to regenerate your optic nerve, and, with the help of the replicator, fashion normal eyes. You would see like everyone else.
Wait a minute. I was told that was impossible.
I've done it twice, in situations somewhat similar to yours. Geordi, it would eliminate the constant pain you are under. Why are you hesitating?
Well, when I came to see you, it was to talk about modifying this. And now you're saying it could be possible for me to have normal vision?
Yes.
I don't know. I'd be giving up a lot.
There's something else you must know. This is a one shot. If you decide to change your mind, there's no going back. And there are risks. I can offer choices, not guarantees.
Well, this is a lot to think about. I'll get back to you, Doctor. Thank you.
The Captain is going to take you to Ramatis. But first, he's given me permission to attempt to settle the conflict down on Solais. Yes. We've come so far, and paid such a terrible price, I must try. Help me.
You would be better off without my help.
I have never attempted anything like this before. When dealing with two factions so diametrically opposed, so entrenched in their positions, where do you start?
You want to know if I had some special technique?
I want to know anything you can tell me that could help.
There is no trick. I had no magic.
What about your Chorus?
Yes, my Chorus was special. They allowed me to combine different perceptions.
So there was a trick.
Not really. My technique was to look for some thing, no matter how small, that was common to both groups, and then to begin a process where one person or one group expresses themselves to each other.
That's very hard to accomplish.
Yes, but what is even more difficult is to get each side to listen, really listen to each other, and to understand.
This isn't going to be easy for me.
You are very good with people.
But what I do is different.
The real secret is turning disadvantage to advantage.
Why can't you do that? Why can't you turn your disadvantage into an advantage?
That is an interesting. It would give them something in common.  I do not understand, Counsellor. To what is he referring?
Thank you. Thank me? Ah!
I will have the Captain contact then down on the planet and tell them to prepare for your return.
There are no life signs in the immediate area.
All right, stay sharp. We may have to get out of there in a hurry. Set phasers on stun. Energise.
The area is clear, Commander.
Put the table over there.
Engineering, this is Commander Riker.
Go ahead, sir.
You can beam the table and torches down now.
Light the torches to let them know that I am back.
It may be quite a while before the emissaries arrive. They'll be more cautious after the last incident.
You may leave whenever you choose. I will send out a message when I am ready to go.
Deanna, I don't understand what he's going to do. How can he mediate without his interpreters? He won't even be able to talk to them.
Riva is going to teach them sign language.
Yes, it is turning a disadvantage into an advantage. Learning sign will be a part of their process of learning how to live together in peace.
While they are learning how to communicate with Riva, they'll be learning how to communicate with each other.
And that is the first and most important aspect of any relationship. Counsellor, it took me only moments to learn sign language. It will take them months.
Time well spent.
These people have been fighting all of their lives. They know only hatred, suspicion, and fear. Even with my Chorus, I could not have changed their attitudes in a day. We have a chance. They want the talks to be successful.
I'm still not comfortable leaving you here alone.
Thank you for your concern. I will be fine.  And thank you, for everything.
Enterprise, four to beam up. Good luck.
First Officer:First Officer's log, Stardate 42479.3. We leave the Solais system confident that Riva will help the Solari achieve a lasting peace.
Coordinates set, Commander.
Take us out of orbit.
Come.
You wanted to see me?
Yes. You read me well enough to sense how I feel about you and what you do on this ship. But I just wanted to say the words. Thank you. Well done.
Magnify. Mister Data?
It appears to be a probe of some kind, but there is no Starfleet record of this shape or design.
Is it scanning us?
No sir, but it has assumed a relative position and it is holding course with us.
The probe is composed of paricium and talgonite, a ceramic alloy.
Not a very sophisticated technology.
Sir, I am detecting a low-level nucleonic beam coming from the probe.
Shields up. Stand by phasers.
The beam is scanning the shield's perimeter. The probe is emitting an unusual particle stream.
Sir, the beam is penetrating our shields.
Increase power to
Captain? Captain, I've got you. It's all
Well. finally. How are you feeling? Kamin, can you answer me?
What is this place?
You're still feverish.
Computer, freeze programme. Computer, end programme.
Kamin.
Picard to Enterprise.
Kamin, please don't get up yet. You're still not well.
I asked you, what is this place?
This is your home, of course.
Am I a prisoner here?
Please, dear, you've had a high fever for three days. You mustn't push yourself too quickly. Kamin? You really shouldn't go outside.
Kamin, please come back inside.
Thank you. This sapling is planted as an affirmation of life in defiance of the drought and with expectations of long life. Whatever comes, we will keep it alive as a symbol of our survival. Kamin! You're back on your feet! How do you feel, my friend?
Are you in charge here?
In charge?
I want to be returned to my ship immediately.
What ship is that?
Please, just tell me, what is this place? Where am I?
The fever. It's taken your memory.
That must be it. Perhaps you can help me.
Anything, my friend.
My name is Kamin?
Yes.
And you are?
Batai. Council leader Batai.
Ah. Batai. And you say I've been ill?
For more than a week. Eline should've put you in the hospital, but she insisted on caring for you herself.
Eline?
Your wife. If you don't remember that, maybe it's safer not to go home.
And what is this place?
Perhaps you should see the doctor.
No, please, I'm sure it will all come back to me.
This is the community of Ressik. Northern province.
What planet?
Let me take you back home.
No, really, I'm quite all right. Just answer me. What planet?
This is the planet Kataan.
Kataan. Not a Federation planet. I think I'll just take a walk.
But you've been ill for a week.
The exercise will do me good. I'll try to re-acquaint myself with the surroundings.
Thank goodness. I've had people out trying to find you everywhere. Why did you worry us like that? Are you hungry?
Hungry, thirsty, exhausted. I suppose that proves this is not a dream, doesn't it?
You think this, your life, is a dream?
This is not my life. I know that much.
I've kept something hot for you. Where did you go?
I walked. For hours.
And you're just out of bed.
It's delicious.
You always say that.
Would you try to answer some questions for me, no matter how strange they may seem to you?
Of course.
Are there other planets in this star system? Do you visit other systems? All right. Do you have a communication system here? How do you send messages to other communities, to other places?
The usual way, by voice-transit conductor. Do you want to send a message?
Yes. When can that be arranged?
Tomorrow. Don't you want to ask about us?
Of course. Anything you can tell me will be helpful. We're, er, um, married?
Three years ago. The happiest day of my life was the day we got married.
And what do I do here in Ressik?
You're the best iron weaver in the community. At least I think so. You prefer playing the flute, of course.
The flute?
Yes.
And when did I learn to play it?
I'm afraid you never did, dear, but you keep trying.
I see what you mean. Well, thank you for the soup. Thank you for your help. Tomorrow, will you help me send a message?
Of course. Will you come to bed?
Oh, I'll sleep here.
Kamin, please come with me.
I've been sick. I'll be tossing and turning. It wouldn't be fair to you.
Let me be the judge of that.
Where did you get this?
Kamin, this is the first gift you ever gave me.
Riker to Sickbay. The Captain's hurt.
Pulse and blood pressure are normal I'm getting hyperactive fibrogenic activity. This is odd.
What is it?
There's no evidence of any injury or trauma. Vital signs are normal, but neurotransmitter production is off the scale. What's going on?
That probe is doing something to him. Anything yet, Data?
No, sir. The particle emission is most unusual. I am unable to block it.
We should destroy the probe. Phasers are armed and ready.
I don't think that's wise. Not until we know exactly what it's doing to him.
Agreed. Stand down phasers, Mister Worf. In the meantime, take us out of range. Ensign. Thrusters only, one hundred kph nice and easy
Aye, sir.
Data?
The probe is moving with us, sir, holding relative position.
It's connected itself to him, like a tether.
You've been dreaming of that starship of yours again, haven't you?
I'm just charting progress of the course of the sun. It might give a clue to the cause of this drought.
I think you're still trying to figure out where you are. Where that ship of yours is. How to get back to that life.
The memory is five years old now, but it's still inside me.
Was your life there so much better than this? So much more gratifying, so much more fulfilling, that you cling to it with such stubbornness?
Eline.
It must have been extraordinary. But never in all of the stories you've told me have you mentioned anyone who loved you as I do.
It was real. It was as real as this is. And you can't expect me to forget a lifetime spent there.
Yes, I can. I've been patient, Kamin. For five years I've shared you with that other life. I've listened, I've tried to understand, and I have waited. When do I get you back?
I know. I know. It has been hard on you.
When will you let go? When will you start living this life? When will we start a family?
Kamin, Eline, good morning.
Good morning, Batai.
Are you ready? The Administrator's already arrived.
Yes. Will you come along?
No, thank you. You do very well on your own.
She always was strong-minded, even when she was a child.
It's not her fault. These past few years have been very difficult for her.
And for you, I think.
There you are, Batai. Perhaps you can explain to me, when crops are dying all over, how this tree is flourishing?
This tree is our symbol, our affirmation of life. Everyone in this town gives part of their water rations to keep it alive. We've learned, Administrator, that hope is a powerful weapon against anything. Even drought.
A good point. Perhaps I shall recommend a symbolic tree in each of my communities. Now. What business do we have today?
We need help if we're to increase the water supply. We think there are ways to reclaim some of our water.
Batai, you're being a bit of an alarmist. True, we are in a drought, but water rationing has produced a sizeable savings.
If the weather pattern doesn't change, rationing will not be enough. We'll run out of water.
Who is this?
Kamin, sir.
Kamin. Do I know you?
No. I haven't spoken to you before.
Well, Kamin, I'm open to all the people of this town. I'm delighted to hear what you have to say.
I suggest that we build atmospheric condensers which could extract water from the air.
I don't mean to quash your very creative ideas but building atmospheric condensers would be a monumental undertaking. We could not hope to sustain such a project.
Each community would be responsible for its own. Condensers could make the difference between watering our crops or watching them die.
Well, I'll be glad to pass along your idea. You'll see that this kind of participatory government works for everyone. Be well, Batai. I shall see you next month. Good to meet you, Kanin.
Go carefully, Administrator.
That went very well. I think he was impressed with you.
But there'll be no atmospheric condensers.
These things take time, but it will happen. I'm sure of it.
Come and have supper tonight, my friend. I'll make some vegetable stew. Let's talk about building our own condenser.
Kamin. Hearing you talk to the Administrator, I realised that for the first time in years, you were speaking as though you were truly a member of the community. It was good to hear that again.
You've been brooding behind that flute all evening.
I'm not brooding. I'm immersed in my music.
Music.
I find that it helps me think, but the real surprise is I enjoy it so much.
No, the real surprise is that you may actually be improving.
Batai?
Yes, ma'am.
Go home.
Yes, ma'am. Goodnight, Kamin.
Goodnight, my friend.
Go carefully, Batai.
Don't forget these.  I won't put them away for you again.
Yes, ma'am.
I've done nothing but nag all day. I'm sorry.
No, I'm the one who's sorry. Everything you said this morning was absolutely correct. I feel that I have given you so little and you have given me so much.
No. You're a good man. A wonderful husband. I didn't mean
No, not such a wonderful husband. I spend my spare time charting the stars. I disappear for days at a time exploring the countryside. My life is very much as it was. Old habits.
You're gentle and kind. You never once raised your voice to me.
I'd like to ask your permission to build something.
Kamin, you've built your telescope, your laboratory. You don't need my permission for something new.
In this case, I think I do.
What is it?
A nursery.
Really? Really?
Unless, of course, if you would prefer a porch. It would certainly be easier to build. I could make a start on it right away.
No.
Geordi, any progress identifying the probe?
Maybe. I've picked up some residue on the probe's shell. I think it came from the propulsion system. Looks like it used a solid propellant as fuel.
Solid propellant?
Sensors read this stuff as crystalline emiristol. It produces a radioactive trail that ought to be traceable.
Then we should be able to send out a probe of our own, trace it back to the origin.
I'll get right on it.
Commander, I have been analysing the nucleonic beam. I believe it would be possible to reflect the particles back toward the probe in a way that would disrupt the signal.
Doctor?
I simply don't know the risk of shutting down the beam.
I'm not willing to let this thing keep drilling into him.
If somebody gets stabbed, you don't necessarily pull the knife out right away. It might do more harm than leaving it there.
The Captain is under attack. We must act.
I'm inclined to agree. Doctor, monitor him closely. Mister Data, prepare to disrupt the beam. We're going to try to cut this cord.
Meribor.
Meribor, this is your brother's ceremony. Don't fidget now.
We name this child for a dear friend who died a year ago. But now his memory will live on in his namesake.
We name you Batai, in his honour.
And he's starting out in the warmth of friends. Thank you. Please, help yourselves to something to eat.
Congratulations, Kamin.
Thank you.
It seems like only yesterday we had Meribor's naming ceremony. Go on.
I remember. I was so nervous I was afraid that I would drop her. Now look at the little lady.
She's no lady. Tromping through the hills with you all day, digging up those soil samples you insist upon collecting. No, she's her father's daughter.
I would have believed I didn't need children to complete my life. Now I couldn't imagine life without them.
Kamin, what is it?
Get the doctor. Hurry!
His respiratory system's in spasm. Pulse is irregular and weakening.
I'm losing him!
I'm getting massive somatophysical failure.
Two cc's delactovine.
Data, get that beam back.
There are severe fluctuations in the isocortex. Synaptic responses are failing.
Begin full cardiac induction.
Blood pressure is dropping rapidly. Seventy over twenty.
Data, you've got to re-establish that beam.
I am attempting to do so, Doctor.
Losing response in the isocortex.
Cortical stimulators. Start at ten percent.
The beam is fully restored, Doctor.
Blood pressure up to ninety over forty and rising.
Isocortical functions are stabilising. Vital signs are approaching normal.
Meribor?
Happy day, father.
Hey, that's my hobby. Find your own.
You're the one who taught me. Don't complain if you've turned me into a scientist.
And what has the scientist been up to today?
Analysing soil samples. There isn't any anaerobic bacteria. The soil is dead. This isn't just a very long drought, is it, Father? I have entries in my log that go back ten years. You have data preceding that for fifteen years. You've reached the same conclusion, I know you have.
I haven't reached any conclusion. A good scientist doesn't function by conjecture.
A good scientist functions by hypothesising and then proving or disproving that hypothesis. That's what I did.
Hey, why don't you spend more time with that young fellow Dannick?
You are changing the subject.
No, I'm not. I'm just hypothesising that he's in love with you.
You've taught me to pursue the truth, no matter how painful it is. It's too late to back off now. This planet is dying.
Perhaps I should have filled your head with trivial concerns. Games and toys and clothes.
I don't think you mean that.
No, I don't. It just saddens me to see you burdened with the knowledge things you can't change.
Father, I think I should marry Dannick sooner rather than later, don't you?
Seize the time, Meribor. Live now. Make now always the most precious time. Now will never come again.
I love you, Father.
His vital signs are holding. They've been stable ever since the beam was restored.
Commander Riker, we've started to receive telemetry from the probe we launched.
Go ahead.
We've charted the alien probe's radiation trail for over one light year.
Any way to extrapolate am origin?
Looks like a star system in the Silarian sector. Kataan.
Never heard of it. Data?
It is an unmapped system of six planets, sir.
Any of them inhabited?
Not any longer, sir. The star went nova. All life in the system was destroyed approximately one thousand years ago.
I put away your shoes for you again.
Yes, thank you, dear.
You know, I've been looking through this thing off and on for over thirty years, and I still don't see what you and Meribor find so fascinating.
Fine. Then maybe you'll sit down and have a rest like you're supposed to.
You treat me like some frail flower. People have surgery all the time.
He loves playing. He's quite good at it, don't you think?
He loves doing a lot of things too many. Last week, all he wanted to do was be a botanist. The week before that, a sculptor. I wish he could find some focus in his life.
I think he has. Maybe you should talk to him.
Batai?
BATAI JR:Father?
I get the feeling from your mother that you have something to tell me.
BATAI JR:Yes. I was waiting for the right moment, but that will never come. I'm leaving school.
Leaving school? No, you're not.
BATAI JR:I want to concentrate on my music. That's what I care about.
Last year, all you cared about was mathematics. The year before that, botany. Now
BATAI JR:Through it all, there was my music. I think you know that, Father. This is the life I want.
Well, we'll discuss it.
BATAI JR:Thank you, father.
Even after all these years you still have the ability to surprise me.
If music is what he wants, why should I stand in his way? Anyway, who knows how much time he'll have to follow any dream.
Are you still planning to talk to the Administrator tomorrow?
There's a possibility he'll dismiss me from the Council.
Unless, of course, you keep quiet.
No. The evidence is too pronounced. I can't stay silent.
What a surprise.
Kamin, what do you hope to accomplish? Spreading rumours that the planet is doomed. There could be chaos.
The facts are here. At least show them to someone who will recognise what they mean.
I won't be a party to your making trouble.
If you won't take them, I most certainly will.
Your observations, your findings, our scientists reached those same conclusions two years ago. Well, what did you expect us to do? Make it public? Can you imagine the effect?
But surely the technology must exist to save something of this world? Perhaps some people could be evacuated.
Evacuated where? Our technology is limited. We're just beginning to launch small missiles.
A collection of genetic samples, then. Something, anything. You simply cannot let this civilisation die.
Enough! There is a plan in work. I cannot tell you more than that.
BATAI JR:Father!
What is it?
BATAI JR:It's Mother. Hurry.
Doctor?
Kamin. I'm sorry.
You see? I go to any lengths to get your attention.
You always did have a flair for the dramatic.
Doctor, thank you.  Batai, leave us alone for a moment. I need to talk to my husband.
Did you show the Administrator your evidence?
I didn't have to. They already knew.
So, he won't throw you off the Council?
No.
Good. Remember, put your shoes away.
I promise.
Gotcha! Now I gotcha.
Some children are certainly making a lot of noise in here.
You shouldn't be outside so long. It's damaging, you know that.
I'm wearing plenty of your skin protector.
How about you, young man? Do you wear your skin protector outdoors? You do? Good boy.
BATAI JR:Happy day, everybody. It's time to go see the launching.
What launching? What's he talking about?
They're sending up a missile, Father. We're going to watch it.
I'm not going anywhere to watch anything.
BATAI JR:Come on, Kamie. Hurry up now. Let's go see the launching.
It breaks my heart to look at him.
Who?
My grandson. It breaks my heart. He deserves a rich, full life, and he's not going to get one.
Please come, Father.
Why didn't I hear anything about a launching?
Did everyone know about this except me? I'll be all right sitting here. You go off with the others. Hold onto my grandson, and watch the damned thing go up for all the good it'll do. What is it they're launching?
You know about it, Father. You've already seen it.
Seen it? What are you talking about? I haven't seen any missile.
Yes, you have, old friend. Don't you remember?
Batai?
You saw it just before you came here. We hoped our probe would encounter someone in the future. Someone who could be a teacher. Someone who could tell the others about us.
Oh, it's me, isn't it? I'm the someone. I'm the one it finds. That's what this launching is. A probe that finds me in the future.
Yes, my love.
Eline.
The rest of us have been gone for a thousand years. If you remember what we were, and how we lived, then we'll have found life again.
Eline.
Now we live in you. Tell them of us, my darling.
Something's happening.
The nucleonic beam has ceased, Commander. The probe has shut down.
His cerebral functions are stabilising.
Mister Worf, put a tractor beam on that probe. I want it in shuttlebay two for examination.
Yes, Commander.
What?
Please, Captain, don't get up too quickly.
Captain? This is the Enterprise. I'm Jean-Luc Picard. How long?
Twenty, twenty five minutes.
Twenty five minutes?
Captain, I want you in Sickbay. I'd like to run a full diagnostic on you.
Doctor Crusher.
Come.
Hello, sir. Feeling better?
Yes. Yes, thank you. But I find I'm having to rediscover that this is really my home.
We were able to open the probe and examine it. Apparently, whatever had locked onto you must have been self terminating. It's not functioning any longer. We found this inside.
Commander, I've been reviewing the unmanned probe scans. At some point during the last one hundred and fifty years, the fifth planet of Selcundi Drema has shattered, forming an asteroid belt.
I'd call that geological instability.
Is there any indication that this is the work of an unknown intelligence?
This is geology, not malevolence. These planets live fast and die hard. The question is, why?
You're sure you won't reconsider?
No, I'll just watch you and be impressed.
An optimistic vote of confidence from a non-rider.
You know, I never particularly thought of you as an animal person.
Small animals, no, but horses. Computer, programme the holodeck for a woodland setting, with a bridle path and an appropriate mount.
Type of mount? Andorian Zabathu, Klingon Sark
Horse. Earth horse.
Breed?
Arabian. The Arabs believed that Allah gathered the south wind and made the horse.
On the holodeck we've made that legend come true.
I like that. Oh yes, computer, English tack, and I will control the animal myself.
Enter when ready.
So you like horses for the romance?
It goes deeper than that. A fine war mare would sleep in a bedouin's tent, carry him into battle, feed his children with her milk. There's a bond which is created by mutual need. Hello, beautiful.
Now I understand. You don't want the comfort of a pet, you want a companion.
Thank you. I don't want to anthropomorphise anything. I seems that some creatures have the capacity to fill spaces you never knew were empty.
I had a Betazoid kitten once. My mother and the cat reacted badly to one another.
Sure you don't want to try? It's very relaxing. We can find you something that will be quiet and gentle.
No, I prefer a mode of transportation that doesn't have a mind of its own.
Strange. I would expect Betazoids to be outstanding animal trainers.
We become too involved in the thoughts and shifting passions of the beast. We lose our way and get swept up in emotion.
I should think the shifting passions of this beast would be far more terrifying.
Captain.
Yes, Number One?
We've entered the first system. I think you might want to come to the Bridge.
Something interesting?
Spectacular. And a little terrifying.
I'm on my way.
The first long range reading. Magnification ten to the sixth.
Quite impressive.
And deadly. The last unmanned probe showed a thriving ecosystem. Now there's nothing.
This is Commander Riker's meeting.
I'll need your advice and recommendations. As you know, I've been given the responsibility of overseeing Wesley's education. To further that goal, I would like to put him in charge of the planetary mineral surveys.
It's a big job with a lot of responsibility.
The game isn't big enough unless it scares you a little.
To do the job, Wesley's going to need a team. It takes command presence to lead. Do you think he's ready for that?
Leadership grows from self-confidence, which is also part of a Starfleet officer's education.
All of this is true, but there is an old horse trainer's adage about putting too much weight on a young back. We don't want him to break under pressure.
We seem to be shifting the focus here. Are we talking about a young officer on the fast track to the Academy, or are we talking about a young man that we are guiding through adolescence and into adulthood?
You can't guide someone into adulthood. The experiences are unique to each person. Whether Wes succeeds or fails, he will learn from the experience.
I agree. I'm just questioning the speed at which we're moving.
You think we're pushing him too hard?
I think that's a valid concern.
Tempering is taken to extremes.
He is a boy, not a sword.
Who will one day be a man and, to extend the metaphor, will need a fine edge that won't dull at the first touch of resistance.
Sooner or later he'll have to feel the burden of command. Ensign Crusher.
Report to the Observation Lounge.
Wesley, I've assigned you the command of the planetary mineral surveys.
Sir? Thank you, sir.
You may not thank me once you see how much work it entails. Assemble a team, and take a look at the records on the Drema quadrant. There's a mystery here. We've got to solve it.
Yes, sir. A team, sir?
Ensign, this is a serious responsibility.
I know, sir.
These officers are here to assist you. Not judge, help you. You should make use of them. They are a valuable resource. And by the way, I respect an officer who is prepared to admit ignorance and ask a question, rather than one who out of pride will blunder blindly forward.
I understand, sir.
Ensign. You're dismissed.
I'll try not to disappoint you.
Is this part of your regular duties?
No, it is a personal project. I have reset the sensors to scan for frequencies outside their usual range.
Such as?
The dips and peaks of the galaxy's magnetic field, organic molecules in nebular clouds, energetic cosmic rays.
Interesting. Would these scans also detect artificial transmissions as well as naturally occurring signals?
Of course.
Good.
Those signals are very faint and difficult to distinguish from background noise. That is why I am boosting the power.
I will be removing that equipment to my quarters.
Good.
Hi. Can I walk with you?
Yes.
I need a little advice.
Well, it's free.
Walking or advice?
Both.
It's about my team. I'm considering so many factors I'm confusing myself.
What have you done so far?
Well, I've broken down the task and picked the best people in those disciplines.
So who have you got so far?
I've got Prixus in mineralogy and metallurgy, Alans and Hildebrandt for volcanology and geomechanics. I want Davies for geochemistry, but
But they're all much older than you are.
Right, and it makes me feel strange. What do I do about personality conflicts?
Completely irrelevant. These people are professionals. If there's a personality conflict, you're in charge, you settle it.
So you not only have to understand the job, you also have to be a ship's Counsellor.
Sometimes.
Well, thank you.
Captain's log, Stardate 42696.3. We are entering the second Selcundi star system, where acting Ensign Crusher will begin his planetary mineral survey. The results of which may help unlock the geological puzzle.
Ensign Davies?
You got him.
Wesley Crusher. I've been put in charge of the planetary geological surveys, and I'd like to have you on the team.
Sounds great. Who else is on it?
I have Prixus and Alans and Hildebrandt.
It's a shame you didn't talk to me first. It's just personal opinion, but I like to break up married teams.
I hadn't thought of that.
Don't worry, they'll probably work out fine. And if you need any help, just give me a signal and I'll take over for you. We don't want you to get too beat up on your first command.
Thanks, but I'm pretty sure I'll be all right.
Computer, identify please.
Sensors indicate low-level rf waves.
Is there a pattern?
Affirmative.
Naturally occurring?
Negative.
Key universal translator, please.
Unable to comply. Weak signal.
Lock on comm. link and boost.
Lock on complete.
Read, please.
Insufficient signal strength.
Enhance, please.
Is anybody out there?
Yes.
Wes?
Hi, Doctor Pulaski.
You have trouble behind that door?
My team's in there. I've got to assign planets, set a schedule.
It sounds like you've got everything under control.
I haven't had to deal with them yet. Not together, not professionally.
Wes, the minute you walk through that door they're your team. You have nothing to prove. You've got the authority.
That's just 'cos Commander Riker says I do.
It's up to you to hang on to it. Now, you'd better get in there, and Wes, for whatever it's worth, I think you're going to do just fine.
Captain's log, stardate 42737.3. It has been six weeks since our entrance into the Selcundi Drema sector. Each system has revealed the same disturbing geological upheavals on every planet.
It seems to be at this point we can expect the greatest tectonic stresses.
I agree. Nice job.
Here are the results of my scan on the third Selcundi system. It's just the same old song.
Didn't you tell me that UV absorptions like these are indicative of traker deposits?
And where there's traker there's generally dilithium? Yes, I did.
So don't you think we ought to run an ico-spectrogram?
Well, Wes, these traker readings are really faint. It's probably just a fool's echo.
I think I'd still run an ico-gram.
Wesley, it's a major undertaking to set up the scanner.
We're looking at five hours minimum.
I know, I know. I don't want to do a half way job.
Wes, there's being thorough and then there's wasting time. It's also the mark of a good officer to recognise the difference.
Maybe you're right.
Computer, please access all volcanic and tectonic plate activity in Drema Four.
Accessing.
Computer, locate Captain Picard.
Captain Picard is on holodeck three.
Data?
An excellent steed, sir. Sorry to disturb you, Captain.
It's quite all right. It must be important, or you wouldn't be here.
Yes, sir, it is important. Very. Eight weeks ago I received a transmission, a simple four word message, 'Is anybody out there?' I answered it.
There is a loneliness inherent in that whisper from the darkness.
Yes, sir. I am glad that you understand, sir.
But it didn't end there.
No, sir. We speak often. It is a young female, humanoid.
Her society is aware that there is interstellar life?
No, sir.
Oops. Just where does she think you're calling from?
I have kept that somewhat vague, sir, but Sarjenka, that is her name, has been quite specific, telling me details of her family and friends. And interspersed among these confidences have been some alarming references.
Go on.
Drema Four has been enduring the same geological stresses we have found in the other systems.
Then your friend is in trouble.
Yes, sir.
What are you proposing?
If we can determine the cause of these geological disturbances, we might be able to reverse the process.
Violate the Prime Directive?
I was hoping that you might have another option, sir.
We don't even know if this catastrophe is preventable. Call a conference in my quarters. All senior staff.
Yes, sir.
And Data, all communication with this life form must cease.
Yes, sir. I understand, sir.
Seeing the look on his face. I'll get you another drink.  Two more.
Thank you.
Family emergency.  You don't look like a person who came here to relax.
I didn't. I need your advice. Yesterday, when Ensign Davies turned in his geological survey, I asked him to run an ico-spectrogram. He didn't agree.
Do you think you were right?
Yes. I guess. I could have just been picking nits.
Or you could have been intimidated. It's tough to tell other people what to do.
I suppose I could have made it an order, but how do you give orders to somebody older and more experienced then you?
The difference in ages between you and Davies is not the issue here.
I guess not.
Do you think it might have something to do with ego?
No, it's just the opposite of ego. Every time I try to give an order, something inside me says, what makes my judgment so superior to these people's?
Wes, responsibility and authority go hand in hand. I know you're responsible, now we've got to teach you a little bit of authority. One of the reasons you've been given command is so you can make a few right decisions, that will establish a pattern of success and help build self-confidence. If you don't trust your own judgment, you don't belong in the command chair.
But what if I'm wrong?
Then you're wrong. It's arrogant to think you'll never make a mistake.
But what if it's something really important. I mean, not just a mineral survey. What if someone dies because I made a mistake?
In your position, it's important to ask yourself one question. What would Picard do?
He'd listen to everyone's opinion, then make his own decision. But he's Captain Picard.
Well it doesn't matter. Once Picard makes his decision, does anyone question it?
No way.
And why not?
I'm not sure.
Commander Riker, report to the Captain's quarters.
When you figure it out, you'll understand command. I'm on my way. I hope I've been able to help. You let me know what you decide?
I've made my decision. I'm going to have Davies run that ico-gram. Thank you, sir.
Okay.
Ensign Davies? I want that ico-spectrogram run on the Selcundi Drema system.
You got it.
It is no longer a matter of how wrong Data was, or why he did it. The dilemma exists. We have to discuss the options. And please talk freely.
There are no options. The Prime Directive is not a matter of degrees. It is an absolute.
I have a problem with that kind of rigidity. It seems callous and even a little cowardly.
Doctor, I'm sure that is not what the Lieutenant meant, but in a situation like this, we have to be cautious. What we do today may profoundly affect upon the future. If we could see every possible outcome
We'd be gods, which we're not. If there is a cosmic plan, is it not the height of hubris to think that we can, or should, interfere?
So what are you saying? That the Dremans are fated to die?
I think that's an option we should be considering.
Consider it considered, and rejected.
If there is a cosmic plan, are we not a part of it? Our presence at this place at this moment in time could be a part of that fate.
Right, and it could be part of that plan that we interfere.
Well that eliminates the possibility of fate.
But Commander, the Dremans are not a subject for philosophical debate. They are a people.
So we make an exception in the deaths of millions.
Yes.
And is it the same situation if it's an epidemic, and not a geological calamity?
Absolutely.
How about a war? If generations of conflict is killing millions, do we interfere? Ah, well, now we're all a little less secure in our moral certitude. And what if it's not just killings. If an oppressive government is enslaving millions? You see, the Prime Directive has many different functions, not the least of which is to protect us. To prevent us from allowing our emotions to overwhelm our judgement.
My emotions are involved. Data's friend is going to die. That means something.
To Data.
Does that invalidate the emotion?
What if the Dremans asked for our help?
Yes. Sarjenka's transmission could be viewed as a call for help.
Sophistry.
I'll buy that excuse. We're all jigging madly on the head of a pin anyway.
She cannot ask for help from someone she does not know.
She knows me.
What a perfectly vicious little circle.
We are going to allow her to die, are we not?
Data, I want you to sever the contact with Drema Four.
Isolating frequency.
Data. Data, where are you? Why won't you answer? Are you angry me? Please, please, I'm so afraid. Data, Data, where are you?
Wait. Oh, Data. Your whisper from the dark has now become a plea. We cannot turn our backs.
Captain's log, stardate 42741.3. We are entering into orbit of Drema Four, the planet from which Data received the distress signal. Sensors indicate that the volcanic activity is increasing.
We found the reason for the geological instability.
Excellent.
We would have missed it if Ensign Crusher hadn't requested an ico-gram, but he did, and
Drema Four has the largest deposit of dilithium ore ever recorded. It's also laid down in a very unusual pattern. The crystals are growing to form perfectly aligned lattices.
The ore is forming generator strata.
Which creates a piezoelectric effect.
In plain English, you're saying the dilithium is causing the geological catastrophe.
Right, the crystals take the natural radiant heat of the planet
Focus it, and turn it into mechanical energy.
Which increases tectonic stresses
That tear the planet apart.
And then the crystals break down, which is why we found all these traces of illium 629.
So that takes care of the why. Now, what can you do?
That is going to take a little more work.
Can you reverse the process?
We think so.
No. No theories, no half answers. Yes or no?
We'll get to work on it.
Sir, Data's out there right now, monitoring the conditions on Drema Four. The situation's become pretty desperate for his friend. He's calculated the safest location on the planet's surface. You can guess why.
We're just keep getting deeper and deeper in, aren't we?
She's going to die. They're all going to die.
Unless.
Yes. Unless.
All right, you can tell Commander Data he has my permission to contact his friend and conduct her to a safer location. Number One, you know where we are now?
Sir?
Sarjenka, this is Data. Respond please.
Unable to complete transmission.
Reason for failure?
Atmospheric activity interfering with RF signal.
We're modifying class one probes so they become resonators. We will then use torpedo casings to protect them once they begin burrowing beneath the surface.
How will these resonators destroy the crystals?
By emitting harmonic vibrations which will shatter the lattices.
The Enterprise will monitor and adjust the frequency of the resonators.
Sounds like a plan. Lets get started.
Captain.
Tea, Earl Grey, hot.
Captain, permission to beam down to Drema Four.
What?
I have been unable to contact Sarjenka.
Data, I appreciate your concern. Transporting to the surface is only going to make a bad situation worse.
Sir, I feel it is important to determine the reason for
Come on, Data.
Captain, your orders were to deliver the message, correct?
Yes.
Then what is the difference between sending the message and delivering it personally?
A whopping big one, and you know it.
Sir, we have come this far.
In for a penny, in for a pound, is that what you're saying, Mister Data?
Yes, sir.
Oh, hell. Go.
Sir?
Number One, handle the transporter. Go.
Where would you say we are now, sir?
O'Brien, take a nap. You didn't see any of this. You're not involved.
O'BRIEN:Right, sir. I'll just standing over here, dozing off.
Data, you've got ten minutes. That's it. If you meet anybody but Sarjenka
I will signal for immediate beam out.
Commander Riker to the Bridge.
Damn.
O'BRIEN:I just woke up, sir.
You know what to do?
O'BRIEN:No problem, sir. I'll have him out of there as smooth as ice.
Sarjenka? Wait! I'm Data.
Data. Data, you came. Data, where have you been?
It would take too long to explain. You and your family must leave.
We already have. We ran when the tremors began.
Then why are you here?
My father wouldn't let us take anything, but I had to have my transmitter. I knew you would come back, and I didn't want you to find only silence, the way I did.
I am sorry for that, but it is very complicated. Does your family know where you are?
No.
You cannot survive in this.
What are we going to do?
Enterprise, two to beam up. You must come with me.
Where are we going?  To the stars?
O'BRIEN:There's going to be hell to pay.
Where is Commander Riker?
O'BRIEN:On the Bridge. Where are you going?
To the Bridge.
O'BRIEN:And you're going to take that?
Don't leave me here. Please don't leave me.
Quite impossible.
Sir, three minutes to resonator launch.
Where is he?
He'll be here.
He has brought a child onto my ship and on my Bridge.
I'm sure Mister Data has a very good explanation.
I do, sir. She was frightened and did not wish to be left alone
Mister Data, kindly assume your station. Counsellor, will you escort her to Sickbay.
No, Data, no. I'm scared. Don't make me go.
It's all right, no one's going to hurt you.
No!
We'll just go and get a treat, and then
No.
Captain, I will see to it that she is not in the way.
One minute to launch.
Come on, it'll be all right.
No. Just leave me alone. I want Data.
Counsellor, allow me. Please. Sarjenka, no one will harm you. These are my friends.
Mister Data, take your station and keep her with you. This does concern her.
Ten seconds.
I will require my hand. Thank you.
Firing torpedoes.
Sensors locked on probes.
Torpedoes have reached their targets.
Resonators activated. Harmonic sequences have begun.
What are you doing?
We are attempting to quiet your planet. If we succeed, there will be no more quakes, no more volcanoes.
Ensign, when should the results be known?
They should happen very quickly, sir.
And my parents and brothers?
Captain, sensors indicate a planetwide reduction in tectonic stress levels.
It worked. We did it.
Your parents will be safe now.
You did this for me?
Look, Sarjenka, there is your home.
Data, escort her to Sickbay.
Aye, sir.
Number One, you have the Bridge.
Doctor.
Yes, Captain?
Data and the alien are on their way down. What would be involved in removing all memory of her communication with Data
And her visit to this ship?
Assuming her brain structure is similar to ours, the memories would be stored chemically on the neurons of the cerebral cortex. They're also time dependent. I would have to scan for age of the chemical links, and try to find
The relevant neurons.
Well, do your best.
You have many different kinds of people here.
Yes.
When I am bigger, can I be on your ship?
I am certain that you could.
I wish I could come with you now.
I am afraid that is not possible.
I know, but I can still wish for it.
Doctor Pulaski, this is Sarjenka.
Hello, Sarjenka.
Hello.
What is this?
An Elanin singer stone. It sings a different song for each person.
What does it sing for you?
It does not sing for me.
Why not?
Because I am a machine.
Sarjenka, we're going to run a few scans just to be sure you're all right. Data's will be right here. Don't worry.
You did a good thing, Data.
But are we doing a good thing now, Doctor?
This is to protect her as much as us.
By robbing her of her memories?
To remember you and this ship would complicate her future. She has to be the person she was born to be. And you'll remember.
Enterprise, one to beam up.
Wes. Sit down.
No, thank you, sir. It's going to be a long time before I'm qualified enough to sit here.
You did a good job. I'm proud of you.
Thank you, sir. Does it get any easier?
No.
Come.
I came to apologise, sir.
No apologies are necessary. You reminded us that there are obligations that go beyond duty.
I appreciate your seeking other options, sir. Your decision could have been unilateral.
One of my officers, one of my friends, was troubled. I had to help. Is Sarjenka safely home?
Yes, sir. She will not remember me, sir, but I will remember her.
Remembrance and regrets, they too are a part of friendship.
Yes, sir.
And understanding that has brought you a step closer to understanding humanity.
Nasty. Nitrogen, methane, liquid neon. Surface temperature minus two hundred and ninety one degrees Celsius. Winds up to three hundred and twelve metres per second.
Not exactly a vacation planet, eh?
Not unless you like ammonia tornadoes. But I have found indications of debris in an elliptical orbit.
Keep me informed. The sooner we find out what the Klingons think they saw, the sooner we can get the hell out of here.
Sounds good to me. Nasty.
Come.
Fermat's last theorem. You're familiar with it?
Vaguely. I spent too many math classes daydreaming about being on a starship.
When Pierre de Fermat died they found this equation scrawled in the margin of his notes. X to the nth plus Y to the nth equals Z to the nth, where n is greater than 2, which he said had no solution in whole numbers. But he also added this phrase. Remarkable proof.
Yeah, that's starting to come back to me. There was no proof included.
For the eight hundred years people have been trying to solve it.
Including you.
I find it stimulating. Also, it puts things in perspective. In our arrogance we feel we are so advanced, and yet we cannot unravel a simple knot tied by a part-time French mathematician working alone, without a computer.
Captain, we've detected some sort of debris in a loose orbit.
Can you identify it?
No, sir. I suggest we beam a section aboard for analysis.
Make it so, Number One.
We've locked onto something with markings on it.
What sort of markings?
Uncertain. Energise.
We've got ourselves a puzzle, Number One.
Yes sir. I think we have.
Analysis bears out that the object was definitely terrestrial in origin, dated mid twenty first century.
No, no. No Earth ship of that time could have travelled out this far.
Nevertheless, that is what our tests indicate. And the markings we discovered are consistent with this hypothesis.
Any indication of what destroyed it, Data?
That is even more significant than the object itself, Counsellor. On several of its surfaces, the molecules seem to have disintegrated
Disintegrated? How?
Almost as if they were hit by a weapon from our time.
Curiouser and curiouser.
Captain, we've detected a large structure on the planet.
It's a building of some sort, situated on a plain of frozen methane, smack in the middle of a tremendous storm belt.
I don't believe this. That structure is surrounded by breathable air.
Is there any connection between that structure and the ship fragment we found?
Unknown, sir.
Suggestions?
Just one, sir. We could go down there and have a look.
Breathable air. No life forms that might be dangerous. I think we could risk a minimal away team, Number One.
O'BRIEN:Give me a moment, gents. We're dealing with an extremely narrow access point.
Phasers on stun. Ready when you are.
O'BRIEN:I believe we've got it now. You have a green light, Commander.
Energise.
Those ammonia storms are less than a kilometre away, yet they do not appear to penetrate this breathable zone.
It's like the eye of a hurricane.
Commander, what is that?
A door.
The structure must be here, yet we cannot see it.
Enterprise, this is Commander Riker.
As your read out shows, this is an unusual place.
Completely calm, no sound, no movement, yet a few hundred metres away a storm is raging.
Any information about the structure.
Yes, sir. There is an antique revolving door. It could be an entrance.
A revolving door? Number One, proceed with caution.
Yes, sir.
Well, this is what we came here for. Captain, we're entering.
Enterprise to away team, come in.
We're receiving no signal at all from them, sir.
Transporter room. lock on to the landing party. Beam them up.
We've got nothing to lock on to, sir.
Riker to Enterprise. We've entered the structure. Riker to Enterprise, come in. Come in, Enterprise.
When they went through that antique doorway, the signal just disappeared, sir.
What's causing the interference?
Unknown.
Are they receiving us?
No. We're going to have to recalibrate all the frequencies to find one that'll work.
Then do it.
Sir, without communication, we should beam up immediately.
We're here, there's no danger. We'll look around then leave.
Checking in, gentlemen? You'll have to go to the front desk.
Very good. We'll start with that.
Welcome, gentlemen. Have a nice trip?
Do you know us?
We've been expecting you. A trio of foreign gentlemen.
Yes. We're from the United Federation of Planets.
Of course you are. Welcome to the Hotel Royale
Excuse me. Did Rita call?
I'm busy.
You're busy? This is my life I'm talking about here. Now did Rita call or not?
No, and for your own good you'd better quit thinking about Rita.
I'm not afraid of Mickey D.
Then you're a fool. Anybody with any sense is afraid of Mickey D.
If Rita calls, you let me know.
Kid's just asking for trouble. Rita's too much for him to handle, and Mickey D's going to plant his face in the pavement. Now, here are your room keys. And some complimentary casino chips. Enjoy.
What is this place? How did a being like you get here?
Why, this is the Royale, of course. And my personal life is really none of your business, thank you.
What he means is, what planet is this?
I beg your pardon?
This planet. What do you call it?
Earth. What do you call it?
We call it Theta Eight.
How charming.
Commander
Yes, Data?
None of these people are emitting life signs.
You mean they're not alive?
Then what are they?
These beings, are they machines, or mere illusions designed to deceive us?
Not illusion, Lieutenant. They do exist, but they do not register as either man or machine.
Take this creature, for example. He does not exhibit any DNA structure.
Excuse me, son. Look who's talking. Man, you sound just like my ex-wife. All right. Time to get back to business!
What sort of business do you suppose he is getting down to?
Status report.
We're attempting to employ alternate encoding schemes.
There could be hundreds of possible combinations.
Is there an intelligence causing this interference?
That's impossible to tell, Captain.
It's unlike Commander Riker not to follow procedure. When he lost contact with the Enterprise, he should have returned immediately to the beam down coordinates.
I don't feel he's in any danger. In fact, if I could choose one word to assess his mood, it would be amused.
Amused?
Put some chips there, mister. Yes, sirree! You're new around here, aren't you?
Yes, sir.
Sit down. I'm going to teach you how this game is played, boy. Go ahead. Ante up.
He wants you to cut the cards.
Ah, is this poker?
No, no, blackjack.
Blackjack. Accessing. Ah. Also known as twenty one, a number which defines the object of the game. Picture cards are worth ten, aces one or eleven, all other cards face value.
Boy, you're right. You are right.
Pretty smooth. Run 'em, boy. Make 'em nice and friendly.
Twenty one, twenty one.
Don't look at your hand, honey. That gal has got to win. Now, honey, you got fifteen and the dealer's showing ten.
Do I hit, Texas, or do I stand?
If you've got to win, you've got to hit.
Hit me.  Damn!
Shoot. Hit me. Twenty one, and a winner. Yes, sirree.
Hit me. Another please.
Do you think you've had about enough?
If the objective of the game is to approach a total of twenty one points, I will definitely need another card.
Yeah.
Boy, you have got the brass. Do you know what the odds are on a five card charlie? Hell, you're just throwing your money away.
Hit me.
How'd you? Shut my mouth. Hey, you're not one of them card counting fellas, are you?
The number of the cards and their values remain quite constant. What would be the purpose in counting them?
Yeah.
Having fun, Data?
Fun, sir? While there is a certain amount of enjoyment involved, I am mainly conducting research into
Save it. We're getting out of here.
Understood, sir.
Guys, you're holding up the game.
Our apologies, sir.
I'll watch your chips.
Thank you, sir.
Hey. The hat.
Sorry, sir.
Deal them up.
Progress?
We've accessed the range of encoding scheme alternates. The difficulty is in the frequency range. The interference is highly variable.
See, the problem may be with the envelope covering the structure. There are hydrogen-carbon helix patterns throughout.
Any transmissions are simply scattered and refracted at random. No wonder you can't get through.
Exactly.
Those are some fairly aggressive computations, Lieutenant.
I'm comparing the molecular integrity of that bubble against our phasers.
Is penetration possible?
I don't know just yet. It may be an option. I'd like to run this test.
Make it so.
Let's try that again.
Let's find another way out of here.
Excuse me. Excuse me. Aside from the main door, is there another exit I might use?
Excuse me?
Excuse me. Say, I was wondering if you could tell me
There's a good deal of structural integrity, Worf.
Permission to use phaser, sir.
Granted.
Sir, I can find no other exits. I believe we are trapped here.
Captain's log, supplemental. We remain in orbit around Theta Eight, still out of contact with the away team.
We're almost there, Captain. We'll be able to attempt contact in a few minutes.
Captain, the situation down there has changed.
In what way?
Commander Riker has become tense. Closed in, he's feeling trapped.
Phasers are totally ineffective on all surfaces.
Sir, our options appear quite limited.
We don't have any. If we're going to get out of here, we're going to have to do it on our own. I'm going to get some answers out of that desk clerk.
Are you crazy?
Wrong. I'm finally getting some smarts.
You think you're going to scare Mickey D with that gun?
I'm going to make him leave Rita alone.
Kid, she's a big girl, and she's Mickey D's girl.
Not any more. Not after tonight.
Look, kid. I like you. I don't want to see you get hurt, especially over some dame
Don't call her that. You'll see. You'll see how tough Mickey D is. He's nothing.
I want some answers.
I'm sure the concierge will be delighted
We would like to get out of here. Now.
The Royale's exits are clearly marked.
That's not good enough.
If you have a complaint about the service you've received during your stay here, you can always take it up with the manager.
Fine. I'd like to see him, immediately.
I'm afraid the manager is very busy.
Riker, can you read me?
Yes.
There's a good deal of interference, but you are getting through.
Number One, why haven't you left that building?
We tried, sir. It seems like we're trapped here. We're in no immediate danger
But I am concerned.
Something about your location is interfering with communication. We are working on the problem.
Standing by, sir.
Captain, these frequencies are unstable.
Then find others.
Yes, sir.
What is going on down there?
Commander, I am picking up something most unusual in another section of this structure. It appears to be human DNA.
Where?
Thirty one point nine metres above and to the right of us.
Perhaps those turbolifts could take us there.
Seems to be malfunctioning.
The reading I received is from behind this door, sir.
My reading is intensifying, sir.
Are you getting any life signs?
None, sir.
Definitely human. Male.
Looks like the poor devil died in his sleep.
What a terrible way to die.
He has been dead for two hundred and eighty three years, sir. The lack of any advanced decomposition is due to the sterile environment.
Why would anyone go to all this trouble? It's just window dressing for a dead man.
Commander.
Is this significant, sir?
American.
Fifty two stars sir. Places it between 2033 and 2079 AD. It correlates with the debris we found. Colonel S. Richey. Rest in peace, Colonel.
Picard to Riker.
Finally. Riker. Go ahead.
You're coming through clearly now.
What's your situation?
This structure was apparently made to resemble twentieth century Earth. All efforts to exit have failed.
We haven't found a way to transport you back yet.
I assumed as much, sir. We've also located the remains of a human. Request identity scan. Colonel Richey. American. First initial S. Roughly the same time period.
Do it.
Commander. Some curiosities.
Books. A novel. Hotel Royale? Summarise, please.
Information retrieved, Captain
Number One?
Go ahead, Captain.
We have the information you requested. Colonel Stephen Richey was the commanding officer of the explorer ship Charybdis
Which had a terrestrial launch date of July 23rd, 2037. It was the third manned attempt to travel beyond the confines of the Earth's solar system.
Its telemetry failed. It was never heard from again. Do you believe that you've discovered the remains of Colonel Richey?
Yes. And Captain,
We've found something else. A novel by Todd Matthews, entitled Hotel Royale, which is the name of this structure. Data.
Captain, this is the story of a group of compulsive gamblers caught up in a web of crime, corruption and deceit.
It is told by nefarious lothario Mickey D, who appears only at the climax to carry out the cold-blooded murder of the hotel bellboy.
There is also a subplot about an older man conspiring with a younger woman to murder her husband. She is squandering her inheritance.
Captain, this novel and everything Data just described
Seems to be exactly what's happening at this hotel.
Extraordinary.
There's also one other thing, a diary with only
Obviously made by Colonel Richey.
Can you read it?
Yes. I write this in the hope that it will someday be read by human eyes. I can only surmise at this point, but apparently our exploratory shuttle was contaminated by an alien life form which infected and killed all personnel except myself.
I awakened to find myself here in the Royale Hotel, precisely as described in the novel I found in my room.
And for the last thirty eight years I have survived here. I have come to understand that the alien contaminators created this place for me out of some sense of guilt, presuming that the novel we had on board the shuttle about the Hotel Royale was in fact a guide to our preferred lifestyle and social habits. Obviously, they thought this was the world from which I came.
I hold no malice toward my benefactors. They could not possibly know the hell they have put me through.
for it was such a badly written book, filled with endless clich and shallow characters. I shall welcome death when it comes.
I understand, Number One. Now we know why all that is there.
Why can't you get out?
Number One.
Yes, sir.
Lieutenant La Forge has a thought. He believes we can phaser a slice in the field
Surrounding the structure.
That means the atmosphere of the planet would instantly rush in.
Our projected survival would be approximately twelve seconds.
Correct. The cryogenic process would be nearly instantaneous.
But I assume you could revive us?
Yes.
In theory.
You must understand, Number One
We'll wait here for months if necessary. We're just considering options.
If you're trying to motivate us to find
Our own way out of here, you've succeeded, Captain.
Yes? There is a female voice asking if we want room service.
I believe she is asking if we want the room cleaned.
Tell her no.
No.
What did she say?
She said the kitchen will be open twenty four hours if we change our minds.
We're going to explore the rest of the hotel. We'll keep a comm. line open. You two go down to the lobby and see if there's anything that we've missed. You talk to the guests and try to find out who or what they are. I'll check out the rest of the floors.
Computer, locate and display the text of the novel entitled Hotel Royale by Todd Matthews.
Accessing.
If the cause of the difficulties is in the novel, we may find the solution within its pages. Ah.  'It was a dark and stormy night'. It's not a promising beginning.
It may get better.
I suggest we separate and blend in with these beings. Casual queries, offered inconspicuously, may prove fruitful.
I need a four. Give me a four.
Oh, shoot.
How much do I have left here?
Honey, now you know it's bad luck to count your chips at the table.
Yeah?
Excuse me, sir. Might I inquire, where are you from?
Lubbock, Texas.
And how did you get here?
To Vegas? Drove my car. I got a ninety one Caddy with only eighty thousand miles on it.
Where is your automobile now?
Out front, I suppose. What the hell difference does it make?
Could you take me there?
Hit me. I'm losing my shirt.
Son, why would I want to do that? Can't you see I'm trying to to help this little lady?
I believe you are trapped inside the Royale, just as I am.
Sure does seem that way when you're losing, don't it? We're just trying to turn this lady's wagon around, and win back some lost change. Otherwise she's in a desperate situation and she's got nowhere to turn. Well, almost nowhere.
I stay, right?
I wouldn't.
The odds favour standing pat.
What do I do?
Do you want a card or what?
Hit me.  Too many. I've almost lost it all. What am I going to do?
There, there, there, there, there.
What did you find?
Nothing.
Rita just called.
She did? What did she say?
It was kind of hard to tell. She was crying.
Crying? Damn. Mickey D thinks he can treat people any way he wants. Well, that's all over now.
MICKEY D:You were told.
It's not for you to make the call. It's for Rita.
MICKEY D:She sent me to tell you.
Okay, boys. Look, we can't afford to have any trouble in here. Why don't you just take this outside.
MICKEY D:Yeah, I like that. Come on, baggage man.
MICKEY D:Let's you and me take it outside.
When I was a kid, I used to look up to you guys. The suit, the fancy shoes. I really thought that made you somebody, but you're nobody. She could make something out of her life
I don't believe this dialogue. Did humans really talk like that?
Not in real life. Remember, everything that's going on down there is taken from what Colonel Richey calls a second-rate novel.
Like Rita. She could do something with her life. She could be somebody if she only had the chance.
With your permission, sir.
MICKEY D:She is somebody. She's my girl.
You got her on the stuff. That's the only reason she stays with you. Because you feed her sickness.
You got to let me help her.
MICKEY D:Well why don't we just go outside and talk about it?
Just watch yourself.
Don't worry.
It's all part of the novel. Don't interfere.
MICKEY D:You should have listened to me, kid. No woman's worth dying for. Killing for, not dying for.
Riker to Enterprise.
Yes, Number One.
A bizarre incident just took place.
The shoot-out between the bellboy and Mickey D.
Yes, and Mickey D just walked out the door. How did he do that?
It's on page 244.
In the novel. Right. How does it end?
A bad love affair ends in a bloody shoot-out, the hotel gets bought out, and life goes on, such as it is.
The hotel gets bought? By whom?
It isn't specific. It simply refers to foreign investors. Sale price, twelve point five million United States
They return home, leaving the assistant manager in charge.
Captain, that's how we're getting out. We're buying this place.
It is all a question of probabilities. Quite simple, really, if one bets with any sequential consistency.
Elaborate.
The combinations totalling seven or eleven have considerable value when achieved on the primary attempt. With eight variations possible to create those totals, the likelihood of those totals occurring is not significant. However
Okay, okay. Can you do it?
I believe so, sir.
Eight's a point. Eighter from Decatur. Candy see the wise. Do it, do it.
Oh. Snake eyes.
Single digits on each cube are not at all desirable.
You're almost broke.
Relax, honey. It's only money
Yeah, but if you lose it all, I won't even have a place to sleep.
Don't worry your little head, honey. I'd never let that happen. Go babe, let's go. Here they come, babe.
Seven. You're out.
You're turn, Slick.
Go to work.
Maybe this turkey'll bring us some luck.
Six. Six is your number.
Hell, my blind grandmother can make a six. Come on, boy, roll 'em.
I thought seven and eleven had value.
Actually, six is a valid point. Of course, now the objective is to roll a duplicate six before hitting seven.
But the probability of making a six is no greater than that of rolling a seven.
There is a certain degree of random fortune involved. I believe that is why they call it gambling.
Yeah.
Seven. Seven away. Next shooter.
So much for your new turkey.
Give Slick another shot. I got a feeling about you, boy.
Commander, these cubes are improperly balanced. I believe their final resting position would be
Can you repair them?
I believe so. I will make another attempt.
Baby needs a new pair of shoes.
Eleven! Attaboy! Do that a few more times and we're all gonna get well!
Seven, a winner.
And another one. Keep going, boy. We got a hot one. Let's go. Let's go.
Double 'em up. Here we go.
Keep 'em rolling, boy. Keep rolling. Seven, a winner.
Status, Number One.
Rather a nice run of luck, Captain.
Don't get out of character, Commander.
Sir?
The foreign investors in the book are described as flamboyantly generous.
Yes, sir. I understand.
Seven, look at that.
Oh, Tex, darlin', you're brilliant!
Yeah. And I'm good lookin' too, huh?
Isn't that enough?
No. Don't want to come up short. You are keeping count?
Yes, sir. Twelve point three million. Perhaps I will bet seven hundred thousand.
No, bet it all.
But sir, the sale price of this edifice is twelve point five million.
We need some spreading around money, Data.
Sir?
Bet it all.
There you go. A little something for you, Ziggy. A little something for those cocktail waitresses. Why don't you run this outside, give it to the parking lot attendants.
You're very kind, sir.
Here you go, Vanessa. A little something for you, too.
Thank you.
When the train comes in, everybody rides.
Yeah, and I'm getting off at this station. After eighteen passes, the air gets a little too thin for this country boy. I'm betting against you, fella.
Are you nuts?
I do not believe that is a prudent choice, sir.
Hey, that's what horse racing's about. Roll 'em, boy.
Seven, a winner.
The man has the touch.
You knew you were going to throw that seven, didn't you? You just let me go down the tube.
I tried to caution you, sir.
What was it? I mean, was it personal, or what? Because I didn't show you my car?
Now.
I wish to cash in, sir.
I'm afraid you've broken the bank.
Just take twelve point five million, the purchase price of this hotel. Spread the rest around.
You're the foreign investors.
That's right. We just bought this place, lock, stock, and barrel. Consider it a done deal.
I like you fellas. You got style. Let me buy you guys a drink.
Just enjoy the game. Don't let them change the dice on you.
You got it.
Enterprise, this is the away team. We're clear of the structure.
Three to beam up.
Time to come home now, Number One. Transporter room, we have a fix on the away team. Beam them up.
Come.
Sir.
Welcome back, Number One.
Very strange experience. Puzzling. I still can't comprehend how Colonel Richey's vessel could have travelled out that far. Not on it's own, at any rate.
Perhaps they were brought here by whoever created that make-believe world down there. It's possible they didn't know how fragile the humans aboard actually were. Only one of them survived.
None of it makes any sense.
Like Fermat's theorem, it's a puzzle we may never solve.
I would consider them insignificant.
What if you're wrong? Sorry. But what if it is more than a mere discrepancy?
Then I'd say we have a problem.
Agreed. We'll have Starbase Montgomery give us an independent reading.
Even if the molecular level controls have failed, we can still recrystallise the dilithium without outside help.
Don't worry, Data. My ego isn't at stake here.
Perhaps we can reprogram the system to correct the readout variables
Well, that's certainly another option, but as we're stopping at Starbase Montgomery anyway, we'll let them do the analysis.
I don't recall Starbase Montgomery on the mission itinerary
I think we could all use a twelve hour layover. Besides, I've just received some personnel transfer directives. Priority matter,
Boarding or disembarking?
Captain Picard. We're within hailing range of Starbase Montgomery
Go to half impulse power.  Will you join me in the Observation lounge when you're done?
Captain?
Number One, I've just been recollecting the arrival of a new First Officer on board the Enterprise, and a manual docking confidently achieved. I may have been somewhat miserly in my congratulations then, so let me make up for it now. The Captain of the Starship Ares is retiring. Congratulations. You've been selected as his replacement.
The Ares. She's in Vega-Omicron sector.
And they have picked up indications of an intelligent life form, though nothing confirmed.
Obviously, Starfleet will want to know more.
That's why they're asking for you. Not for your military proficiency, but for your skill as an explorer and as a diplomat.
Vega-Omicron. It'll take months at high warp just to get there.
With no guarantee of finding anything when you arrive. Well, you have twelve hours to think it over. And if it's not too premature, congratulations, Captain.
Establish synchronous orbit.
Aye, sir.
Starbase Montgomery is sending a civilian advisor on board to brief you on the Ares's mission.
A personal briefing?
A strategic attach with specialised knowledge in the frontier regions. I think you'll find the briefing interesting.
I hope it's complete. Much of my decision will be based on it.
Commander Riker to Transporter room three.
Enjoy.
Ensign.
Ah, you're right on time, Commander. He's on his way now.
Dad. You're the civilian advisor? The strategic attach?
I asked Captain Picard to keep it quiet. I didn't want you to make you nervous or excited.
It's been fifteen years. Excitement is hardly the appropriate emotion.
You've done well. First Officer on the Enterprise. Quite a feather in your cap.
I've worked hard.
Of course. I'm proud of you, son.
If you'll excuse me, I've got my duties to attend to. When you've settled in, we can complete our briefing. Have Security arrange an escort for this gentleman.
Aye, sir.
Worf, did you hear about Commander Riker's promotion?
Yes.
He didn't know his father was coming. He was completely surprised.
So?
Can you imagine if it was your father?
I never knew my father.
And I didn't have a father long enough to know him.
It is a waste of time to think of such things.
I wasn't thinking about it, but everybody needs somebody.
Enough!
You know, Starbase Montgomery really didn't have to send me all this help, because we've already checked the entire dilithium spectrum for anomalous frequencies, so you don't have to waste your time on that.
Wes. Are you okay?
I was just talking to Worf. He's really eccentric at times.
That's one word for it.
He was really upset. I must've said something wrong.
Maybe Worf's not too thrilled with the idea of losing Commander Riker to a new assignment. I know I'm not.
Neither am I. But with Worf it was something else. Something's really bothering him.
Think so?
O'BRIEN:Female?
No.
O'BRIEN:Career? Career?
Family.
O'BRIEN:That is trouble. You choose your enemies, you choose your friends, but family? That's in the stars.
So I've heard.
Kyle Riker! Excuse me, ladies. Great to see you.
MAN 2:Kyle. Been a long time.
This is more than a surprise. It's total shock.
You mean you didn't bake me a cake?
You're actually here.
That makes two of us. How about a drink?
How about a kiss?
They know each other.
O'BRIEN:No kidding. I know her too, but we don't do that.
You look wonderful.
And it has nothing to do with Commander Riker's new assignment?
No. His reaction was just the opposite of mine. Completely unaffected.
You see? With all that's going on, maybe you're overreacting.
Really? You try talking to Worf, Geordi. I'm telling you, he is not normal for Worf.
There is, of course, a genetic predisposition toward hostility among all Klingons, but Worf has been unusually out of sorts.
Come on, he's never been much on charm.
Well, whatever is troubling him, I think we should try to help. He is our friend.
I for one want to keep him friendly.
Suggestions?
Empirical study. Monitor the subject.
Right. Watch the subject for any signs of unusual behaviour.
That won't be difficult.
Within the norm of Klingon patterns, of course. Discretion will be required.
Agreed. When do we start?
We will assist you as needed. You found the problem.
And you must solve it.
Thank you. And after working out the Fuurinkazan battle strategies at the Tokyo Base, I was asked to come here to work for Starfleet as a tactical advisor.
I'm surprised you stayed our of the action as long as you did. Will, please join us. Your father and I are just catching up.
You never told me you knew him.
Well, it wasn't exactly a secret. It just never really came up.
Sit down, son.
I'm ready for that briefing whenever you are.
Good to see you too, Graham.
You wouldn't be running for mayor, would you?
Do pick up work for the Federation long enough and it'll happen to you, too. I thought about you a lot.
Kyle, I don't need to hear what you don't need to say.
We could've been great together.
Possibly.
Is it true you got married?
Again and again.
That make you three for three, doesn't it?
I'm not complaining. Each was good a man and we're all still good friends.
Like us?
Close, but different. They were all a little more in touch with themselves.
Ouch.
Face facts, Kyle. You're crusty. You have a reputation for being hard as nails and getting the job done. Underneath it all, you're not so bad. Some of us even love you. And then there's Will.
Then there's Will.
Wesley should really be doing this on his own.
But he needs his study time.
I can't believe you fell for that. I don't know, Data. He looks perfectly normal to me.
In solitude, there is nothing to trigger unusual behaviour.
Good point. Let's not tamper with the status quo.
But that would defeat the opportunity for our behavioural research. In all probability, he is simply lonely. We can relieve his anxiety through socialisation.
Be my guest.
Excuse me, Lieutenant. You seem to have lost the will to communicate with others. You have friends here. We, we care about you. Why, just recently, Geordi, Wesley and I were saying
With all due respect, be gone! Sir.
He seems quite sincere in his desire for solitude.
Seeing is believing, huh?
Come in. Worf?
May I have a moment, sir?
Of course. What is it?
It is very difficult to say. Words are not always easy for me. Is that Earth?
Yes. Alaska. I was nine years old.
That is a fish you are holding.
And I didn't even catch it.
But it looks like you were
I hooked it. My father took the rod away. He wouldn't let me reel it in. He was afraid that I might lose it.
You do not have good feelings for your father?
No, I. I'm not sure what I'm feeling. What's on your mind?
You plan to leave the Enterprise.
I've been offered my own command.
I would like to join you.
I haven't accepted the assignment yet
But sir, it could be a dangerous mission. There may be the potential for combat.
That is not the purpose of the mission.
Still, to die a true hero
Worf, you've made your point.
Then I know you will do the right thing.
Finally. We're alone. Maybe now we can talk.
I'm here for the briefing, sir.
All you need to know is here.
These mission details could have been transmitted.
I've been hearing some good things about you.
Then why haven't I heard from you?
I know. Keeping in touch is not my strong suit. It's a funny thing about being a parent. There aren't any tech manuals. No quick readouts to get you to the next set of variables. You just got to wing it from day to day. Will, when your mother died
Excuse me. I've got to study this mission briefing.
Will. I came to the Enterprise because. Look, considering where you might be going, I wanted to. I'm here with my hand out, son.
Poor guy. Picked up a flu virus on our last stop at Nasreldine.
Sounds nasty. What's the therapy?
Tryptophan-lysine distillates with generous doses of PCS.
PCS?
Pulaski's chicken soup.
You haven't lost your touch, haven't you?
I like to help. When they hurt, I hurt.
Commander Pulaski's greatest medical skill is her empathy. You must be Commander Riker's father.
Yes, but how?
We've all heard about you, and I felt certain things.
This is Deanna Troi, ship's Counsellor.
Kyle Riker.
I thought you two should meet. Deanna's job is to keep us from deluding ourselves.
Let me guess. Betazoid?
At your service.
I have some lab work to do. If you'll excuse me.
Why do I get the feeling that this is a set-up?
Because you are intelligent, wise and quite correct.
Well, I've never been set up better, that's for sure
You're also very anxious about something. It's Will, isn't it? You're not as close to him as you'd like to be.
Oh, I don't know. We both have pretty good taste in women, wouldn't you say?
I'd like to help you if I can. If you'll let me.
Fine. What is it you want from me? I came here to bury the hatchet with my son only to find out the ground was frozen solid.
You don't seem to be the kind of man to give up so easily.
I didn't say I was giving up. It would just be nice to get a little something from him.
What is it you want from him?
I don't know. Acknowledgement, maybe or
Respect is earned, not bestowed.
Respect? I don't need that from him.
Perhaps you want him to be proud of you. You carry great pride in his accomplishments.
Absolutely. Look at him. First Officer of the Enterprise, just been offered his first command.
Yet you covet his success.
Please. He'd be lucky to have the career I've had.
True, you're well respected in your field.
I may have something of a reputation for excellence
And false humility.
My guess is that Will finds you pretty fascinating. Candour seems to be a trait he admires.
Honesty is the trait he admires most. And you should honestly consider why you're so competitive with your own son.
Competitive? Maybe in the past. But I've come here to help Will prepare for his first task as captain.
Are you sure he'll accept such a dangerous assignment?
He'll accept it just because it is dangerous.
How can you be so sure?
Because I would. And we aren't so different, Will and I.
You've seen your mission briefing?
Yes, I have.
Any questions?
No, other than a question about the Ares's First Officer.
Oh, yes. His name is Flaherty.
Yes. The briefing mentions something about an uncanny linguistic skill.
That is an understatement, Number One. The last time I saw Commander Flaherty, he spoke forty languages. As I recall, among the more exotic were Romulan, Klingon, Giamon, Stroyerian.
He speaks forty languages?
He has this unique ability of instantaneously interpreting and extrapolating any verbal communication that he hears. You will find him very useful in Sector Vega-Omicron.
Yes, I'm sure I will.
Come in.
Oh, Captain Picard, at last. I'd like to thank you for all the help you've been to my son.
My only regret is that your reunion marks Will's farewell.
But he's ready for this command.
Oh, yes, I have no doubt.
Captain, may I have a word with my son?
Yes, of course. Excuse me, gentlemen.
I won't be pushed into this decision.
Oh, come on, Will. Don't you think you're ready for the Ares?
Starfleet does.
Of course. Because you're the best candidate for the job. I only want you to know I'm here if you need me.
I've been on my own since I was fifteen. I can take care of myself.
Please, spare me the pain of your childhood. I hung in for thirteen years. If that wasn't enough, it's just too bad.
Data, what if I missed something?
The ship's computer would have corrected immediately.
Maybe my inputs were incorrect.
Data! Geordi! I figured out Worf's problem.
You spoke to him?
No, no. I accessed the complete Klingon cultural database. It took me some time
Okay, Wesley, slow down. What is the problem?
It's the tenth anniversary of Worf's Age of Ascension.
His what?
The Klingon Age of Ascension. It's a ritual of great significance. A rite of initiation marking a new level of Klingon spiritual attainment.
And what is the significance of the anniversary of this event?
It's a day of celebration and ritual spent with one's fellow Klingons. Worf doesn't have any Klingon friends.
We're his friends.
Right, but we don't practice Klingon tradition, And we're not Klingons. Worf is feeling culturally and socially isolated.
So, what do you suggest we do? I'm not sure I'd like to invite a bunch of Klingons on board.
We can programme the ship's computer to supply simulations on the Holodeck.
Holographic Klingons. Sure. Why not?
We need only to programme the computer with details of the specific ceremony.
The cultural database said the Klingon's family must attend.
So? We're his family. We'll go. I just wonder what kind of party the Klingons had in mind.
Have you got a minute?
Sure.
I wanted to apologize for my remark in Ten Forward. Your personal is none of my business.
Even if it involves your father?
Even if it involves my father.
Did he ever tell you why he never remarried?
What woman would have him with an ego like that?
I would have, in a cold minute. Twelve years ago, Kyle Riker was a civilian strategist advising Starfleet in its conflict with the Tholians. The starbase that he was operating from was attacked. None of the base crew was expected to live, and they all died. All except your father. Your father alone had the will to endure, to face the pain, to live.
I never knew any of that about him.
I've never saw a man fight so hard in all my life.
And you fell in love?
Yes. And so did he. But marriage was out of the question. He had other priorities.
His career.
You know, if I were you, going out on the Ares, I'd jettison the emotional baggage you're still carrying around.
Now the Klingon cultural database was very specific on the setting.
Now let me guess. Twenty piece orchestra, magnificent ballroom, everybody in formal wear.
No, there is some unusual test of inner strength involved
That would entail the use of Klingon painstiks.
Painstiks? Sounds lovely.
Enduring physical suffering is considered a Klingon spiritual test.
You mean in order for Worf to celebrate the anniversary of his Ascension, he has to be hurt? And we have to witness this?
We are his family.
Come.
Number One?
I'd be a fool to turn that promotion down, wouldn't I?
I don't know, and if you're asking me what I think you should do, I don't know that either. I can spell out for you, albeit crudely, what you are choosing between. As the First Officer of the Enterprise you have a position of distinction, prestige, even glamour of a sort. You are the second in command of Starfleet's flagship, but still second in command. Your promotion will transfer you to a relatively insignificant ship in an obscure corner of the galaxy> But it will be your ship, and being who you are, it will soon be vibrant with your authority, your style, your vision. You know, there really is no substitute for holding the reins.
I'll need a little more time to make this decision.
O'BRIEN:Find anything yet?
Not yet.
There is nothing to find.
O'BRIEN:No harm in checking, I guess.
Really? How would you like them to give the transporter operation a little once-over?
O'BRIEN:No problem. We're totally ship-shape.
You're missing the point. It's just the idea that they even suspect a malfunction.
If I were not a consummate professional, and an android, I would find this entire procedure insulting.
Thanks, Data.
Chief, will you be able to attend a little party for Lieutenant Worf at seventeen hundred hours?
O'BRIEN:A party for Worf? Sounds intriguing. I'd be delighted.
It's a surprise.
O'BRIEN:My lips are sealed.
I didn't want to leave without saying good-bye.
I don't like good-byes. How about, until next time?
How about until next time.
It's been a pleasure serving with you, Commander.
The feeling is mutual, Counsellor.
I'm supposed to know how everyone feels but, I can't read you right now.
Perhaps your own feelings are getting in the way.
My job is to help others sort out their emotions. My own feelings are beside the point.
Not to me. Our feelings are what make us all human.
Are you feeling sad?
Yes, I am.
So am I.
I'm leaving at twenty one hundred hours. Can I have a minute?
I've practised my best Academy courtesy, now it's time for you to go.
It's time for us to have a talk, so lower your shields.
I'm asking you to leave, or I'll
You'll what? You know, it's a shame there's no anbo-jyutsu ring nearby.
Really? There is. Deck Twelve. The gymnasium.
We can clear the air once and for all.
You're on.
Scuttlebutt says you wanted to see me.
That's right. I thought I knew you, Kyle.
You do, as well as anyone.
Then what is this I hear about an anbo-jyutsu match with Will?
You've heard.
Haven't we grown beyond the point where we resolve our problems with physical conflict?
I think you're overreacting.
I'm overreacting? You're the one who's going out to fight with his own son.
Don't think of it as a fight, Kate. Think of it as more of a contest.
And suppose one of you is injured?
I know where to find a good doctor. Kate
Kyle.
Will and I have been playing anbo-jyutsu ever since he was eight old, and he knows how to handle himself. And so do I.
Don't take this personally, but Will is in his prime.
And I'm no spring chicken, I know. Don't worry. He's never been able to beat me.
Computer, is this it?
Correct. Klingon Rite of Ascension Chamber.
Is this really necessary?
If we want to get Worf through his problem, it is.
Computer, please give us Klingon personnel appropriate to this event.
These images are specifically programmed for Ascension rites.
Cute bunch.
And they use those?
O'BRIEN:Those are Klingon painstiks. I once saw one of them used against a two-ton Rectyne Monopod. Poor creature jumped five metres at the slightest touch. It finally died from excessive cephalic pressures.
You mean?
O'BRIEN:That's right. The animal's head exploded like
I think that's enough, Chief O'Brien.
I do not enjoy riddles, Counsellor.
You will enjoy this one.
I am in no mood for trifling or games, not today.
I know what an important day this is for you, the anniversary of your Rite of Ascension.
You know about that?
All your friends on board do.
That is impossible. It is a secret known only to Klingons.
And certain resourceful young Ensigns.
Wesley Crusher. What does he know about it?
Just bear with me.
Where are we going?
The holodeck.
This is truly trying my patience, Counsellor.
I think you will approve.
You're not coming in?
No.
Open.
An Ascension ceremony.
Happy anniversary, Worf.
Shall we begin?
I am ready.
DaHjaj SuvwI''e' jIH. tIgwIj Sa'angNIS. 'Iw bIQtIqDaq jIjaH. Today I am a Warrior. I must show you my heart. I travel the river of blood.
The true test of Klingon strength is to admit one's most profound feelings while under extreme duress.
jIbechrup may' vIlos.
The battle is mine. I crave only the blood of the enemy. HIHIvqa'.
The bile of the vanquished flows over my hands. May'pequ' moH.
Thank you.
Is Lieutenant Worf all right?
He's never been happier.
So it was a good ceremony?
Let's just say that I was not about to stay for refreshments.
Klingon culture is not in your taste?
I'm just glad that humans have progressed beyond the need for barbaric display.
Have they? Commander Riker and his father are in the gymnasium, about to engage in barbarism of their own.
Don't remind me. It's something of which I do not approve.
In spite of human evolution, there are still some traits that are endemic to gender.
You think that they're going to knock each other's brains out because they're men?
Human males are unique. Fathers continue to regard their sons as children, even into adulthood. And sons continue to chafe against what they perceive as their fathers' expectations of them.
It's almost as if they never really grow up at all, isn't it?
Perhaps that's part of their charm, and why we find them so attractive.
Particularly men like Commander Riker.
And his father.
I hope they don't hurt each other.
Anbo-jyutsu. The ultimate evolution if the martial arts.
I remember my early lessons.
You could never get used to the sightless factor, or to losing.
True, but I've had fifteen years to practise.
Well, let's see if you've learned anything.
Onegaishimasu.
Well, you've been practising.
And remembering. You should have been the one to die, not her. Yoroshiku-onegaishimasu.
Good. Get it all out. Yoroshiku-onegaishimasu.
Matta!  I had you.
Listen, Will. You were too young to understand and I was too hurt to explain.
You were never too hurt for anything.
She was your mother, but she was my wife. And when she died all that kept me going was you.
You had a strange way of showing it.
I came here thinking we could talk this out, but maybe you're right. Maybe I am no father, and you're no son. And this this fight is all we have left.
Wait!
What is it now?
You can't do that.
What?
Hachidan kiritsu! It's illegal.
You're kidding?
All those years. That's why I never won. You were cheating.
It worked, didn't it? Kept you coming back for more.
Incredible. You cheated me. How'd you get away with it?
You were just a kid. By the time you were twelve years old, I knew I couldn't take you but I had to keep you interested, I had to keep you challenged, didn't I?
I always hated you for that.
Damn it, Will. You were barely out of diapers when she died. You hardly knew her! I'd loved her. Of course you carried the pain. So did I. I should have explained this to you a long time ago, but it hurt too much. Then the wall grew up between us. And living there, you and me, the wall got bigger. You know, it's funny. I can talk to a whole roomful of admirals about anything in the galaxy, but I can't talk to you about how I feel.
How do you feel?
How do you think? I love you, son. I've got to get back to the Starbase.
I know. I'm glad you came.
Be careful now, okay?
Starbase Montgomery's briefing specialist and analytical team have beamed down, sir.
Ah. What were the analytical team's findings?
They suggested we reprogram the system to correct the read-out variables.
Precisely what Data recommended, as I recall. At least it gave Commander Riker the opportunity to consider his promotion. Now that he's accepted, we can leave him at Starbase Montgomery.
Number One.
Captain. With your permission, I've decided to stay on board the Enterprise.
Granted.
Thank you, sir. Take us out of orbit, Ensign Crusher.
Breaking synchronous orbit, sir.
Set course for Beta Kupsic. That is still our destination? Velocity, warp factor five.
Course and speed set, sir.
Any particular reason for this change of heart?
Motivated self-interest. Right now, the best place for me to be is here.
Engage.
I remember studying his career in school. The treaty of Alpha Cygnus Nine, the Coridan admission to the Federation, the Klingon Alliance.
I met him once, many years ago, very briefly at his son's wedding. I can tell you that was quite a moment for a young lieutenant, standing in the presence of such history. I remember he spoke to me and I just stood there grinning like an idiot.
You? Tongue-tied?
Indeed. How do you make small talk with someone who shaped the Federation?
Is it true that he'll be retiring after this mission?
Unofficially, that's what I hear. What a crowning achievement for his career. The benefits of relations with the Legarans are incalculable.
Ah Captain Picard. I am Ki Mendrossen, the ambassador's chief of staff. This is Sakkath, his personal assistant.
Has the ambassador been delayed?
He will be joining us momentarily. But first we must discuss some matters of the utmost delicacy.
Please go ahead.
To be frank, Captain, the ambassador is not a young man. He tires easily.
He's going to need a lot of rest to prepare himself for the difficult job that awaits him.
Which is why it is imperative that he be allowed to conserve his strength. I must request that you dispense with any formal activities normally associated with a visitor of his rank.
We had planned a ship's concert this evening.
I believe the Ambassador is extremely fond of Mozart.
I'm afraid it would be impossible for him to attend. Upon his arrival he will be taken directly to his quarters where he will remain in seclusion until we reach Legara Four.
You have my assurance that the Ambassador will not be disturbed during the voyage.
That's all we ask. Well, now that's settled, the Ambassador is waiting.
Welcome aboard the Enterprise, Ambassador Sarek.
We come to serve.
Your service honours us.
Allow me to present she who is my wife.
Mrs. Sarek.
Please call me Perrin, Captain.
This is my first officer, Commander William Riker.
Captain, would you be so kind as to show us to our quarters?
I prefer to view the conference room first.
Ambassador, I'm sure Sakkath and I can handle all the necessary details.
I will examine it for myself.
Perhaps it would be best if we settled in first.
They worry about my health, Captain. Too much. You will take me to the conference room, please.
If you'll follow me, sir.
Are the Legarans really going to sit in this stuff?
Well, I'm sure not.
Can you believe this smell?
What smell? What can I say? To us it's a slime pit, but to them it's home.
Okay, the environmental controls are ready. What's next?
What, are you in some kind of hurry or something?
Yeah, I have a date.
A date? With who?
Ensign Dumont.
Really? She's very attractive. I've got to admit, Wes, I'm a bit surprised.
What, that she'd go out with me?
No, that you'd actually have the nerve to ask her. Way to go.
The room is not ready.
No Ambassador. Commander La Forge and Ensign Crusher are
The Legarans are very sensitive in matters of protocol. You will remove all the furniture from the room. The walls must be bare.
I'm sure everything will be set up according to our specifications before the Legarans arrive. Isn't that right, Captain?
I assure you, Ambassador, everything will be ready before the conference begins.
My husband and I have every confidence in you, Captain.
I have worked for ninety three years in preparation for this meeting. It is vital that no detail be overlooked.
Perhaps we should allow these gentlemen to return to their work, Ambassador.
That will be acceptable. These walls are too bright.
The way Mendrossen described him, I expected to see a frail old man.
I hope I'm that frail when I'm two hundred and two years old. But his aides did seem to be a little overprotective, didn't they?
From what I could see, the Ambassador doesn't need to be protected from anything.
Well, we'll respect Mister Mendrossen's request and allow Ambassador Sarek his privacy. I suppose they were foolish and vain, my expectations of this voyage. Sharing his thoughts, memories, his unique understanding of the history he's made.
Does this mean you're going to cancel the concert this evening?
No, the concert will ahead as scheduled. But it's a pity that the guest of honour will be absent.
For all we know, the Ambassador might enjoy an evening's entertainment
Why not ask his wife if she'd like to attend?
That's an excellent idea, Counsellor. You have the Bridge, Number One.
Come in.
I hope I'm not intruding.
Not at all, Captain, but Sarek is in meditation at the moment.
Actually, I came to see you.
Well, how nice. I so rarely get visitors of my own. Usually everyone wants to see the Ambassador.
I find that hard to believe. Thank you.
These quarters are quite comfortable. The Ambassador and I were very pleased when we heard that the negotiations were going to take place aboard the flagship of the Federation.
The honour is ours.
My husband has taken an interest in your career. He finds it to be satisfactory.
My word! High praise from a Vulcan.
Some people who expect an emotional response often find Vulcans quite cold when they are merely being
Logical.
Exactly.
I came to invite you, and your husband if he is available, to a Mozart recital this evening.
What a tempting offer. I doubt that the Ambassador will be able to attend, but I will make it a point to ask him.
Well, then I hope to see you tonight.
As do I.
You are still unable to meditate?
It is of no importance.
It has eluded you for many weeks.
I said it is of no importance.
You know I am right.
My wife, you will leave me now. I require solitude.
The temperature in the tank is now one hundred fifty degrees Celsius.
Okay, lock it off.
Is that it? Can I get out of here now?
What's your hurry? You don't really think something's going to happen with Suzanne Dumont, do you?
At least I'm not spending the night with a good book like some people.
What's that supposed to mean?
Just what it sounds like.
Let me tell you something. You'd get more action out of a good book than you'll ever see on this date, I'll guarantee it. She's not going to waste her time on someone like you.
Someone like me?
She's way out of your league.
Since when did you become an expert on women?
Compared to you, every male on this ship is an expert on women.
Well at least I don't have to find my women on the holodeck!
What did you say?
You heard me!
Yeah, I heard you. Just what do you think is going to stop
Something wrong? I asked a question.
No, sir. Nothing wrong here.
May I be excused, Commander?
Anything you'd like to talk about, Geordi?
No, sir.
I noticed that Lieutenant Worf put Ensign D'Amato on report for insubordination.
D'Amato's been an exemplary officer.
Indeed he has. Would you look into it, Number One.
Of course.
Good evening.
Good evening.
I assume the work is progressing on the conference room?
Yes, I checked in with Wesley and Geordi a few hours ago. There was a moment when I actually thought that the two of them were going to hit one each other.
Ambassador Sarek, Perrin, on behalf of the entire crew, welcome.
It was my wife's suggestion that we attend. It seemed an ideal diversion. Perrin can be quite logical, when she so chooses.
It seems that the Ambassador had more free time than I anticipated.
Commander Data will be our featured soloist this evening.
I have been programmed to reproduce the individual musical styles of over three hundred concert violinists, including Heifetz, Menuhin, Grak-tay and Tataglia. Do you have a preference?
Tataglia would be lovely.
I hope you find the performance pleasing.
I look forward to it.
At your convenience, Mister Data. Please.
Hi Mom. I got a message you wanted to see me?
I thought you were going to be at the concert last night.
I said I may be going. Suzanne wanted to go to the arboretum.
Captain Picard asked me where you were. I don't like making excuses for you.
Excuses? Come on, Mom. It wasn't an official function.
Listen, young man. You have responsibilities and I want you to live up to them.
Don't you think you're overreacting a little?
Don't talk back to me!
Okay, I won't.
Where do you think you're going?
Away from you.
And then I just slapped him. Really hard. I slapped Wesley.
Do you know why you did it?
I've never hit my son in his life.
Beverly, this is important. What were you thinking when you hit Wes?
I wasn't thinking about anything. I was just angry.
And Wesley didn't provoke you in any way? It wasn't anything he said, or anything he did?
No, that's just it. It was a sudden burst of anger. I still can't believe I did it.
I don't know why you did it either, but I can tell you that I've heard the same kind of story from ten different people over the last two days.
This is your command centre.
Yes. It is normally occupied by Captain Picard, Commander Riker, and Counsellor Troi.
Counsellor Troi is a Betazoid?
Half-Betazoid. Her father was human.
Then she is not a true telepath?
Her skills are empathic in nature. She is able to sense the emotions of other beings.
What is Captain Picard's background in diplomacy?
Extensive. The Captain's first diplomatic contact dates back to
And what of his knowledge of the Legarans? Would he be able to conduct negotiations with them should the need arise?
Do you foresee such a circumstance occurring? Is Ambassador Sarek unable to
Forgive me. I was merely exploring various possible permutations of our mission. Your tour of the Bridge has been most informative.
O'BRIEN:Excuse me, we were sitting here.
Well we're sitting here now.
O'BRIEN:Come on, fella. This is our table.
Really? Funny, I don't see your name on it.
O'BRIEN:Didn't your mother teach you manners?
Hey, hey guys. Is there some kind of problem here?
O'BRIEN:There seems to be a question of who's table this is.
There are plenty of other tables, right?
O'BRIEN:I suppose you're right.
Why don't I get everyone another round of drinks? All right?
I don't need to tell you that insubordination is a serious charge to level against any officer.
I am aware of that, Commander. However, Ensign D'Amato directly challenged my authority.
Is it my imagination, or have tempers become a little frayed on this ship lately?
I hadn't noticed.
I see what you mean.
Security team to Ten Forward.
Geordi, what the hell is going on here?
I wish I knew.
All right, that's enough!
The next thing I know somebody's left hook is on its way to my chin.
Captain, this is not an isolated incident. There have been reports of random violence all over the ship.
Are you suggesting this is somehow contagious?
There's no indication of any bacteria or virus. I've run every test I know. I've checked the water, food replicators, airborne samples.
This is a hell of a time. Whatever it is, I don't want it to affect the Ambassador. I want his quarters isolated from the rest of the crew until we've identified the cause.
It's not that simple, Captain.
We have determined that the outbreak of violence started at virtually the same time Sarek and his party beamed onto the ship.
We do have a working theory. We believe that it's possible Ambassador Sarek himself is responsible for these incidents.
Sarek?
I felt something during the concert. Vague and undefined, but very disturbing
He cried. I saw that. I couldn't believe it. A Vulcan moved to tears by music? It's
Well, Vulcans have the same basic emotions we do. They've just learned to repress them. What I sensed during the concert was that he'd lost control.
What would cause such a loss of control?
There's a very rare condition that sometimes affects Vulcans over the age of two hundred. Bendii Syndrome. Its early symptoms include sudden bursts of emotion, mostly irrational anger. Eventually, all emotional control is lost.
I can imagine nothing that would be more offensive to a Vulcan. Their emotional detachment is the very core of their being. How would this affect others on board the ship?
Vulcans possess telepathic ability. Sarek may unintentionally be projecting intense emotions onto other people, at random.
And when the Legarans beam on board?
They could very well be affected too.
Is there a treatment?
Can't someone else take his place?
Sarek has built a personal relationship with them. They will accept no one else. How can we confirm your diagnosis?
We can grow a culture from the tissue of the metathalamus, but the results will take several days.
I have twelve hours.
That's impossible, Captain Picard. I cannot delay the conference. Not for a day, not for an hour. The schedule itself required three months of negotiations.
Nevertheless, we appear to be facing
I give you my word of honour that the Ambassador is in perfect health. Is that enough?
Mister Mendrossen
You are dealing with a theory full of holes, Captain. Why am I not affected by Sarek's supposed condition? And Perrin. How could his wife function normally if this theory of yours is correct?
I cannot explain that. Hundreds of others on board have not been affected either. I have not. It appears to be random. Proximity, apparently, has no bearing on the phenomenon.
You are accusing the greatest man of his time of losing his mind on the eve of his greatest triumph, and you cannot explain why. I won't report this to the Ambassador, for the moment. I don't want to divert his attention from the mission. But if I were you, in the interests of your career, I'd be very concerned about finding the real cause of these outbursts before the Legarans arrive.
Mister Data, will you please report to my Ready room.
Aye, sir.
Captain Picard is not satisfied with Ki Mendrossen's assurances that the Ambassador is in good health. Do you consider Sarek capable of carrying out his mission?
Have I given you cause to think otherwise?
You have voiced certain reservations to me about his abilities.
I do not recall making such a statement.
Not directly, no. But you did question me about the diplomatic capabilities of both Captain Picard and Counsellor Troi.
I am honour-bound to help Sarek carry out this mission. That is the only answer I can give.
Then you must decide which is your greater obligation. Your loyalty to Sarek or your duty to the Federation. Can you accept the logic of continuing this mission?
Tell your Captain the mission is in jeopardy.
Sakkath has been able, until recently, to use his telepathic skills to reinforce Sarek's emotional control, thus protecting others from the effects of his deterioration.
He hasn't been doing a very good job.
The strain of this mission on Sarek has made it impossible.
It's ironic, isn't it? All this magnificent technology and we find ourselves still susceptible to the ravages of old age. The loss of dignity, the slow betrayal of our bodies by forces we cannot master. Do you still want to be one of us, Data?
Sir, it is conceivable, even for me, that time will eventually lead to irreparable circuit failure. But there is one thing I do not understand. Sarek is a logical, intelligent being. The effects of Bendii Syndrome are apparent. Why would such a man choose to ignore them?
Logic fails us sometimes, Data. I think this is one of those times. I can only guess that he does not see, or he does not wish to see, the truth. And he is being insulated against that truth by those who love him most.
Someone has to confront him.
Not a task that I'm looking forward to.
I don't understand this. Everyone is protecting Sarek. His wife, Mendrossen, even you.
What would you have me do? March down there and destroy the man?
The mission with the Legarans cannot be carried out with Sarek in this condition!
I know that!
Then tell him that there is no way
Don't you tell me what to do!
Captain. Commander.
Of course. You're right, Number One. It's a task that I will attend to.
Captain, I don't think I understand what you're telling me. My husband is responsible for your crew assaulting one another?
He is very ill, Perrin.
Bendii Syndrome is more a folk tale than a disease. There hasn't been a true case of it in my husband's lifetime.
There's one now. Sakkath knows.
Sakkath? Sakkath knows nothing my husband didn't teach him.
He knows. And more than that. On this mission he has been consciously holding Sarek's mind together as well as he could.
That is not true!
I must see Sarek.
Captain, I know a good deal about the Vulcan mind and I know a good deal about the heart of one particular Vulcan. I am his wife, and he is fine. He does not have Bendii Syndrome, and that shall be the end of it.
I'm sorry.
Please, you must not do this to him.
Must not do what, my wife? If Captain Picard wishes to see me, he may do so. I regret that we have seen so little of each other during this voyage, Captain.
The loss is mine, Ambassador.
Captain, may I talk with you in private?
You were speaking of your belief that I suffer from Bendii Syndrome. I have been accused of many things in my life, never an excess of emotion.
Sarek, I see no reason to continue this discussion.
On the contrary, I wish to assuage any fears the Captain may have regarding my capabilities. I believe there is a test for Bendii Syndrome. I will take it immediately.
Unfortunately the results would not be available for several days, which is why I must ask for a postponement of the conference.
That would be a mistake. Captain, I give you my word. I am in perfect health.
Then why must Sakkath help to contain your emotions?
Is what the captain says true?
No, Ambassador, absolutely not.
Perrin, were you aware of this? Sakkath, I await an answer.
I have been using my limited abilities to strengthen your mental discipline.
Your efforts will no longer be required!
That would not be wise.
It may not be wise but it is necessary.
Leave me. I wish to speak with Captain Picard.
Sarek, I ask you to reconsider.
Obey my wishes. There is nothing to fear.
I hope I've not embarrassed you, Ambassador.
You seem to forget, Captain, that I am a Vulcan. I am not affected by emotional considerations.
I think you are affected, sir, far more than you realise.
I am a logical being. Present your arguments. I will listen.
There is an epidemic of violent incidents aboard the Enterprise. As we speak, the situation is worsening.
And it is your hypothesis that I am the cause of these incidents?
Yes. My Chief Medical Officer has explored all other probable causes.
I share your concern for your crew. However, you must agree it is not unusual for a starship to encounter unexplained phenomena.
That is correct.
Therefore, since I can assure you that I am not the cause of your difficulties, the logical course would be to have your doctor to continue her search.
She is. It is also a fact that these incidents began shortly after your arrival.
Is your entire argument to be based on mere coincidence?
Is it also coincidence that your wife and chief of staff are carefully isolating you?
Ah. I believe I see the flaw in your logic. You are reacting to their overprotective attitudes towards me. They are both somewhat emotional concerning my age.
Surely Sakkath cannot be influenced by emotion?
Am I to be blamed for the judgment of a child? Sakkath is young and inexperienced. He erred in his assumption that I needed help!
But you needed his help at the concert. Or is there possibly some other logical explanation for what happened that night?
What happened?
I saw you crying.
I do not cry.
I was there I saw the tears.
You exaggerate, Captain. I recall only one tear.
So you were emotionally affected by the music.
That is not possible!
You still haven't answered my question, Sarek. Is it logical for a Vulcan to cry?
It was late. I was fatigued. Nothing more. The Legarans trust only me. They will not meet with any other member of the Federation. I must be allowed to complete my mission! There are no other logical solutions!
No other logical solutions? But Ambassador, there are always other solutions. You have said so yourself many times.
What I meant was that
Sarek of Vulcan would never be afraid of looking straight at something he did not want to see.
I warn you! Your efforts to discredit me will not succeed!
Sarek of Vulcan never confused what he wanted with the truth.
I will not be spoken to in this manner!
Do I hear anger in your voice?
It would be illogical for a Vulcan to show anger! It would be illogical! Illogical! Illogical! Illogical!
Captain's log, supplemental. In three hours time we are scheduled to meet with the Legaran delegation. However, it is now all too evident that Ambassador Sarek is in no condition to proceed with the conference.
We're entering the Legaran system, sir. Shall I have Mister Worf contact their ambassador?
No. I will present our regrets to the Legarans personally. It is vital that they understand our reasons for cancelling these negotiations.
Captain, I think you did the right thing.
But at what cost, Number One?
Come. Perrin?
I must speak with you, Captain.
I'll be on the Bridge, sir.
How is the Ambassador?
Resting. I've come to ask you to reconsider your position.
You know that is impossible.
Sarek is a good man. He's given the Federation a lifetime of service. I beg you to let him keep the respect he has earned.
He'll never lose that respect.
Mendrossen and I never wanted to deceive you. My husband's condition came on him so gradually it was so easy to delude ourselves and pretend that nothing was wrong. We convinced ourselves that he could complete this one last task and end his career with dignity. Help him, Captain. Help him regain his pride, his honour.
Believe me, it would give me great pleasure, but there is nothing I can do.
The mission can be saved. But he needs your help to do it.
A mind-meld? Between the two of us? Do you realise the dangers involved in what you are proposing, Captain?
Yes, I do, Ambassador. But I also realise the potential benefits.
We would be linked telepathically, sharing our thoughts, becoming in essence one mind.
Which, for a few hours, should provide the emotional control you need. In that time, you can meet with the Legarans and conclude the treaty.
It is a generous offer. But I must warn you that while I would gain your stability, you would experience the fierce onslaught of emotions unleashed by my condition. Vulcan emotions are extremely intense. We have learned to suppress them. No human would be able to control them. They would overwhelm you. The mind-meld can be a terrible intimacy. I cannot allow it.
I'm aware of the risks. But it is the only logical solution.
Your courage honours me, Captain.
I can't say I approve of this, Jean-Luc.
I didn't expect that you would, Beverly.
I don't suppose I could talk you out of it?
I'm afraid not, though I do admit to a certain trepidation. Your company is much appreciated.
Come.
I see that you are ready, Captain.
Doctor Crusher will monitor our responses.
A sensible precaution.
My mind to your mind. Your thoughts to my thoughts.
Commander, the Legarans are ready to beam aboard.
Very well.
Number One, please inform the Legaran delegation that Sarek of Vulcan is on his way to welcome them.
Yes, Ambassador.
I take it the mind-meld was a success?
Yes. All went as planned.
Is Captain Picard all right?
Don't worry, Number One.
And the Ambassador?
I am myself again. It has been a long time.
No! It is wrong. It is wrong! A lifetime of discipline washed away, and in its place bedlam. Bedlam! I am so old. There is nothing left but dry bones and dead friends. Tired, oh so tired.
It will pass, all of it. Just another hour or so. You're doing fine. Just hold on.
No! This weakness disgusts me! I hate it! Where is my logic? I am betrayed by desires. I want to feel. I want to feel everything. But I am a Vulcan. I must feel nothing. Give me back my control.
Jean-Luc!
Perrin. Amanda. I wanted to give you so much more. I wanted to show you such tenderness. But that is not our way. Spock, Amanda, did you know? Perrin, can you know how much I love you? I do love you!
Beverly.
I'm here, Jean-Luc. I'm not going anywhere.
It's quite difficult. The anguish of the man, the despair pouring out of him, all those feelings, the regrets. I can't stop them.
I can't stop them. I can't. I can't.
Don't even try.
First Officer:First Officer's log, Stardate 43920.7. Ambassador Sarek has successfully concluded the negotiations with the Legarans. The USS Merrimac has arrived and will transport the Ambassador and his party back to Vulcan.
I hope your journey aboard the Merrimac will be uneventful.
With the pressures of the conference behind him, I believe I can help maintain his control until we return to Vulcan.
What will happen to him then?
The effects of Bendii Syndrome are irreversible. Medical research is always continuing, of course.
Mister O'Brien, stand by for transport.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Thank you, Captain.
He loves you very much.
I know. I have always known.
I will take my leave of you now, Captain. I do not think we shall meet again.
I hope you are wrong, Ambassador.
We shall always retain the best part of the other inside us.
I believe I have the best part of that bargain, Ambassador. Peace and long life.
Live long and prosper.
Captain's log, stardate 45233.1. Our terraforming mission to Doraf One has been cancelled and the Enterprise recalled to Starbase two thirty four. Fleet Admiral Brackett would not discuss the matter on subspace for reasons she said would soon be clear.
I apologise, Captain, for the mystery, but we must attempt to contain the information I'm about to reveal to you at least as long as possible.
I must admit you've piqued my curiosity, Admiral.
Three weeks ago, one of our most celebrated Ambassadors, an advisor to Federation leaders for generations, disappeared. He left no word of his destination. Two days ago, intelligence reports placed him on Romulus and I assure you it was an unauthorised visit. Computer, initiate linkage between this terminal and starbase computer system alpha two nine.
Linkage complete.
A defection?
If it is, the damage to Federation security would be immeasurable. Taken on Romulus, by long range scanner. Computer, enhance image in section four delta.
Captain's log, stardate 45236.4. As I study the intelligence reports on Ambassador Spock's disappearance, I cannot help but feel a deeper, more personal concern about this mission, for I know this man through his father. It was barely a year ago that I shared a mind meld with the Vulcan, Sarek. Now we must meet again as I attempt to find an explanation for his son's actions.
We'll be coming into orbit of Vulcan in less than an hour, Captain.
We should tell Sarek's wife of our plans.
Already been taken care of. She's transporting over at oh seven hundred.
And Sarek?
She says he's too ill to make the trip.
The man is dying. And it's my honour to tell him that his son may have betrayed the Federation.
How well do you know Spock?
I met him once. What I know of him comes from history books, and of course my mind meld with his father.
That must cover a lot of ground.
Not as much as you'd imagine. Sarek and Spock. Well, sometimes, fathers and sons.
Understood.
Oh, one other thing. Take a look at this. Turned up during an intelligence sweep.
Metal fragments.
What do you make of it?
Possibly disassembled components, identified as Vulcan, recovered from a downed Ferengi vessel?
They were found in crates marked Medical Supplies.
Contraband.
It's been sent to Vulcan for identification. Starfleet have requested that we lend a hand.
Mint tea. It's been years since I've had it. Vulcans have some kind of strange concoction they call mint. You'd never recognise it.
Perrin, do you know why I've come to Vulcan? I must talk to you about Spock.
He didn't even say goodbye to his father before he left.
Is it possible he could have been abducted?
No. He wrapped up all of his affairs carefully. He knew he was going.
Do you have any idea why he might have disappeared like this?
Captain, as far as I'm concerned, he disappeared a long time ago.
Would it be inappropriate to ask what happened between you and Spock?
Not between us. Between Spock and his father. They had argued for years. That was family. But when the debates over the Cardassian war began, he attacked Sarek's position publicly. He showed no loyalty to his father.
I was not aware that Sarek was offended by Spock's opposition.
I was offended. I made sure Spock knew it. I'm very protective of my husband. I do not apologise for it.
Does Sarek have any idea why Spock might have left?
I don't know. If you could see Sarek as I do, wasting in bed, whispering to himself. He wants to see his son. He wants to heal any rift that may still remain. Now, it may be too late.
Perrin, would you allow me to see Sarek?
If it were anyone else I would never permit it, but you are a part of him and he of you.
The Vulcans haven't figure out what these fragments are but they've determined that the metal is a dentarium alloy.
That pretty well indicates that they're Vulcan. And dentarium also means that whatever this was, it was originally designed for use in space. From the look of the damage, it must've been a high speed impact.
Yeah. A Ferengi cargo ship that went down in the Hanolin asteroid belt. The debris was spread over a hundred square kilometres.
Could it be a weapons array?
That was my first thought, but the Vulcans have no record of any stolen weapons or stolen parts, for that matter.
This is going to be like putting together a big jigsaw puzzle when you don't know even know what the picture's supposed to be.
Yep.
He is like this most of the time. His emotions have taken over. Sometimes, I can bring him out of it. Sarek! You will listen!
Go from me!
Picard is here.
No more chaos! No more.
I will leave you alone with him. He will either acknowledge you or he won't.
Sarek! I've come a long way to see you.
I will not answer!
I must speak to you about your son.
I wish no one with me.
About Spock.
Spock?
Yes. He's missing.
Is that you, Picard?
Hello, old friend.
You're here, on Vulcan.
I need your help. I must find Spock.
He's not here.
I know. He's been reported on Romulus.
On Romulus?
Yes.
why?
I had hoped to find that out from you.
On Romulus? You're going there, aren't you? To find him.
Yes. Do you have any idea what might have taken him to Romulus?
No.
Is there anyone on Romulus he might know, or choose to contact?
Pardek?
Who is Pardek?
It could be Pardek.
Who is Pardek?
He is a Romulan Senator. Spock has maintained a relationship with him over the years. I don't know how they met. At the Khitomer Conference, I'd imagine.
Pardek represented Romulus?
Yes, I'm sure he did. In fact, I recall Spock coming to me with optimism about a continuing dialogue with the Romulans. I told him it was illogical to maintain such an expectation. Spock was always so impressionable. This Romulan, Pardek, had no support at home. Of course, in the end I was proven correct. I gave Spock the benefit of experience, of logic. He never listened. Never listened.
It's been suggested that Spock might have defected.
Never! I will accept many things, but never that.
But you believe he might have gone there to see Pardek?
The Romulan Senator? How do you know Pardek?
I've heard of him.
That's what he's done. He's gone to see Pardek.
Do you know what business they might have together?
No. I never knew what Spock was doing. When he was a boy, he would disappear for days into the mountains. I asked him where he had gone, what he had done, he refused to tell me. I insisted that he tell me. He would not. I forbade him to go. He ignored me. I punished him. He endured it, silently. But always he returned to the mountains. One might as well ask the river not to run.  But secretly I admired him, the proud core of him that would not yield.
Sarek, we're a part of each other. I know that he has caused you pain but I also know that you love him.
Tell him, Picard.
Peace and long life.
Live long and and. Live long and. Spock. My son.
And prosper.
Captain's log, stardate 45240.1. To cross the Neutral Zone, I will require a cloaked ship. To that end, I have set a course for the Klingon home world. After all we did for Gowron during the recent war, I am certain he will be happy to return a favour.
Still no response from the Klingons, Mister Worf?
No, sir.
He's ignoring me. What other explanation is there?
Seems after hailing him for three days, he could've found a minute to talk to you.
Sir.
Yes, Lieutenant?
I believe I know why our messages are not being answered. Gowron has been rewriting Klingon history.
Rewriting history?
Yes. He is claiming it was his courage, his genius, which brought an end to the civil war.
I see.
In the new version there is no mention made of the Federation's help in his rise to power.
If Worf's right, then our arrival would be an uncomfortable reminder of the facts.
He can take all the credit he wants, I don't caret. But I do need a ship. Well if Gowron won't talk to me, get someone who will. Somebody on the High Council. K'Tal, perhaps.
Yes, sir.
Captain, I have a visual identification of Senator Pardek of Romulus. This is a Barolian record of a trade negotiation in which Pardek participated four years ago.
That's all?
Yes, sir.
Run it again. Computer, freeze. Call up the intelligence scan of Spock on Romulus. Computer, enhance far left figure and compare. Same man. Pardek. One question answered. What do we know of him?
He has been in public service since he was a young man, a senator for nine decades. He is considered a man of the people. He has sponsored many reforms. Reportedly, Romulan leadership considers him to be somewhat of a radical because he has been an advocate of peace throughout his career.
I can see why Spock would cultivate a relationship with him. Where would we find him other than on the floor of the Romulan Senate?
The district he represents is called the Krocton segment. He maintains a dwelling there.
Thank you, Mister Data.
There is more, sir. I have taken the liberty of expanding the parameters of my search, and have discovered that Pardek has several relatives in the Krocton segment. I believe you will be able to locate him there on the third day of the Romulan week when the Senate is not in session.
Mister Data, your resourcefulness never ceases to amaze me.
Thank you, sir.
Captain, we are being hailed by the Klingon home world.
Gowron or K'Tal?
Neither, sir. It is the junior adjutant to the diplomatic delegation.
Junior adjutant.
Name.
B'iJik, sir.
On screen.
B'IJIK:Greetings, Captain. I regret to inform you that Gowron and the High Council are quite busy and won't be able to speak with you today.
Is Gowron aware that we have been transmitting messages for the past three days?
B'IJIK:Captain, Gowron wishes it were possible to talk with everyone who wants an audience. But he is one man. The demands on his time are formidable. If you would like me to take him a message.
A message? Very well. Tell Gowron, leader of the High Council of the Klingon Empire, that his Arbiter of Succession, Jean-Luc Picard, needs a favour.
B'IJIK:A favour?
I require a cloaked vessel.
B'IJIK:A cloaked vessel. This is no small favour, Captain.
It is for a mission that could have repercussions throughout the quadrant.
B'IJIK:How would it benefit the Klingon Empire? I'm sure Gowron will ask.
The only benefit to the Klingon Empire would be our gratitude.
B'IJIK:That is what you want me to tell him?
Yes. And please add that if he is unable to provide a ship, then I am sure there are others in the Klingon Empire who would be willing to help me. And then, they would have our gratitude.
B'IJIK:I see.
Also, please tell him that I am immensely gratified that he is prospering so well. A tribute to his skilled leadership.
They're not removable, are they, Data?
Removable?
Your ears.
No, Doctor. They are fully integrated components.
We'll have to do some moulds of his ears as well.
What about his skin colour?
We'll have to do some tests on his skin pigmentation. Changing it to appear Romulan shouldn't be too difficult. We just have to make sure we can change it back again afterwards. Your right eye is point zero zero four higher than your left.
Nobody's perfect, Doctor, but
If you want a proper fit to your prosthetic, trust your tailor.
Anything from Gowron?
No, sir. But after your tailor is done, would you join me in the cargo bay? Mister La Forge has made some progress with the metal fragments.
These two still have an appointment with Mister Mott to have their hairpieces designed.
Thirty minutes, Number One.
What we seem to have here is a navigational deflector array. Or at least what's left of one.
Why would anyone want a Vulcan shield array?
Beats me, Commander. Every question we answer here seems to bring up two more.
You're certain this is Vulcan?
Yes, sir. Metallurgical analysis confirmed that and by running a molecular pattern trace, we were actually able to identify the ship as T'Pau. It was decommissioned years ago and sent to the surplus depot at Qualor Two. As far as anybody knows it's still there.
Worf to Captain Picard.
Yes, Lieutenant?
A Klingon vessel is decloaking off our port bow. Compliments of Gowron.
Mister Worf, will you convey my gratitude to the Captain and advise him that Mister Data and I will be transporting over shortly.
Aye, sir.
I'd like to take the Enterprise to Qualor Two, sir. See what's out there.
Agreed. Thank you, Mister La Forge.
K'VADA:I know my duty, Captain. When I am given orders, I follow them, but I do not like secrets. I want to know why we are going on this mission.
I'm sorry. It's a classified matter.
K'VADA:You're going after the defector, aren't you?
Defector?
K'VADA:Do you think information like that stays a secret? Ambassador Spock has gone to Romulus and you are going after him.
Captain, your orders are to take us to a set of co-ordinates near Romulus and to bring us back, and that is all I am prepared to discuss.
K'VADA:If we are discovered by the Romulans it means death for us all.
I realise that.
K'VADA:Hechu' ghoS. Very well, Captain. We have set a course for Romulus.
K'VADA:It may not be what you're used to on a Starfleet ship.
Quite nice. Thank you.
Captain K'Vada, is this the Captain's quarters, or my own?
K'VADA:Both. We have limited space. We are a military ship, not a pleasure craft.
Of course. This will be fine.
K'VADA:You'll sleep Klingon style. We do not soften our bodies by putting down a pad.
Good. I prefer it that way.
K'VADA:You'll take your meals with us but we do not serve Federation food.
I've been looking forward gagh. Haven't had it for quite a while. Very fresh.
MeH HoD.
K'VADA:Jatlh!
MeHmaH ghoS.
K'VADA:So'wl'chu'. Well, Captain, we're at the border of the Neutral Zone. You mean to do this, do you?
Yes. I do.
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 45240.6. The Enterprise is nearing Qualor Two, home of a Federation surplus depot operated by the Zakdorn. We hope to find out how the salvaged deflector array ended up in the hands of the Ferengi.
I have made contact, Commander.
On screen. I'm Commander William Riker from the Federation Starship Enterprise.
Klim Dokachin, Quartermaster, Surplus Depot Zed One Five.
I need some information about a Vulcan ship, the T'Pau. It was sent to you a few years ago.
Did you arrange an appointment?
An appointment? No.
Then I will be unable to help you. You may communicate with scheduling.
Who does he think he is?
The Quartermaster of the supply yard, with information you need.
Right. Mister Worf re-establish communication.
Aye, sir.
Mister Dokaychin?
Dokachin. Klim Dokachin.
Mister Dokachin, the information I need involves a matter of major importance to the Federation. I'll need access to your logs, your files. My people can do the work.
I don't allow outsiders into my computer system..
All right, one of your people can do the work.
I wish I had the people to spare. but I don't.
Well, sir what would you suggest?
I don't know. Contact me when you reach orbit.
I don't believe this.
He's king of his particular hill, Commander. You'll have to treat him that way.
Counsellor, this feels like a perfect job for you.
Thank you for coming on board, Mister Dokachin.
Quite a ship you have.
We've tied into your computers, if you'd like to access the files.
I don't usually see them in such good condition. By the time they get to me, they're always falling apart.
Mister Dokachin, we must find this ship and you're the only one who can help us.
Who are you?
Deanna Troi, Ship's Counsellor.
He probably figures that we don't get to see a lot of handsome women out this way and someone like you might get a little more cooperation from me. He's probably right. What was the name of that ship? The T'Pau?  The T'Pau. Vulcan registry. There. Logged in stardate 41334.
Where's the ship now?
Docked. Section eighteen gamma twelve. Do you want me to take you there?
I'd appreciate it.
Helmsman, lay in a heading one four one by two zero eight. Ahead slow, two hundred kph. I suppose this is your first visit to a junkyard, isn't it? You'd be surprised at some of the things I find on board these ships. I once found a fourteen foot Caldorian eel on board a freighter, in someone's locker.
Are you serious?
If you have time, I'll show it to you. I still have it. Nursed her back to health.
We are approaching the designated coordinates, Commander.
On screen.
What? Where is it? What happened to it? These are the correct coordinates.
The T'Pau is missing?
The T'Pau is missing.
How could a ship disappear from your depot?
I'm not accustomed to losing things, Commander. I will find your ship for you. I have the T'Pau cross-referenced in four different directories.
When it was brought here was it stripped of material, armament, sensors?
Of course.
Can you tell us what happened to its navigational deflector?
It was routed to the Tripoli, a holding vessel on the outer rim of the shipyard.
It's not there any more. What's left of that deflector is laid out on the floor of our cargo bay.
How can that be?
Perhaps we should to pay a visit to the Tripoli.
In all the time that the Zakdorn have operated this depot, nothing has ever been lost. Never.
Approaching the coordinates of the Tripoli, sir.
On screen.
I do not understand this. This is not possible. We beam goods to the Tripoli on a regular schedule. There was a shipment yesterday. Another is set for today. It must be there.
When is today's transport?
Just over two hours from now. A shipment of deuterium storage tanks.
Ensign, align the Enterprise so we appear to be one of the abandoned ships. Mister La Forge, when we're in position, shut down the engines and all systems except sensors and life support.
Aye, sir.
I've a feeling somebody's going to be here to receive those storage tanks. I'd be very interested to know who that is.
These quarters were obviously intended for one crewmember, sir. There is but a single sleeping space.
I'm sure the Klingons found it amusing to put us in here together.
Since I do not require sleep, I propose you take the shelf, sir. I am content to stand.
Very well, Mister Data. Thank you.
Are you comfortable, sir?
I suppose so.
Good night, Captain. Sleep well, sir.
Thank you.
What are you doing?
Sir? Was I making noise, sir?
No, not exactly
I was processing all of the information we have accumulated on Romulan society. I am preparing for the task of impersonating a Romulan.
I see.
Would you like me to discontinue, sir?
No. Please go on.
What are you looking at?
I am not looking at anything, sir. I am continuing to organise my files.
But you're looking at me.
I am sorry if I was disturbing you, sir. I will not look in your direction.
Do you not wish to sleep, sir?
I don't think so, Mister Data. Let's go on with the files.
I would be happy to. I have been studying the Krocton segment, as you asked, and have selected an appropriate site for our transport.
K'VADA:Captain K'Vada to Picard. Please come to the bridge.
K'VADA:Captain. We've monitored a subspace message that might interest you.
Sarek is dead.
Commander, sensors detect a ship approaching at warp speed.
Identification?
Negative. No transponder signal, no subspace marker.
Sounds like they don't want to be identified.
The ship is coming out of warp, sir.
On screen.
Sensors indicate a combat vessel, origin undetermined, heavily armed. Mass and density suggest that it's fully loaded with cargo. I'd say from these internal scans, a good deal of that cargo is weaponry.
The ship is entering sector twelve delta four
He's taking the position assigned to the Tripoli. The coordinates are identical.
Commander, readings indicate surface to ship transport has begun.
Mister La Forge, bring the engines back online and restore all systems to normal.
Aye, sir.
He's powering up engines, turning to starboard.
Open a channel.
Open.
This is Commander William Riker of the USS Enterprise. Identify yourself. I repeat, you have entered a Federation depot. Identify yourself.
Sir, the ship is locking phasers.
Shields up. Red alert.
That ship easily matches our armament, Commander.
It's coming about.
If you do not respond to our hails, we will take that as evidence of hostile action.
There is an energy build up in their phaser banks. Sir, they're activating weapons.
Forward shields down to seventy two percent.
Boost power to the shields.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, lock onto their weapon systems only and prepare to fire.
Forward shields down to sixty eight percent, aft shields forty percent.
On my mark, point seven five burst. We just want to get their attention.
Ready, sir.
Fire.
Their forward shields are damaged, sir.
We destroyed one of their phaser arrays. Looks like collateral damage in the cargo area. Commander, I'm picking up massive power fluctuations, internal explosions. With all the armament that ship is carrying, it's going to blow.
Well, Mister Data? What do you think?
I would not have thought it possible, sir. I am eager to test the success of our efforts. It does remain to be seen if the Romulans will accept us. Captain, you have seemed unusually pensive since we received the news of Ambassador Sarek's death.
Sarek and I share a particular bond. Our lives touched in an unusual way. I admit I feel the effects of his death. The tenor of this mission has changed, Mister Data, at least it has for me. We were sent to confront Spock about his disappearance. Now, I also have to tell him that his father is dead.
I do not entirely understand, sir. As a Vulcan, Ambassador Spock would simply see death as the logical result of his father's illness.
It's never quite that simple, not even for a Vulcan. Certainly not for Spock who is half-human. Years spent in conflict. And now the chance to resolve all of those differences is gone.
Considering the exceptionally long lifespan of Vulcans, it does seem odd that Sarek and Spock did not choose to resolve those differences in the time allowed.
Father and son. Both proud, both stubborn, more alike than either of them were prepared to admit. A lifetime spent building emotional barriers. They're very difficult to break down. And now the time has come, it's too late. It's a difficult moment. It's a lonely one. It's a moment Spock is about to face.
K'VADA:Don't you two look sweet. Be careful, android. Some Romulan beauty might take a liking to you. Lick that paint right off your ears. You. Do you know what the Romulans will do to you if they discover who you are?
I have a good idea. We're ready to transport down to the surface.
K'VADA:Just so we understand each other, my orders don't include rescue missions.
Ah, Senator Pardek. You received my message.
I got here as quickly as I could, Proconsul.
What do you know of this human? Jean-Luc Picard, a Starfleet Captain.
I know nothing of him.
You haven't seen him recently?
To my knowledge, I have never seen him.
I have received intelligence indicating he's on his way here. Perhaps here already.
Here on Romulus?
Yes. Curious, isn't it. I suppose we'd better find out if the report is accurate or merely rumour. Circulate his likeness among the security forces. Remind them that if he is here, he's probably disguised as one of us.
I'll see to it.
This is definitely the street on which the intelligence scan of Spock and Pardek was taken, sir. Adjusting for the optical distortions, I am able to verify the architectural features.
Where were they standing? Data, you're moving about in a very, well, android way.
I am sorry, Captain. I will be more careful.
Don't call me Captain.
I understand, sir. I have found the place where they were standing.
Where?
It is here, at this doorway. A legal intercessor's office. The name is similar to Pardek's. It would appear to be one of his relatives.
He's not open for business yet.
Nonetheless, I recommend we keep this location under observation. I have clearly determined Pardek's routine. On days when the Senate is not in session, he invariably comes to this section after the median hour.
Very well. Let's sample the local cuisine, shall we?
Do you happen to know what time the intercessor's office across the way opens?
Why do you want to know?
I need his services. He was recommended.
I haven't seen you here before.
We are here for the day, from the city of Rateg.
Rateg? I don't think so.
Why do you say that?
You don't sound like you're from Rateg.
It is a misconception that all Rategs speak with a particular inflection. In fact, there are twelve different
We come from several kilometres outside the city.
Or perhaps you come from the security forces to watch the intercessor's office. Is he in trouble?
You're mistaken, madam.
Doesn't matter to me. I don't know when he opens. Eat your soup, courtesy of a loyal establishment. Jolan tru.
I don't think we can stay here too long.
We may not have to. Direct your view to the far corner, sir.
Very good, Senator.
Senator, we seem to be having some problems
Is that not Pardek?
I believe it is.
Perhaps you should appear to enjoy your soup, sir.
I'll take care of that. Come.
ROMULAN 1:Do not move.
What? You've made a mistake.
ROMULAN 1:Quiet. Come with us.
ROMULAN 1:Wait here.
For what? What have you brought us here for?
Welcome to Romulus, Captain Picard. Don't let our soldiers frighten you. We had to get you off the street as quickly as we could. Romulan Security knows that you're here. I am Pardek. You are among friends, Captain.
I have come on an urgent mission from the Federation. I'm looking for Ambassador Spock.
Indeed. You have found him, Captain Picard.
Data, there you are. We need to install that plasma conduit right away. We're bringing the new warp core on line in less than three hours.
I will go to deck twenty and begin modifications.
Great. I'll meet you in Engineering as soon as you're finished there. This ought to be a lot of fun.
Excuse me. Do you have authorisation to work in this area? You are dismantling a warp plasma conduit. I must ask you to stop.
Be quiet!
Captain's log, stardate 47225.7. Commander La Forge has completed the installation of our new warp core. We are preparing to test its capabilities.
Something wrong, sir?
I just got a message from Starfleet command.
Bad news?
You could say that. I've been invited to the annual Starfleet Admiral's banquet.
My condolences.
I've managed to avoid it for the past six years, but now it would seem my luck has run out. I can't think of anything more tedious. Fifty Admirals shaking hands, making dull conversation, uninteresting food, boring speeches.
Can't you think of some excuse to get out of it?
After six years, Number One, I don't think I have any excuses left.
Geordi, have you ever had a nightmare?
Yeah, sure, Data. Everybody does from time to time.
I have had one hundred eleven dreams since I first discovered this programme nine months ago. In all of that time, I have never experienced such strange and disturbing imagery. I believe it was a nightmare.
Nightmares are part of dreaming, Data. Maybe you've just discovered another new level to your programme.
Perhaps. I have also noted that I am spending an inordinate amount of time thinking about nightmare imagery. One could almost say I am preoccupied.
Well, it's perfectly normal, Data. Sometimes when I have a nightmare, I can't shake that weird feeling for a couple of days.
Commander La Forge?
Speaking of nightmares.
I just finished recalibrating the starboard EPS module.
That's great, Ensign. Thank you.
It's just like you said. Reset the power tap and the module came right online. You have such a wonderful grasp of engineering principles. I'm learning so much just by being around you.
I'll tell you what. Why don't you help Farrell check the deuterium cartridges. I'm just about to bring the warp core online. All right?
Anything you say.
Geordi, you do not seem to appreciate Ensign Tyler's enthusiasm.
She's enthusiastic all right. About me.
I do not understand.
She's got a crush on me, Data.
You do not share her affection?
Exactly. And quite frankly, it's beginning to get a little bit uncomfortable.
I believe I understand. You are concerned about unintentionally hurting Ensign Tyler's feelings.
Yeah, something like that.
It would appear that you require a third party to intervene on your behalf. I will be happy to speak to her.
No, Data! I'll take care of it myself. Thanks.
Geordi, when I first awoke from my nightmare, there was a brief moment when I
Bridge to Commander La Forge. What's our status?
We're ready to bring the new core online, Captain. Stand by. All right, let's do it. Initializing deuterium infusion sequence. It's a thing of beauty, isn't it? Now let's see how fast she can run. La Forge to Bridge.
Warp power at your discretion, Captain.
Acknowledged. Ensign Gates, set course for Starbase two nineteen, warp six. Engage.
Engage. Bridge to Engineering. Mister La Forge, why isn't my ship
Moving?
I'm on it, sir. There's a warp plasma conduit out of alignment, but I think I've got it fixed now. Ready, sir.
Very well. Ensign Gates?
Mister La Forge?
Stand by, Captain.
Captain, I am taking the warp-coil engines offline.
La Forge to Bridge. I'm sorry, sir, but we're going to have to reconfigure this plasma conduit. It's going to take at least a couple of hours, sir.
Enter.
Hello, Data.
Counsellor.
What are you doing?
I have been watching Spot sleep. In the past fifteen minutes, he has had twelve muscles spasms, which indicates he was dreaming. I have often wondered what Spot dreams about. His twitching and his rapid breathing would seem to suggest anxiety, but Spot has never seen a mouse or any other form of rodentia. He has never encountered an insect, or been chased by a canine.
I understand you've had some interesting dreams recently. Geordi was worried about you and he wanted me to check in and see how you were doing.
That was very thoughtful of him. I've been debating whether or not to initiate another dream sequence.
Because of the nightmares?
I have found them to be quite unsettling.
Data, you shouldn't be afraid of dark imagery in your dreams. It's a natural expression of your unconscious, if you have an unconscious. I'm not really sure how your positronic brain works but if it's anything like ours, then there's part of you that's trying to express itself through your dream state. And I think you should allow yourself to experience it. As Sigmund Freud said, dreams are the royal road to the knowledge of the mind.
Thank you, Counsellor. I believe I will initiate a dream programme now.
Let me know how it goes. Goodnight, Data.
Goodnight, Counsellor. Goodnight, Spot.
Computer, dim lights.
Mmm. Delicious.
What kind of cake are you eating?
It is cellular peptide cake with mint frosting. Would you like a bite?
No, thank you. Excuse me, Mister Worf.
Aren't you going to answer that, Mister Data?
Sir?
That damn ringing. Answer it, will you?
Yes, sir.
Please identify yourselves. I must know what you are trying to
Be quiet!
Please, don't hurt me, Data.
I am sorry, Counsellor.
No! Don't! No! No! Data!
Data! Data!
What is wrong?
We've been trying to wake you up for the last five minutes.
When you didn't show up on time in Engineering, I got worried.
My internal chronometer was supposed to wake me thirty five minutes ago.
You must have overslept.
That is not possible. Something is wrong.
I can't find anything wrong with your internal time base. As far as I can tell, your primary systems check out fine.
I will compare my autonomic logs with the ship's chronometer. Perhaps we have overlooked something.
You know, Data, there's an awful lot we don't know about your dream programme. Maybe it was designed to cause side effects. I mean, for all we know, Doctor Soong might have intended for you to oversleep from time to time. It's part of the human experience.
It is a possibility. However, I would prefer to make certain there are no anomalies in my neural net.
You know, I'm curious. What were you dreaming about when we woke you up?
I have not fully assimilated its impact. I would prefer to study the images further before discussing them.
Sounds like it must have been pretty strange.
Strange is not a sufficient adjective to describe the experience.
Tell me more about this cake.
It is difficult to explain. Counsellor Troi's body was a cake.
Her upper body. Describe the knife you used to cut the Counsellor.
It had a black handle and a serrated blade, and it was quite long.
How long?
Twenty five centimetres in length.
And what happened next?
One of the workmen pointed to her right shoulder. At that moment, I had an overwhelming urge to cut a piece out of the cake.
And did you?
Yes. As I began slicing the cake, she reacted as though I was causing her pain. Yet I could not stop cutting. That is when I woke up. Doctor Freud, I am curious.
I am curious. What do my nightmares mean?
I believe you are experiencing a classic dismemberment dream. Or in your case, being a mechanical man, a dismantlement dream.
I do not understand.
Your mechanistic qualities are trying to reassert themselves over your human tendencies. Ego and id struggling for domination. The workmen symbolise the ever present id constantly working to destroy the ego. Now the image of Counsellor Troi, a female, is devoured by you, clearly indicating an unconscious desire to possess your own mother.
But I do not have a mother.
Do not interrupt. The knife in its violent connotation suggests a certain feeling of sexual inadequacy.
but I have no sexual desire.
Ach! Impotence on top of everything. It is all becoming clear to me now. There might be a paper in this.
I do not believe I am being helped by this session.
Classic transference. Your anger toward me is, in fact, the animosity you feel toward your father. You are a polymorphously perverse individual, Mister Data, and I recommend full psychoanalysis. I believe I can fit you in next Tuesday.
That will not be necessary. Computer, end programme.
Captain, incoming message from Admiral Nakamura.
On screen.
Admiral.
Captain. We were expecting you this morning. Is there a problem?
Actually, we have been experiencing a few minor difficulties with our new warp core, but my Chief Engineer assures me that we will be under way within the hour.
You're not trying to avoid this particular engagement, are you, Picard?
No, no, certainly not. I'm really looking forward to it.
Good. I'll expect you soon. Nakamura out.
I think he's on to you, sir.
La Forge to Bridge.
Go ahead, Geordi.
We've just started it up, Captain. All systems are holding steady.
Ready when you are, sir.
Ensign Gates, set a course and engage.
Engineering, report.
The warp field has collapsed, sir.
It looks like we've blown the entire power converter, Captain. Impulse engines are down too. We're not going anywhere. But I know just how to fix this. Give me two, three hours, tops.
Now what?
Talk about going nowhere fast.
Mister Worf, open a channel to Starbase two nineteen. Advise Admiral Nakamura I'll be a little later than I thought.
Aye, sir.
Tyler, how're you coming with that relay diagnostic?
Almost done, sir. Excuse me I need the plasma inverter.
It appears Ensign Tyler still has a crush on you. It is clear you did not speak to her.
No, Data, I haven't had the time. Listen, I want you to take this brace coil and run a metallurgical scan on it for me. See if there are any microfractures.
Something wrong, Data?
I am reminded of a recent dream. This brace is reminiscent of
Are you going to answer that, Commander?
What are you waiting for? Answer it.
Hello?
Kill them. You must kill them all before it's too late.
Data. Data, what's wrong?
I do not know.
Everything seems to remind me of the nightmare. Objects, sounds, smells. And now I have seen elements of the dream in a waking state. I cannot explain it.
Data, if you were one of my human patients, I might be concerned right now. I'd say you had a waking dream or an hallucination. But you're not human. I think we might be looking at some kind of technological problem.
I have run three complete self diagnostics. All of my systems are functioning normally. Perhaps Doctor Freud was correct. The knife I dreamed about is the embodiment of my unconscious desire to inflict violence.
Data, even Freud said, sometimes a cigar is just a cigar. But the bottom line is, I think you're developing an almost obsessive interest in your own inner workings. I'd almost call it the beginnings of a neurosis.
That is not possible.
Why not? You've eliminated all the technical explanations. And it makes sense that as your neural net becomes more complex, more human, that you might experience the same kind of psychological complexities as a human.
Do you really think it is possible?
Data, you must be the first person who's come into my office and been excited at the prospect of a new neurosis. But yes, I do think it's possible, and I'd like to start counselling you on a regular basis.
Daily?
No, we'll start weekly. And as a first step, I'd like you to shut down your dream programme until our next session, just to be on the safe side. Give yourself a chance to reflect on this experience.
Thank you, Counsellor. I look forward to our next meeting.
And Data? Next time, see me before you see Sigmund.
Admiral, I can explain.
Let me guess. Your new warp core is malfunctioning again?
Unfortunately, the problem has affected our impulse systems. At the moment, we are adrift.
Are you expecting to have this problem fixed soon, or shall we send out a tow ship to bring you in?
That will not be necessary. I have full confidence in my Engineering staff. I will be at the banquet on time. Picard out.
Have you tried reconfiguring the plasma conduits?
Yes, Captain. Two hours ago.
What about the relays? Are you absolutely certain you don't need a new phase invertor?
I am currently running a level three diagnostic of the relays, sir. We will have the results of the analysis in approximately ten minutes.
I see. Oh, perhaps I could reconfigure these isolinear chips.
No, sir, please don't touch that. Captain, Commander Data and I have the situation under control. Now, if you'd just let us care of it, the work would go much faster.
Captain, we could use an extra hand moving the containment pods. If it wouldn't be an imposition.
Oh, no, not at all. I'd be delighted.
Good work, Tyler. I thought he'd never leave. Data, I want you to give me a hand locking down this plasma conduit. Data? Data?
Deck thirty six.
Hello, Data. Are you all right?
What are you doing?
Hold very still, Counsellor.
No!
Ever since you gave Alexander that music programme, he's been playing it all night, every night.
I just wanted to broaden his horizons. Besides, he likes it.
It is screeching, pounding, dissonance. It is not music.
Worf, it's better than music, it's jazz.
Medical emergency. Deck seventeen, section three alpha.
We're on our way.
I believe I had another waking dream, sir. But this time, I had an uncontrollable urge to eliminate the image I saw.
And what you saw was some sort of a mouth on Troi's shoulder?
Yes, sir. For a reason I cannot explain, I had the need to destroy it.
What about me? Did you see one of those mouths on my head as well?
No, sir. I saw a straw coming out of your head.
A straw?
As I said before, these are all images I originally experienced in my dream programme. I do not have a rational explanation for them.
Mister La Forge?
Captain, we've run every possible diagnostic on Data's positronic net we can think of. We can't find anything wrong. I could run a subpolymer scan, but it would take some time to set up the equipment.
Make it so. In the meantime, Mister Data, I'll have to relieve you of duty and confine you to your quarters.
A sensible precaution, sir.
Data.
Deanna, you're in Sickbay. It's all right.
Data.
He's not here. Just try to relax. This vascular pad has healed the wound, but you've lost a lot of blood so I would like you to lie still for a while.
That's odd. There shouldn't be any discoloration after the treatment. This looks like some sort of rash.
What is it?
I'm picking up cellular degradation. But it doesn't appear to be related to the lacerations. There's also some kind of residual interphasic signature. Nurse, bring me an interphasic scanner. I want to take a closer look at this.
Commander. I will have to confiscate your sidearm.
Of course.  May I ask a personal favour?
Yes.
Will you take care of Spot for me?
Your animal?
I am afraid if I have another waking dream, I might injure him.
Of course. Spot, come here.
Unlike a canine, Spot does not respond to verbal commands.  Goodbye, Spot. He will need to be fed once a day. He prefers feline supplement number twenty five.
I understand.
And he will require water. And you must provide him with a sand box. And you must talk to him. Tell him he is a pretty cat, and a good cat.
I will feed him.
Perhaps that will be enough.
Captain, we have a problem. Take a look at this. Her tissue is breaking down on a cellular level and it's spreading. At first I thought it was a rash from the coil brace she was stabbed with, but when I used the interphasic scanner, I found this.
What is it?
The question is, what are they?
I've tested all the medical staff and I've found them on almost everyone so far. The cellular decay is accelerating in all cases. I haven't found a way to stop it or even slow it down.  Looks like you're infected too. The organisms appear to be attached to our epidermal layers with osmotic tendrils. They're tapping directly into the bloodstream.  And from what I can tell, they're spreading.
What are we dealing with here? Are these creatures feeding on us?
Yes, in a very particular way. They appear to be extracting our cellular peptides. It's roughly analogous to the way terran leeches consume haemoglobin. If they're not removed soon, our bodies are going to lose all their cellular cohesion. We'll collapse into nothing but a few pounds of chemicals.
All right. Is there any way that we can affect these organisms?
We've tried EM radiation, subspace fields, thermal protons, nothing's worked. They seem to exist in some sort of interphasic state, just beyond our range of visual and sensor acuity. The only way we can see them is to use an IP scanner. Tricorders can't even pick them up.
Do we know where these things came from, Mister Worf?
I scanned the vicinity with an IP scanner. There is no sign of any similar creatures, or any unusual interphasic activity.
What about Mister Data? There must be some connection between his odd behaviour and these creatures. Is he infested as well?
No. I scanned him, but I found nothing.
Data attacked Counsellor Troi because he saw a mouth on her shoulder. And in that same area that we first saw one of the organisms.
Data also saw a straw in my head and then Beverly discovered an organism in the same place.
Those images are all part of Data's dream. Maybe somehow he's unconsciously perceiving these creatures.
Then perhaps it is time that we took a closer look at Mister Data's dreams.
It is an interesting hypothesis. If I am being affected by these interphasic creatures on an unconscious level, it may also explain my waking dreams, and my subsequent anti-social behaviour.
What we want to do, Data, is link your neural net into the holodeck and have you activate your dream programme, so as you dream we can observe the dream images.
Perhaps we can learn more about these creatures by interpreting the symbols and images of your dreams.
I see. The concept is similar to the method of directed dreaming.
Exactly. How soon can you have the link ready?
We'd need about an hour to establish all the interface parameters.
Make it so. In the meantime, Mister Data, I suggest that you should prepare for bed.
I think we're ready, Captain. The link is active. The holodeck has been calibrated to Data's neural net.
Ready, Mister Data?
Yes, sir.
Normally, I would wish you pleasant dreams, but in this case, bad dreams would be more helpful.
I understand, sir. Initiating dream programme. Stand by.
Let's be very observant. Even the most insignificant image could be a very important symbol.
Right.
Here he comes.
Hello.
Can we speak to Data directly or would that wake him up?
He should be perceiving us as just another part of his dream. Anything we say to him will be taken in that context.
You know, that sounds like a telephone ringer, but I don't see a receiver.
Cake?
Oh. Er, thank you. Look at that. Her right shoulder. That is the same place that Data stabbed her.
In his waking dream he said that there was a mouth on her shoulder.
They're both symbols of consumption. Mouth, food. Mister Data, what kind of cake is this?
It is cellular peptide cake.
With mint frosting.
Cellular peptides. That's exactly what the creatures are extracting.
Will someone answer that damn ringing! Captain, the ringing is getting worse.
What could the ringing symbolise? A bell? Sound? An old-fashioned way of communicating?
Do you want some? It's delicious.
Will somebody please get that!
Yes? It's for you.
Picard.
Kill them.
Kill who?
Kill them, before it is too late.
Who is this?
I am Doctor Sigmund Freud.
How does he fit into all this?
If I were to interpret my own appearance in this dream, I would say I am the symbolic representation of Data's unconscious mind trying to warn him about the dangers he perceives around him.
You mean the interphasic organisms.
Of course.
Tell me, Doctor, how do we kill them?
Answer it. Nien, nien, nien. Do not be so literal. When I say answer it, I mean respond to it, to them.
Be quiet!
What do they represent?
I don't know, but I do recognise that junction they're working on. It's the plasma conduit we installed with the new warp core.
Respond? Respond to them? What does that mean?
What is it that you're doing?
Go away. Leave us alone.
Who are you?
We are your enemies.
Stop. You must not hurt my friends.
Be quiet!
Data, the shrieking noise you made. It causes them pain.
Be quiet.
I believe I understand.
Geordi.
Yes, Data.
You must adjust my positronic subprocessor to emit an interphasic pulse.
Data, what's going on?
The workmen in my dreams represent the organisms which are trying to demolish the ship. The incessant ringing of the telephone, Freud's cautions at the other end, were warnings of the dangers around us.
What about the shrieking noises that you made?
My positronic subprocessor detected high frequency interphasic signatures from the organisms, which were symbolically represented in my dreams by a high shriek.
When you made those noises, the workmen reacted in pain.
That is why I have asked Geordi to adjust my subprocessor. If I can produce a high frequency interphasic pulse, it may have a similar effect on the creatures.
We're ready.
Picard to Sickbay. Beverly, we're going to be sweeping the ship with a high frequency IP pulse. Will you monitor the creatures for any response?
Understood.
It's working, Captain.
Captain's log, supplemental. The creatures infesting the Enterprise have been completely eliminated. We believe the infestation originated within the warp core we obtained on Starbase eighty four.
This conduit was manufactured on Thanatos Seven using a new interphasic fusion process. We think it was that process which attracted the organisms to the conduit where they lay dormant until we activated the warp core. That's also why we couldn't get the core online. The creatures were disrupting the plasma flow.
How long before we have warp power again?
Well, we're going to have to manufacture a new conduit. That's at least six hours work.
Six hour? The banquet will be completely over by then. That's very unfortunate.
I can try and speed things up a bit.
No, no, no. I wouldn't want to sacrifice the safety of the ship.
Understood, sir.
Enter.
Counsellor. I did not have a chance to apologise for my actions.
Data, don't worry about it. Geordi explained everything to me. It wasn't your fault. But somehow I thought turnabout would be fair play, so I made us a little something to snack on.
I wonder, what would Doctor Freud say about the symbolism of devouring oneself?
Data, sometimes a cake is just a cake.
Captain, we are entering sector nine seven.
I am picking up massive gravitational fluctuations, sir.
Take us out of warp, Ensign.
Yes, sir.
The Black Cluster is within visual range, Captain.
On screen.
Aye, Captain.
Let's find that ship. Full sensor sweep, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
What a sight.
One of the most ancient formations in the galaxy.
I have located the Vico, sir. The vessel appears to be adrift.
Let's see it. Life signs?
Nothing, Commander.
Damage report, Mister Data.
Outer and inner hulls have been breached. Decks seven through twelve are exposed to space.
Set up a translink to their computer core. Let's see what happened.
I cannot, sir. The emergency bulkheads on that deck are in place. Our linkup signal cannot penetrate them.
Structural status, Commander?
Stress readings indicate considerable pressure on the transverse supports.
Is it stable enough for an away team?
Yes, sir, but the risk of structural collapse is quite high.
Have transporter room one maintain a lock on each member of your away team. I want you out of there at the first sign of trouble.
Take us to fifteen thousand metres, Ensign.
Yes, sir.
Data, you're with me.
This station is inoperable, sir.
This one seems to be stuck in a feedback loop.
Let's see if we can tap directly into the computer core.
The ODN junction is right down here.
Data?
Core transfer is engaged.
Exchange protocol verified. The files are intact. At least some of them, anyway.
Stay here, Geordi. Data.
Are my parents alright?
Captain's log, supplemental. A young boy, shielded from our initial sensor scans, has been discovered pinned beneath a fallen beam. The degree of damage to the Vico is making our rescue attempt difficult.
Transporter room one, can you lock on
To him and transport directly to Sickbay?
I'll try, Captain, but there's a lot of shielding to pull him through.
Acknowledged. Picard to Crusher.
Sickbay here, Captain.
Prepare for emergency transport.
Yes, sir.
Crusher out.
Picard to Commander Riker.
Is the boy ready, Number One?
Ready, sir.
It's your signal.
Aye, Captain. It's going to be okay. Here we go. Energise.
Ensign, do we have him?
The lock is holding. I just can't resolve the matter stream, not with all that victurium alloy in the way.
Commander Riker. You'll have to get him out into the corridor.
I could move the beam, sir. However, it may initiate the collapse of the surrounding supports. I recommend you and Geordi return to the ship.
Agreed. La Forge.
I'm locked onto Commander Data and the boy, sir. I'll energise as soon as they've cleared the bulkheads.
Whenever you're ready, Data.
Yes, sir.
Are you're going to lift that?
Yes. Then I will take you to the corridor. We will transport back to the Enterprise from there. Do you understand?
How come you can pick up something so heavy?
I am an android. My strength is many times that of a human. It is going to be okay. I will count to three. One two three.
Energise.
Captain's log, supplemental. A thorough search of the Vico has revealed no additional survivors. We have begun the process of counselling the boy with regard to the tragedy.
Don't be afraid.
We were in the Black Cluster. I don't know where they came from. They had a big ship and they kept shooting at us. Then they beamed over. They had purple helmets on and phaser rifles. I saw them. They didn't see me.
You're safe now, Timothy. I'm sorry for what happened. It's going to be all right. I bet you're hungry. Would you like me to get you something to eat?
Counsellor, I must join Commander La Forge in Engineering. If you will excuse me.
Timothy, would you like Data to stay with you a little bit longer?
Sections of the primary and secondary hull were torn right off. The shearing planes are here, here, and here.
How much longer till we can access their logs?
Almost an hour.
The boy was here.
The hallway outside the computer core. His mother was the ship's systems engineer. The second away team found her body here inside the core.
And his father?
Ship's second officer. He was most likely on the bridge when it was exposed to space.
Most likely.
He'll sleep for a few hours at least. I don't need to keep him here but I will need to see him again tomorrow. You've got some work cut out for you.
His world is gone, Data. We're going to have to help him build a new one.
This is not good. Whatever hit the Vico must have set up an EM pulse that flashed through their computer banks.
Nearly eighty three percent of their records have been lost.
And all of their sensor logs. Let's use what we got from our own sensors. I'll call up the structural analysis and the surface scans.
Geordi, as a child, did you ever experience a traumatic event?
You're wondering about Timothy?
Yes.
I was caught in a fire once. I must have been, I don't know, about five, I guess. It was before I got the first visor. And it was only a couple of minutes before my parents found me and pulled me out. And nobody got hurt, but I tell you that was the longest couple of minutes of my life. It was a while after that before I could even let my parents get out of earshot. It was like I absolutely needed to know that they were there, you know?
Timothy no longer has that kind of support.
Yeah.
Dara and her brother found themselves in the land of Tagas where the ruler, Elamos the Magnificent, had proclaimed as law. 'No children will be tolerated within the Great Kingdom'. When Dara saw the proclamation, she just laughed, and said, 'How magnificent a ruler, to be frightened by the likes of us.' Timothy, we're done with sculpture for now.
It's not finished.
We'll come back to it next period. Why don't you pick up your mythology book and follow along?
But it's not finished.
Magnetic residual analysis confirms that the Vico was attacked inside the Black Cluster. The graviton wave fronts pushed the ship to where we found it.
No signs of phaser burns on the hull.
No, sir. Torsional stress levels point to a disrupter-style weapon.
Fracture points indicate that the energy burst came from a range of less than three thousand metres.
But that's a strategy consistent with a cloaked vessel. Romulan. Or Klingon. But we're quite a distance from either of their territories.
The Breen have outposts in this sector. The attack on the Vico is consistent with their battle tactics and their level of technology.
Thank you, Data. But what would the Breen be doing inside the Black Cluster? The boy described a boarding party with helmets and phaser rifles.
Boarding party? I don't think that's likely, sir.
Counsellor.
There was absolutely no evidence of anybody coming on board the Vico. We would have found a transporter field trace. Or if somebody had used the entry ports, we would have found an electrostatic differential in the docking latches, and we didn't. Could Timothy have imagined that, Counsellor?
Or could he be lying?
If he's lying, I haven't been able to sense it. Perhaps his emotional trauma level is too high.
Why wouldn't he tell us the truth?
He's still in shock. it's hard to know what's going on in his mind right now.
Well, I'll go back and check the sensor readings again but I don't think we're going to find anything.
Thank you, Geordi.
Data. Captain, I think we should ask Data to spend some time with him.
I do not understand.
I'm very worried about his behaviour and what I've just heard doesn't make me feel any better. Data, you're the only one he's reached out to, because you rescued him. We can use your relationship with him to help his recovery.
Would Timothy also be more inclined to tell Data the truth about what happened?
It's a possibility.
Commander, proceed with Timothy as the Counsellor suggests.
Aye, sir.
Counsellor, exactly how shall I proceed?
Just be with him. You're a presence he trusts, and that's what he needs most right now.
What?
Data.
Hello, Timothy. May I enter?
Yeah.
Ah. You are attempting to recreate the Dokkaran temple of Kural Hanesh?
Isn't it great?! See, there's the big hallway the teacher told us about. That's where everybody came in. That's where they stood. And that's where the altar was. What do you think?
Do you wish a frank evaluation?  It lacks the harmony that characterised this particular temple and Dokkaran culture in general.
You hate it.
No, I am not capable of hatred.
I can't do anything right.
You are making an unwarranted extrapolation. I was merely offering an aesthetic analysis of this particular model. The base appears quite sturdy.
I told you.
May I suggest a different approach? You were attempting to construct the upper level before the supports were in place. Observe.
La Forge to Data.
Data here.
I need your help with the shield modulators.
I will join you in a moment, Geordi. Data out. Lieutenant La Forge requires my assistance.
Incredible. Data, how come you can do that?
I am designed to exceed human capacity, both mentally and physically.
Androids are better than humans?
Better is a highly subjective term. I do not, for example, possess the ability to experience emotion as humans do.
No emotions? You mean you can't be happy or sad?
That is correct.
Why not?
My positronic brain is not capable of generating those conditions. Goodbye.
Data! Can we build something else later?
That would be acceptable.
Bye.
I am designed to exceed human capacity. tilts head) That is correct.
The Black Cluster was formed almost nine billion years ago when hundreds of protostars collapsed in close proximity. The resulting gravitational forces are both violent and highly unpredictable.
To get anywhere near the centre, we're going to have to push through the gravitational wavefronts like the science vessel was designed to do. I've already adjusted our shields accordingly.
The gravitational forces will affect sensor accuracy. Detecting an enemy vessel will be difficult.
Maybe that's what happened to the Vico. They didn't see anything coming until it was too late.
Counsellor, has the boy volunteered any further information?
No, but I do have an appointment with him in less than half an hour.
If there's a possibility of getting more from him, I'd like you to pursue it. But we need to continue our investigation. We'll enter the Black Cluster at oh seven hundred hours tomorrow morning. Dismissed.
Hello, Timothy. Are you ready to go?
Yes, Counsellor. I am ready.
How are you feeling?
I am functioning within established parameters.
Established parameters? You sound like Data.
I am an android.
I see. Well, let's go for our walk, shall we?
That would be acceptable.
So, what would you like?
Androids do not need to eat or drink.  However, sometimes we like to taste things. A Tamarin frost, please. Would you like anything, Counsellor?
No, I'm fine, thank you.
As you wish.
So you're no longer a human?
I'm an android.
When did this happen?
I've always been an android.
What's it like being an android?
I am designed to exceed human capacity, both mentally and physically. But I do not experience emotions.
You don't? No emotion at all?
That is correct.
An android?
I know it sounds unusual, but it is understandable. Technically, it's called enantiodromia. Conversion into the opposite. Timothy went from human to machine, from being emotional to being emotionless. But the underlying trauma is still there. He's just found a new way to suppress it.
Counsellor, how long will this behaviour last?
As long as he needs it to. Timothy is rebuilding his identity as best he can. The android persona is just one step along the way. As soon as he feels stronger and more sure of himself, it should drop away naturally.
I assume this is not a time to confront him about what happened to his ship.
Not yet. The best thing we can do right now is to let Timothy take us where he wants to go. We should support the process and even encourage it.
Data, I would like you to make Timothy the best android he can possibly be.
Timothy, your head movements are counterproductive. Can you be still?
But you do it.
The servo mechanisms in my neck are designed to approximate human movements. I did not realize the effect was so distracting.
I like it. Data, are there any other androids in Starfleet?
No. I am the only one.
How come you're not Captain?
My service experience does not yet warrant such a position.
Data, what's the scariest thing that ever happened to you?
Fear is a quality that I do not possess.
Because it's an emotion?
Correct.
But what if you had a nightmare?
I have never had a nightmare. I do not require sleep. Timothy, are you having disturbing dreams?
I do not require sleep.
Is that satisfactory?
It's perfect.
Transfer circuits are functioning properly.
Within established parameters?
Absolutely. Input processing, pattern recognition, all within established parameters.
DATA + TIMOTHY:Thank you, Doctor.
I ran out of red ochre.
You may use mine.
Thank you.
Perhaps you should return to your quarters.
I'm fine. The servo mechanisms in my mouth are designed to approximate human movements.
That is not bad.
Thank you.  It is very expressive.
Thank you.
Is your painting representative of something?
It's just a painting.
Timothy, you understand that you may speak with me about anything you wish? Any subject?
I understand.
At times, I too find it difficult to share my thoughts with others. I am not always confident that I am expressing myself in a manner which humans can comprehend. But do I know that
We are approaching the perimeter. I'm picking up the gravitational wavefronts.
Engage forward shields thirty five percent.
Shields up.
Drop to one quarter impulse, Ensign.
Yes, sir.
Bridge to Engineering.
Adjusting shield frequencies now, Commander. We'll have this smoothed out in just a second.
Ensign, adjust course for any deviations.
Yes, sir.
Resume one third impulse.
Captain, I am reading something at four hundred thousand kilometres off the starboard bow. Possibly a ship.
Red alert.
Take us to visual range, Ensign.
Adjusting course.
Sensor readings have disappeared. Wait, I am picking up another reading at four hundred thousand kilometres off the port bow. It's gone. No, it is back to starboard.
Captain, the Black Cluster is distorting the sensors. We're picking up echoes of the Enterprise reflecting off the wavefronts.
Cancel Red alert. Mister Worf, adjust the sensors to compensate for the distortion.
Aye.
Sensor difficulties have been reported by ships travelling through black clusters, but never this extreme.
Captain, that formation is seven times more massive than any explored previously. That could explain the difference.
Resume previous course, Ensign.
Yes, sir.
He laughed.
Yes. It's nice to see, isn't it?
It is certainly not consistent with his android persona.
I'd say he's beginning the process of letting go of that fantasy.
Then my work with him is done.
No, I don't think it is, Data. A laugh is one step in the right direction. We need to help him take a few more steps.
How, Counsellor?
I'd like you to talk to him about your own fascination with humanity. If you can explain to Timothy the appeal that humanity has for you, he might find it easier to become a boy again.
This is great. How is yours?
The complex polysaccharides, in reaction with the carbon dioxide, produces an unusual combination of texture and effervescence.
But how does it taste? Is it good?
I am not capable of tasting in the manner you suggest. However, I can analyse the composition of a dessert and make comparative conclusions about its possible effect on the human palate. But I neither like it nor dislike it.
Oh. I didn't realise that.
I have often wondered what it must be like to have one's mouth water in anticipation of the arrival of a confection, or to feel the pleasure I have observed in humans as they consume it.
You sound like you don't want to be an android.
I am an android. That will never change.
But if you could change, would you?
I have often wished to be human. I study people carefully in order to more closely approximate human behaviour.
Why? We're stronger and smarter than humans. We can do more than they can.
But I cannot take pride in my abilities. I cannot take pleasure in my accomplishments.
But we never have to feel bad, either.
I would gladly risk feeling bad at times if it also meant that I could also taste my dessert.
Captain, gravitational wavefront intensity is increasing steadily. Eleven hundred standard G units and rising.
Let's see if anyone's out there. Mister Worf, attempt a wide range sensor sweep.
Aye, sir. Gravitational distortion is too great, Captain. The scanning signal is again being reflected off the wavefronts. I am unable to compensate. The sensors are useless.
Mister Data to the Bridge, please.
Acknowledged.
Adjust sensors to short range. Attempt a limited positron scan.
The distortion is still in effect.
Better jacket the scanning beam.
The secondary beam is being distorted as well.
Mister Data, our sensors have been rendered ineffective by the field distortion. I want your analysis. Mister Worf, fire phasers, maximum intensity, limited spectrum. Zero zero one mark zero four five.
An experiment, Captain?
Exactly, Number One.
Firing phasers.
Explanation, Mister Data.
Phaser energy was reflected by the gravitational wavefronts. It is similar to the phenomenon distorting our sensor signals.
Phasers and sensors both useless? Mister Data, this reflection phenomenon, would it have the same effect on a disruptor-style weapon?
Yes, sir. Disruptors would be ineffectual.
And a ship's cloaking field?
It would be extremely difficult to maintain.
Mister Data, is it at all likely that the Vico could have been attacked inside the cluster?
Given the effects we have observed, the probability is exceedingly remote, sir.
Picard to Counsellor Troi.
Yes, Captain?
Counsellor, will you bring Timothy to my Ready room?
Timothy, can you tell us what happened to your ship?
I did tell you.
Tell us again.
We were attacked.
That is highly unlikely. Our investigations have clearly demonstrated
We were attacked! We were attacked!
Timothy, androids do not lie.
It was me.
Please explain.
It was me. I did it. I killed them all. Everything was shaking. I lost my balance. I was just trying to hold on to something. I didn't mean to do it.
What was it that didn't you mean to do, Timothy?
My arm hit the computer panel. That's what destroyed the ship.
The ship was damaged when your arm hit the computer panel? Timothy, listen to me. The damage to your ship might have occurred at the same time your arm touched the panel, but it was only a coincidence. This wasn't your fault.
Yes it was.
It is not possible. The onboard control systems for every starship require a user code clearance. You could not have inadvertently affected any of the Vico's systems.
Your computer had safety precautions. There is nothing you could have touched that would have damaged your ship.
You're not responsible for what happened to your parents, Timothy.
But if it wasn't me
We're trying to determine what happened right now, and if there is anything you can remember that may assist
That's just how it was when it started on the Vico.
Wavefront intensity has increased.
Increase shields to seventy five percent.
Aye, sir.
Damage, Mister Worf.
Minimal, sir. Shields are holding.
Ensign, full about. Go to warp two.
The gravitational distortion is too high. We can't maintain a warp field.
Full shields.
Aye.
Captain, impulse power has been disrupted. The helm won't respond.
We couldn't get out either.
Timothy, perhaps you and I should go below and get out of everyone's way.
No.
Riker to La Forge. Can you give me more power to the shields?
Stand by.
That's what they kept saying. More shields, more shields.
Timothy, accompany me, please.  I want you to recall everything you heard people say aboard the Vico before it was destroyed.
I don't know. Just that. Just more shields.
Captain, I've transferred
Fusion reactors four through nine into the shield array. That should double the shield strength.
Wavefront intensity has increased by an order of magnitude. Impact in three, two, one.
Wave front intensity is continuing to increase. Structural over-pressure now exceeding one hundred eighty percent.
La Forge?
I don't understand. That should have been enough.
We could run the shield grid directly off the warp drive.
Go ahead, Commander.
Initiating warp-transfer pathways now.
Diverting warp power to the shields.
Warp power to the shields. They said that too, Data. I'm positive.
Wavefront intensity has increased by a factor of ten. Contact in thirty one seconds. Without additional power to the shields, the outer hull will not hold.
La Forge?
Warp transfer to the shields complete.
That's as strong as they're going to get.
Impact in fifteen seconds.
Sir, drop the shields.
That's suicide, Data.
Captain, drop the shields.
Make it so.
Aye.
Our own shields caused the increases in the wavefronts, sir. We have been experiencing a harmonic amplification effect.
The more energy we dumped into the shield grid, the worse the impact.
Precisely. That is also what destroyed the Vico. When Timothy remembered similar procedures on his ship, I initiated an analysis of shield output to wavefront amplitude and discovered a correlation.
If we had transferred all that warp power to the shields, it would have torn the ship apart.
Status, Ensign?
Navigation is coming back online.
Full about, one quarter impulse. Take us out of here.
Timothy's a boy feeling a great deal of pain. But he is a boy again. Is this difficult for you, Data?
Difficult?
To watch him moving away from being like you.
That would require an emotional context which I cannot provide.
Okay, everybody, let's go. Come on.
Hello, Timothy.
Hi, Data. How are you?
I am operating within established parameters. How are you?
I miss my parents. But I'm okay. I guess you thought I was pretty silly when I had my hair like yours and everything.
I have been told that imitation is the highest form of flattery.
Can we still do things together, even if I'm not really an android?
I have many human friends. I would be pleased to count you among them.
That would be acceptable.
All right, come in.
Guinan? What's wrong?
I need a doctor. Geordi beat me in straight sets today. I think I've developed tennis elbow.
Well, you'd better go to Sickbay. I think Doctor Selar's on duty.
I don't want to see Doctor Selar. I always see you. I'm very particular about my doctors.
Well, you'd better get a new one, because I'm not a doctor on this ship anymore.
Three days on a shuttle to Starbase twenty three, transport back to Earth. I can hear Admiral Brooks now, telling me how I've disgraced Starfleet Medical. Then a leisurely day and a half before the formal inquiry begins and my career ends.
Beverly? My elbow.
Your elbow. Let me see it. Does this hurt?
Ow! Yes, right there.
That's tennis elbow, all right. Here, hold your arm like this.
You know, I've never been to a formal inquiry.
Well I'll see if I can arrange one for you. All you have to do is disobey orders, violate medical ethics, and cause an interstellar incident.
Well I guess that would do it.
Make a fist.
Do I have to hit you with my fist before you tell me what happened?
It all started when those scientists came on board. No. It started when I got curious.
Well, there's nothing wrong with that.
That's why I went to the Altine Conference. I'd heard about a new subspace technology developed by a Ferengi, a Doctor Reyga.
A Ferengi scientist. Hmm.
His invention was based on metaphasic fields, but his methodology was completely unorthodox.
I like unorthodox.
Too bad you weren't there. Nobody else would listen to him. They all but jeered him off the stage. But I had read his paper and his work was extraordinary.
So you gathered all these scientists to come hear this Ferengi.
Yes. I hoped I could be a facilitator. I thought if I invited scientists from various cultures to board the Enterprise, I could sit them and down help them understand the value of his ideas.
Like a scientific diplomat.
Exactly. So, after persuading the Captain, I had to round up as many scientists as I could from the field of subspace technology.
But of all the scientists I invited, only four were interested in hearing about Doctor Reyga's invention. And I wasn't altogether sure they were going to be compatible. Kurak was a warp field specialist on the Klingon Homeworld. I don't think Klingons regard scientists very highly. She always seemed a little defensive. Doctor T'Pan is practically a legend in the field of subspace morphology. She's been the director of the Vulcan Science Academy for fifteen years. Her husband, Doctor Christopher, came with her. I didn't know much about him, but he was some kind of subspace theoretician. Jo'Bril was a Takaran, the first one I'd ever met. I had no idea what to expect from him. And then there was Doctor Reyga, the Ferengi scientist.
You've all seen my experimental data. The metaphasic shield has been proven.
T'PAN:Forgive my scepticism, Doctor, but your claims are somewhat extravagant. Protect a shuttle within a star's corona? Not even your own government believes it can be done.
That's why I've invited you all here. You have the vision to see the potential of Doctor Reyga's metaphasic shield.
I need help to develop the shield. I am willing to grant exclusive rights to whoever provides the necessary resources.
I think you all realise what this shielding process could mean. The possibilities of exploration and research are endless.
But only if it works. I'm not convinced that this metaphasic shield can withstand either the temperature or the radiation it would be exposed to.
But it has! Not only in countless simulations, but in a field test that I conducted myself.
For which, of course, we have only your word.
Are you accusing me of falsifying my data?
You would not be the first scientist to manipulate experimental data to his own advantage.
Doctor Reyga has offered to demonstrate his invention. He's outfitted one of our shuttles with his metaphasic shield.
I will take it into the corona of the star Vaytan.
That star has a superdense corona. The shuttle would be subjected to particularly intense radiation. Perhaps it would be wise to choose a star of lesser magnitude.
T'PAN:I agree. My own research into solar energy transfer suggests that Vaytan's corona is extremely unstable.
What better way to test my invention? I'm not concerned. The shield will hold.
I for one would feel more comfortable if someone else flew the shuttle. Someone more objective.
JO'BRIL:I will volunteer for that task. I've spent years studying solar plasma reactions. The thought of being able to penetrate a star's corona. It is a remarkable opportunity. I've studied your data, Doctor Reyga. I think you're on solid scientific ground.
I do not share your optimism, Doctor Jo'Bril, but if you wish to pilot the craft, I would be more confident in your assessment of the shield than Doctor Reyga's.
I agree. At this point, we need an impartial evaluation.
We'll need to be sure that you're familiar with the shuttle's controls and Doctor Reyga's modifications.
JO'BRIL:I'm an accomplished pilot. It will be no problem.
Well, what do you think?
I am gratified, Doctor Jo'Bril. And there will be no difficulty in operating the metaphasic controls. The system will activate automatically as you approach the star.
Well, then. We'll proceed with the demonstration at fifteen hundred hours. We'll meet on the Bridge.
It wasn't exactly an enthusiastic response to Doctor Reyga's technology, but given the circumstances and the scientist's quarrelsome personalities, I was quite pleased.
I thought that went well, didn't you?
Thanks to you, Doctor.
I didn't do anything.
This is an opportunity I would never have had without you, and I promise you, I'll never forget it.
Some of the scientists still seem a little doubtful, but after the demonstration I'm sure they'll come around.
Well, if there's anything I'm used to, it's scepticism. After all, a Ferengi scientist is almost a contradiction in terms. No, don't deny it. I know how the Ferengi are regarded.
I still expect the scientific community to be a little more open than they seem to be.
The metaphasic shield is a breakthrough in technology. Many scientists have tried to develop it. It's only natural that there would be some resistance.
You mean jealousy. I know. I wondered if that might account for Doctor T'Pan's attitude. She's been working on subspace shielding technology for years and you've beaten her to the punch.
I'm really not interested in competition. All I want is to be acknowledged. Respected as a scientist. This invention will finally do that.
I figured the hard part was over. I'd stepped out on a limb and it hadn't broken.
Not bad for my first venture into scientific diplomacy.
Captain, the shuttle has been launched.
On screen. Open a channel.
JO'BRIL:I am one million kilometres from the star's corona. Proceeding at three quarters impulse. I should reach it in approximately three minutes.
The metaphasic shielding has begun to form.
External temperature is zero point nine million Kelvins and rising. Radiation levels are nearing ten thousand rads.
That should have no effect on the shuttle cabin.
That's right. Temperature in the cabin is twenty one degrees Celsius and the radiation levels are normal.
JO'BRIL:Wait. I'm reading elevated neutrino levels in the cabin.
Those are from the subspace field that's encapsulating the shuttle. The levels are well within acceptable parameters.
Outside temperature is rising rapidly. One point seven million Kelvins.
Temperature is still twenty one degrees and the shield is holding.
JO'BRIL:Three hundred and fifty thousand kilometres and closing. This is incredible. I am actually flying into a star.
Congratulations, Doctor. This is an amazing achievement.
Radiation levels outside the shuttle are nearing fourteen thousand rads.
Temperature inside the cabin is still normal.
JO'BRIL:I am now fully engulfed in the corona. It's astonishing.
You see, Doctors? Metaphasic shielding is a reality. Doctor Jo'Bril, can you give us an estimate of the plasma turbulence?
Doctor Jo'Bril?
Something's wrong.
What's going on, Mister Data?
Sensors indicate an increased level of baryon particles in the cabin.
No! That's not possible.
Doctor Jo'Bril, can you hear me? Please respond.
Baryon levels are continuing to rise, sir.
I don't understand. This shouldn't be happening.
Mister Worf, can you beam him out of there?
The solar radiation is interfering. He must be at least five hundred thousand kilometres from the star before we can get a transporter lock.
We're losing him.
Doctor Jo'Bril, listen to me. It is imperative that you turn the shuttle. Take it out of the corona. Do you understand me? Pilot the shuttle away from the star.
The shuttle is emerging from the corona, sir.
Mister Worf, get a lock on him as soon as you can.
Beam him directly to Sickbay.
At that point, the doubts of the others seemed justified. I had no idea what had gone wrong or how seriously Doctor Jo'Bril had been injured, but I knew this incident could destroy Reyga's chance to be accepted by the scientific community.
Twenty cc's inaprovaline. It's not working. Cortical stimulators. Now. Again.
JO'BRIL:I saw the sun.
So that was my first experience as a scientific diplomat. A complete failure. I don't understand.
No?
I mean, I've lost patients before.
But this was different.
Mmm.
You know, when you're a doctor and you have patients, you're in control. But when you send someone out on a mission, all you can do is sit and watch.
That's what I felt. Helpless.
Anybody would. Don't be too hard on yourself.
You know, what you say reminds me of something Jean-Luc said to me when I was doing the autopsy on Jo'Bril.
It was probably the most puzzling autopsy I've ever performed, and the most frustrating, because Jo'Bril's anatomy was unlike any I'd encountered, and I've run into some unusual specimens.
How's it going?
I've never run into a humanoid species like this before. His internal physiology's baffling. He doesn't seem to have any discrete organs, at least not in the traditional sense. Practically every system is equally distributed throughout the body. That kind of physiology should make him incredibly resistant to injury, so whatever killed him must have occurred at the cellular level.
Do you have any idea what it was?
No. Something caused a massive system-wide failure, but I don't know what.
Were the solar radiation levels high enough to kill him?
His exposure to the star's radiation was minimal. It's all very strange. There's no apparent cause of death.
Doctor, here's the result of the tissue scan you asked for.
That's odd. The rate of cellular decay is extremely low.
Beverly, the answers will come.
Maybe even minimal exposure to the radiation altered the cellular physiology.
You know, you've been at this for hours. You might think more clearly if you got a good night's sleep.
I can't sleep. I want to find out what killed him. I owe that to Doctor Reyga.
You're doing it for Doctor Reyga, or yourself?
What do you mean?
You're the loneliest person in the world right now. No one can say anything, no one can do anything that will help. And you think that it will never go away. And you're right, it won't. But you can get used to it. I know it doesn't feel like that now, but you can.
At the time, I was too preoccupied with my problems to understand what he was saying. I wasn't thinking about the rest of my life. I was trying to make sense of what had happened.
And I wasn't alone. Jo'Bril's death had raised a lot of questions. Geordi and Data were determined to find out what had gone wrong, and they were busy going over every millimetre of the shuttle, with Doctor Reyga's help.
Run another diagnostic on the EPS flow regulator.
The flow regulator is functioning properly.
What about the field emitter coil? Has it maintained polarity?
Yes, Doctor.
The radial force compensator?
I am unable to locate any malfunction. All systems are operating according to your design specifications.
Did you find anything wrong?
No. I don't understand it. There must be something we've overlooked.
I found micro-crystalline damage to the hull, which confirms that your shield was breached by a burst of baryonic radiation.
Were the levels high enough to cause damage to organic tissue?
I don't know.
Perhaps there was an unexpected interaction between the solar radiation and the metaphasic shield.
No, that's not possible. I anticipated every contingency.
Then maybe Jo'Bril ran into something in the corona which you didn't anticipate, and your shield just wasn't able to protect him from it.
My shield was not at fault.
Reyga seemed angry, but I knew it was because he was so disappointed. Everything he'd worked for, hoped for, was slipping away.
And that made what I had to do next even harder.
I'm sure you all understand that in light of what happened, I think it would be inappropriate to continue further testing. Perhaps if Doctor Reyga has perfected his metaphasic technology, we can try again.
Doctor Crusher, please, if I could have a little more time to investigate I know I could find what went wrong.
But that won't bring back Jo'Bril, will it?
T'PAN:I do not believe the shield will ever work. Its very concept is flawed.
Just one more test.
Whom do you propose we sacrifice next?
I will pilot the shuttle myself.
I'm sorry. As Chief Medical Officer I'm responsible for the health and safety of all the people aboard. I will not authorise any further tests.
Very well. But I will prove myself.
I couldn't help but admire his tenacity. He just wasn't going to accept defeat. And I hoped he would prove himself. But that was the last time I saw him alive.
We'd gone to Science Lab four when the ship's sensors registered a sizable plasma surge there.
Look at this. A plasma infuser. It's completely discharged. The blast must have killed him instantly.
Perhaps he could not live with the failure of his invention and took his own life.
Or perhaps someone just wanted it to look that way. Isn't it odd that he could hold on so tightly to the infuser when it was discharged. The normal reflex would have been to drop it.
The plasma shock could have affected his nervous system. He may have reacted by gripping tighter.
I'll know for certain when I do the autopsy.
Is your examination complete, Doctor?
For now. Please have his body taken to the morgue.
Very well.
I remembered his passion and commitment, and his determination to prove himself, and I was sure that this man had not taken his own life. If anyone could understand that, I knew it would be Captain Picard.
Jean-Luc, I was with him right before he died. He was not suicidal.
But by your own admission, Reyga was a difficult man to understand. Isn't it possible that he was simply masking his feelings?
I don't think so. He was disappointed at the failure of his device and certainly he was upset at Jo'Bril's death, but I never got the sense that he was ready to end his own life. And if that's true, then someone else killed him.
Do you have any evidence of that?
Not yet. But when I finished the autopsy, I hope I'll have it.
Beverly. I'm afraid there will be no autopsy. The family has already been contacted. They insist that the body must not be touched until they perform the Ferengi death ritual.
But there's a question as to the circumstances of his death.
To the family that's irrelevant.
Let me speak with them.
Please believe me, they're adamant. We are scheduled to rendezvous with a Ferengi ship in seventeen hours. They will pick up Reyga's body then. I'm sorry, there will be no autopsy.
Jean-Luc, I cannot just drop this. Don't you see? There may have been a murder.
Then you will have to find evidence some way other than an autopsy.
I don't understand, Doctor. Isn't it pretty clear that Reyga died from a plasma discharge?
It's won't be clear until after an autopsy. As far as I know, he could have been poisoned and someone put the plasma infuser in his hand after he died.
You think he was murdered?
I'm not discounting that possibility. The point is, without a complete autopsy, there's no way of knowing for certain.
Why won't the Ferengi allow it?
It has to do with their death rituals. The body can't be violated before it's buried. Apparently the family is more concerned about ritual than finding out the truth about how he died. I just can't get the information I need from a tricorder scan. Suspects. If Reyga didn't kill himself. someone else did. So who are the possible suspects?
Whoever had something to gain from his death.
And the only ones to fit that category are the other scientists.
I'm afraid I don't understand, Doctor. Do you have evidence that Reyga was murdered?
No, but I can't believe he took his own life and I would like to explore any possibilities a bit further.
T'PAN:What reason would anyone have to kill him?
I was wondering if you might have any thoughts along that line.
T'PAN:I see. You are suggesting that I had such a motive.
If Reyga's technology had been successful, you might have been displaced as the preeminent scientist in subspace technology.
T'PAN:But since it wasn't successful, it is illogical to conclude that I had such a motive, isn't it.
I must say I resent this, Doctor. We've all been shocked by recent events. I don't see that there's anything to gain by dragging us through these insinuations.
I'm just trying to uncover the truth, and I need your help to do it. Have you seen or heard anything that might suggest that someone else had a motive?
We are trying to forget the unpleasantness of these last several days, not have them stirred up again. I find it disturbing that you would try to foster suspicions among us.
Forgive me, I don't mean to upset you, but have you noticed anything unusual?
I find your question distasteful.
Is there something you're not telling me?
I'm sure it's nothing. I was in the storage room of the science laboratory yesterday. Kurak was working in the lab. Reyga came in and they got into, well, an argument.
About what?
I don't know. I couldn't hear clearly until they started to shout at one other. Then I heard Kurak say that Reyga had insulted her honour, and no Klingon would stand for that. I do not believe she killed him. These were words spoken in the heat of anger. Kurak is volatile, passionate, but not a killer. And, Doctor, neither are we.
Thank you.
I knew he might be right about Kurak. Klingons make threats as a matter of course. On the other hand, sometimes they follow through.
That looks like one of Doctor Reyga's shield configurations.
Yes. Personal research.
Even though this technology failed?
No one has denied there is potential in the idea.
Which you're now free to develop.
Are you accusing me of something?
No, but I want to know why you threatened Doctor Reyga.
I warned Doctor Reyga that if he persisted with his slander, he would pay the price.
What was his accusation?
I will not repeat his lies.
Were they lies?
Be careful, Doctor. Insulting the honour of a Klingon can be extremely dangerous.
Did Reyga make that mistake?
I have heard enough accusations! Now I will have your silence.
Well, you're going to have to throw me a lot harder than that if you want to get it. Now, what did he accuse you of?
Sabotage.
Sabotage of the metaphasic shield? Was that why it failed?
How would I know?
Did you sabotage the project?
No. I did not. Goodbye, Doctor.
Kurak refused to say anything more. I wasn't sure if her silence was motivated by guilt or just Klingon pride.
I was beginning to find out that investigating a murder was a little more perilous than I'd thought. And for everything I'd been though, I didn't have any more insight than I did before I started.
Which brought me back to Reyga's body. Because the more I thought about it, the more it seemed that the answers had to be there. DNA traces, tissue anomalies, a wealth of forensic clues that could shed some light on the mystery. So I made the decision.
Come. Beverly.
Jean-Luc, I want to tell you something that you need to know, but you're not going to like it. I did an autopsy on Doctor Reyga.
What did you find?
Nothing. I'm sorry. I know I shouldn't have done it.
You most certainly should not. I made it clear to you that the family would not allow it. Not only have you disobeyed my orders, but you've interfered in the burial rituals of another culture. You've put both of us in a very difficult position. The family will have to be notified. I don't doubt that they will react strongly. If the Ferengi government becomes involved, as I'm certain they will, this could have very significant repercussions. I'm not sure how much I can protect you.
You don't have to, Jean-Luc. I knew what I was doing and I'm prepared to accept the consequences.
I could tell that he was terribly disappointed in me, and that was almost the hardest part of all.
So that's the story. That's how I ended my career.
Backhand volley.
What?
That's how I did it. Geordi kept hitting to my backhand at the net.
Guinan, two people died on this ship. Two lives that ended horribly and you're worried about your tennis game?
Are you upset?
I don't know. You tell me. You're supposed to be wise.
Well, if you are upset, why are you moping around here? Why don't you do something about it?
I've done everything I could think of. It got me fired.
Do you think Doctor Reyga killed himself?
No.
Do you think there's a murderer on board?
Yes.
Then why are you still sitting here?
Don't you get it? If I start digging around again.
You could be relieved of duty.
Chief Medical Officer:Chief Medical Officer Chief Medical Officer's log, personal, stardate 46830.1. I'll be leaving the ship tomorrow to attend the board of inquiry. That means I have less than twenty four hours to get to the bottom of this mystery.
What are you doing, Data?
I am running additional diagnostics to make certain there was no permanent radiation damage to the shuttlecraft hull.
You've studied Doctor Reyga's shield system. Do you think it could have been sabotaged?
There was no evidence to suggest sabotage.
Just consider the possibility.
The system interlocks prevent access to the circuitry unless the shield emitter is active. Any attempt to sabotage the device would have to be made while the shield was in operation.
The only time the shield was active was during Jo'Bril's test flight.
That is correct. It seems unlikely that Jo'Bril would perform sabotage which would result in his own death.
I agree. Would it be possible to sabotage the shuttle by remote, during the flight?
A phased ionic pulse beamed directly into the metaphasic projection matrix would result in a temporary system malfunction.
Where on the Enterprise could you generate a phased ionic pulse?
Such a pulse could be initiated from the lateral sensor arrays, science labs one, four, and sixteen, or any of the bridge science stations.
Let's assume for the moment that someone did send out a phased ionic pulse. What would have happened inside the shuttle?
A tetryon field would be formed briefly in the cabin, temporarily disrupting the metaphasic shield.
A tetryon field? If Jo'Bril was exposed to a tetryon field, it might have left residual traces in his tissue. Thanks, Data.
Beverly?
Yes?
We've arranged for a shuttle to take you to Starbase twenty three. You can leave the ship at oh seven hundred hours tomorrow.
Thank you.
About everything that's going on. I'm sorry. I'm sure it will all work out.
Yes, of course.
You know the inquiry's just a formality, and Captain Picard will do everything he can for you.
I'm sure that'll help.
But if you do anything foolish before that inquiry. it's not going to look good for you.
I don't know what you mean.
I think you do know what I mean. The best thing for you to do right now is go to your quarters and read a good book. If you do anything to make the situation any worse it's going to be that much harder on you.
Thank you, Commander. Your concern is noted.
Beverly. I'm saying this to you as a friend.
Yes, Will, I know. But, as a friend, please try to understand. I can't quit now and I don't want you to become involved in this.
Computer, access ship's medical logs and download current autopsy files.
Autopsy files are restricted to active medical personnel only. Access denied.
Damn.
Doctor Crusher? What do you need the autopsy files for?
Don't worry. I know I'm not supposed to be here. I'll go.
Computer, access autopsy files.
I assume you'll need the files on Doctor Reyga and Jo'Bril?
Alyssa.
I can see how important this is to you.
I don't want you to get involved in this.
Is that an order, Doctor?
Yes.
Too bad you're not my boss now.
Thank you.
So what do we do now?
First of all, I want to review Jo'Bril's physiology records. Then I want to take another look at the body. I want to see if there's any tetryon traces.
Let's do it.
We need to run a tissue scan at the molecular level. Calibrate the scanner to pick up tetryon particles.
Yes, Doctor. Re-calibration complete.
Activate the scan.
Nothing.
Let's do it again. Use the enhanced resolution mode to boost the sensitivity.
There's something in the subdermal tissue.
Narrow the scan field. Tetryon traces. Someone did sabotage the shield.
That's a possibility, but this is very circumstantial evidence.
There's only one way to know for certain.
Captain, I'm concerned about Beverly. I've tried several times to talk to her, but she's been avoiding me.
I'm not surprised.
This entire experience has been
Captain, an unscheduled launch is taking place in Shuttlebay two.
No idea. No one's filed a flight plan.
On screen.
That's the Justman, the shuttle Reyga modified.
Open a hailing frequency.
Doctor Crusher, what do you think you're doing?
Testing a theory, Captain.
A theory?
I think Doctor Reyga's shield does work.
Return to the ship immediately.
I'm sorry.
Mister Worf, override the shuttle's computer. Return it to the shuttlebay.
Aye, sir. Sir, she has isolated her navigational control. It will not be possible to establish remote operation.
Get a tractor beam on her.
I cannot establish a lock. She is too close to the star. Solar interference is too high.
Mister Data, what is her heading?
Bearing two seven one mark four, sir. She is headed into the sun's corona.
Computer, begin monitoring external temperature.
External temperature zero point eight million Kelvins and rising.
Beverly, what do you hope to accomplish?
I think Doctor Reyga was right about his shield. The only reason it failed is because it was sabotaged, and I'm going to prove it.
But you can't be certain of that. You're betting your life on a hypothesis.
I'm not wrong.
External temperature one point nine million Kelvins.
Sir, the shuttle is entering the corona.
Beverly, what's happening?
I'm all right. Computer, shield status?
Metaphasic shield holding. All systems within normal operating parameters.
Congratulations, Doctor Reyga. You did it. Captain, I want you to post security guards around the three visiting scientists. One of them has to be responsible for sabotaging the first test. I think if we
Sir, we have lost contact.
Crusher to Enterprise. I've lost you. Come in. Justman to Enterprise. Come in.
Enterprise, do you hear me? Come in.
JO'BRIL:They cannot hear you. I have severed communications.
How can you be alive?
JO'BRIL:I'd think after your autopsy on me, you'd know the answer to that.
The slow rate of cellular decay.
JO'BRIL:It is a natural result of physiostasis. Takarans can control their physiology at a cellular level. We can create the appearance of death.
In the morgue, you were conscious the whole time. You heard everything we said. You knew everything we were going to do.
JO'BRIL:Move away. Move away.
What are you doing?
JO'BRIL:I'm sending out a transient subspace signal. It will obscure the shuttle from the Enterprise sensors and they will interpret it as a warp engine breach. They will believe that you have been destroyed. I'd like to thank you, Doctor.
For what?
JO'BRIL:All I wanted to do was discredit Reyga so that no one would pursue his technology except me. But you have given me more than I could have hoped. Now I can take the prototype itself back to Takara, where I will develop it into a weapon. All I have to do is wait here until the Enterprise is convinced you are dead, and leaves.
Captain, there is no indication of debris. However, the subspace signal indicates a warp engine breach.
All right, begin a phase one search, starting with the shuttlecraft's last known coordinates. Plot a proximity course toward the star.
Sir, we are picking up an object emerging from the corona.
Crusher to Enterprise. I'm all right. Returning to the ship. And I finally have the answers I've been looking for.
Chief Medical Officer:Chief Medical Officer Chief Medical Officer's log, stardate 46831.2. I have been reinstated and I will be resuming my duties shortly. In the meantime, I have a personal matter to attend to.
Hi, Guinan.
Hello. Ooo, somebody's birthday?
Not unless it's yours. It's for you.
For me? What's the occasion?
It's a thank you. For giving me a good kick in the butt.
Oh, now, I didn't, er.
I did some research. This is the latest design, state of the art. It's specially designed to cushion all vibration so you will never have tennis elbow again.
Thank you, Doctor. This looks like a great racquet, but, er, I don't play tennis. Never have.
Captain. Communication from Starfleet. They have reported a disturbance in the Neutral Zone.
Of what nature?
A battle. Quadrant nine, coordinates zero seven zero, mark three. There's no information who is involved. They are asking if we can investigate.
Answer affirmative. Lieutenant La Forge, lay in the course.
Aye, sir.
I have no reports of any Federation ships in that area, sir.
Ferengi?
It's a little out of their territory.
Shall we separate the saucer?
Let's get a little more information first.
Course set, Captain.
Speed, warp seven.
Aye, sir, warp seven.
Engage.
We are now approaching the Neutral Zone.
Sir, sensors indicate several recent photon explosions and heavy phaser activity.
Sir, I have analysed the residue from the explosions. This is of no known Ferengi design. It is possibly Romulan.
Now there's a name we haven't heard for a while.
I could go a lot longer without hearing it.
If the Romulans have returned to this sector we should know about that. Mister Worf, any further activity?
Negative, sir.
Slow to half impulse.
Going to one half impulse. Now entering quadrant nine zero seven, mark three.
Shields and deflectors up. Go to Yellow Alert.
I have located a vessel, sir. It is drifting.
Put it on main viewer.
Aye, sir.
Magnify.
The life support systems on the ship are failing, sir. Propulsion, navigation, and all communication, inoperative.
Any trace of the other vessel?
No, sir.
If it is a Romulan vessel, it could be cloaked.
Tell Starfleet we're entering the Neutral Zone.
Yes, sir.
Mister La Forge, take us in a little closer.
Aye, aye, sir.
Stay sharp everyone.
It's Talarian.
Life signs?
Nothing yet, sir.
I have identified the vessel, Captain. It is the Batris, a general cargo vessel.
A long way from home.
Keep alert.
Captain, possible life signs.
What do you mean, possible?
The readings emanate from a location near what is left of main Engineering. There is a great deal of magnetic and radioactive clutter making a positive determination difficult.
I'll prepare an away team.
Lieutenant Yar, you stay at your post. If this is the result of a Romulan attack, they may still be in the area.
Aye, sir.
Data, Geordi, let's go.
Mister La Forge, are we close enough to use the Visual Acuity transmitter?
We can certainly try it, sir.
Please do. And Number One? Everything about this seems wrong.
Agreed. It smells like a trap. Let's go.
Captain's log, stardate 41503.7. We have entered the Neutral Zone, where a Talarian freighter has been severely damaged in a battle. I have sent an away team to investigate.
What exactly does this device do?
Data and I have been working on a way to transmit what my visor sees. If it works, the Bridge'll be able to monitor us.
It has restrictions. The information from Geordi's visor is so complex it is difficult to encode. Therefore the signal breaks down easily.
That means it doesn't have much range.
Exactly. So far, the effective range is only few kilometres, but we're working on it. La Forge to Bridge.
This is the Bridge.
Worf, I've switched on the Visual Acuity Transmitter.
We are receiving. The signal is strong.
Okay, Worf. I am switching off for transport.
Set phasers on stun. Let's be ready for anything. Energise.
La Forge to Bridge.
This is the Enterprise.
Captain, I'm switching on the transmitter.
Ready to receive. Put this on main viewer.
Aye, sir.
Extraordinary. Now I'm beginning to understand him.
Geordi. What was that? Over to the left.
What?
Yes, that. No, no, back. Yes, that. Right there. What is that?
That's Commander Riker.
Ah, to me it's just an undefined form, standing in a visual frenzy. Can you filter out the extraneous information?
No, I get it all simultaneously.
But it's just a jumble.
How can you make head or tail of it?
I select what I want and then disregard the rest.
But how is that possible?
Well, how, in a noisy room, can you select one specific voice or sound?
Of course, something you learn.
Exactly.
It's something I have learned. Does that make it more clear?
Look over at Data. There's an aura around Data.
Well, of course. He's an android.
You say that as if you think that's what we all see.
Don't you?
Sir, I hate to break this up, but
Oh, yes, of course, Number One. Proceed.
Let's go.
I am detecting high levels of deuterium gas, probably from the leakage in the drive system.
Toxic?
Not as yet, sir. The life signs are emanating from the far side of Engineering.
What's the safest way around?
All routes are equally dangerous, sir.
Well, what's the least dangerous route, Data?
There is no significant difference.
Steady on.
Commander Riker! Commander.
Yes, Geordi.
There's a fissure developing in the bulkhead. The skin of the ship is losing its integrity.
Where is it? I can't see it.
Right there.
Geordi, step closer. It looks to me like a spectrograph indicating metal fatigue.
Is that how you interpret it?
Very good, Captain. Exactly right.
How long before this hull ruptures?
It's impossible to be exact. I'd say five minutes. Probably less.
Let's go.
Geordi, we've lost transmission.
Signal overload. I'm surprised it lasted this long.
We've reached the core, Captain.
The life signs are very strong now, sir. They are coming from over there.
Is there any other way around?
Negative. This is the only way. The safest way to proceed is for me to cross alone. The heat and toxic gases have less effect on me.
Agreed. Captain, Data's gone ahead.
The life signs seem to be coming from the far side of Engineering.
I've found them, sir. The door to their compartment is jammed.
The control mechanism's not operative, sir.
This is Commander Riker of the USS Enterprise. Do you hear me?
I advise against the use of phasers, sir. The gas buildup is too great.
He's right, sir. A phaser discharge now could blow us all out of here.
Shall I, sir?
Number One, what's going on?
We're about to force the door.
What is it? What do you see?
Klingons.
Klingons?
I am Korris.
We'll handle the formalities later. Right now we have to get off this ship. Are there any others survivors?
No.
I believe I have found a quicker way out of here, sir.
Check him out.
He is alive, sir, but just barely.
Then pick the body and let's get out of here.
No. I will carry him.
As you wish.
Come on, let's go!
Tasha, go to transporter room three. I want you there when the away team returns.
Aye, sir.
Commander, we are out of time. This ship is blowing.
Transporter room, have you got a lock on us?
Too much interference. You have to get farther away from the Engineering section.
Sir, the Engineering section is critical. Destruction of the Batris is imminent.
They're out of options. Do it!
Now!
Bridge, this is Commander Riker.
We are taking the survivors to Sickbay.
I'll be in Sickbay.
Captain. Request permission to join you.
Granted.
Debris is still being analysed.
Inform me as soon as it is complete.
Aye, sir.
Situation, Doctor.
His injuries are very critical.
I am Jean Luc Picard, Captain of this vessel.
My name is Korris, Captain of the Klingon Defence Force. This is Lieutenant Konmel.
Would you mind telling me what has happened?
We were passengers. The Talarians were taking us to outpost M Zed Five.
What was the ship doing in the Neutral Zone?
We were attacked without warning by a Ferengi cruiser. During the course of the battle we must have unknowingly entered the Neutral Zone.
The weapons were not Ferengi.
What is your name?
I am Lieutenant Worf.
And you are a member of this crew?
Yes.
You are correct. The weapons were Klingon, but the vessel was Ferengi.
What precipitated the attack?
I don't know. We were in our quarters.
The captain of the freighter had no combat experience so he did not anticipate the first attack, which was nearly fatal.
We took control with his permission. The Ferengi called for surrender. I told the Captain to agree to all their terms. We had only one chance, but I was confident it would be enough.
As adversaries the Ferengi are not very worthy.
Still, your weapons were limited and their ship superior.
Yes. All we had was an ancient battery of Merculite rockets. Our only chance was to trick them into lowering their shields.
We reduced power and lured them in.
They suspected nothing.
Then, when they lowered their shields to beam over a boarding party, we opened fire.
Still, there are some points that I'm not very clear about.
Captain, we are hungry and tired.
Of course.
If there is anything else you wish to know about this incident, we will be available.
Permission to show our guests to their quarters, Captain.
Permission granted.
What do you think, Captain?
There's more to this than we've been told. Why was the Talarian ship so far off course? What was its point of departure?
Why would three Klingon officers hitch a ride on a broken down freighter?
Contact Starfleet. Find out what they know about Korris and company.
It'll take forty eight hours for a message to get to Starfleet on subspace frequency.
They're going to be with us for a while. Let's find out all we can about them.
Do you think I should have assigned a security team to keep an eye on our guests?
No. Worf can deal with anything that might arise. How's your patient, Doctor?
Not good. I'll keep you posted.
Sit, friend. Let us eat.
O'Mat gri tea and piviots.
I did not know there were Klingons serving on human Starfleet vessels.
As far as I know, I am the only one.
Tell me, what it is like for the hunter to lie down with the prey? Have they tamed you, or have you always been docile?
Does it make you gentle? Has it filled your heart with peace?
Do glorious battles no longer inspire your dreams?
Why do you mock me? Why do you wish to anger me?
Only to see if it is still possible.
It is.
Doctor! I think you'd better come and look at this. The Klingon's condition is worsening.
He's convulsing. Get the hypospray.
Commander Korris, this is Captain Picard.
Yes, Captain.
I am sorry to report your comrade's injuries are beyond our medical abilities.
He's dying.
Is there any special arrangement you would like for the body?
It is only an empty shell now. Please treat it as such.
The opponent that killed Kunivas should have been an enemy, then his death would have been even more glorious.
If the opponent was not an enemy, who was it? Tell me. What really happened?
I do not wish to anger you. We are after all, brothers lost among infidels. Tell me, how is it that you come to this ship, that uniform?
Through an act of kindness. The Romulans attacked the Khitomer outpost. Everyone was killed. I was buried under the rubble and left for dead. A human Starfleet officer found me. He took me to his home on Gault and told his wife to raise me as his son.
How old were you?
Before the age of inclusion.
That young?
Gault is a farming colony.
When my foster brother and I were of age, we entered the Starfleet Academy. He hated it and returned to Gault. I stayed.
You have not spent much time among your own kind.
Hardly none.
So, when the night was still and quiet, and the sound of the blood rushing through your veins filled your ears, the only way to silence it was to slip out into the night and, like the hunter that spawned you, join in the struggle of life and death. You were unable
And those around you did not understand. You frightened them.
They shunned you. Cursed you. Called you vile names, and you knew not why. Even now do you know why you are driven? Why you cannot relent or repent or confess or abstain? How could you know? There have been no other Klingons to lead you to that knowledge.
Yes. Yes, those feelings are part of me. But I control them. They do not rule me.
Yes. To fit in, the humans demand that you change the one thing that you cannot change. Yet, because you cannot, you do. That too is the mark of the warrior. You said that I mock you. I do not. I salute you.
But against whom do you test yourself? Against what enemy do you charge into battle?
I have been in battle.
Then you understand.
Yes, I do.
Brother, this peace, this alliance, is like a living death to warriors like us.
You're right, we lied to your Commander. We commandeered that freighter and left the crew behind, and we were in search of a place where we could live our lives like true Klingons.
You did not battle the Ferengi.
It was one of our own cruisers sent to bring us back.
You destroyed a Klingon vessel?
I did not want to battle our brothers. I had no choice. They had been corrupted by the illusion of peace.
They traded our birthright so they could die in their sleep.
A peace that makes the Klingon heart that beats in my chest wither and die. Is it permitted for you to show us around this ship?
Yes, of course.
And as I watched Worf, it was like looking at a man that I had never known.
Captain, long range sensors indicate another vessel approaching this area.
Can you identify it?
No, sir, not yet.
Keep a close watch on it. So close to the Neutral Zone it can't be random.
What magnificent battles we could have at the helm of this ship.
Perhaps your dreams of glory no longer fit the time. They belong buried with the past.
Standing here we will never know. Our answer lies out there. Our instincts will lead us.
Instincts that have not been dulled by living among civilised men.
I believe, sir, that was the first time outsiders have witnessed the Klingon death ritual.
I can understand them looking at a dying man's eyes, but the howling?
It was a warning.
To whom?
They are warning the dead, sir. Beware, a Klingon warrior is about to arrive.
Captain, that unidentified vessel is approaching us at warp five. Intersect one hour, sixteen minutes, thirty three seconds.
Can we get a visual?
I can try, sir.
Magnify.
Hello.
Klingons.
Open hailing frequencies, Lieutenant Yar.
Hailing frequencies open.
Klingon cruiser, this is Captain Jean Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
K'NERA:I am Commander K'Nera. What is your purpose in this area?
We came to investigate a battle. We rescued three Klingon survivors.
K'NERA:That is all that is left of the crew of the cruiser T'Acog?
They were not off the cruiser. They were from the freighter Batris. The leader is Captain Korris.
K'NERA:You have him on your ship? He is alive?
Yes.
K'NERA:He is a criminal. A renegade, who with two others stole that freighter, and somehow destroyed the Klingon cruiser sent to bring them back. We expect the criminals to be delivered into our custody as soon as we are within transporter range.
Lieutenant Yar, where are they now?
They're with Worf on deck seventeen.
Deck seventeen?
Yes, sir. Near the auxiliary turbolift to the battle bridge. Shall I alert Lieutenant Worf?
No. Send a security team.
You don't think Worf would allow them access to the battle bridge?
I think, Number One, we cannot assume anything.
Captain, shall I stay at my tactical position or lead the security team?
Lead the security team, and, Lieutenant, you understand with whom you are dealing.
Aye, sir.
We have heard this ship can separate in time of battle.
Yes. When relieved of its bulk, the Enterprise becomes an exceptional weapon.
Worf.
They have come for us.
Step aside.
What is the problem?
The Captain wants those two taken into custody.
Do not let them take us, Worf. Help us.
Listen to the voice of your blood. You are not of these people.
Yes. Join us.
Go back! Please, turn around and go back to your mother.
Bridge, we have a hostage situation on deck seventeen.
Mommy.
Bridge, this is Lieutenant Yar. Disregard. Situation is under control. By order of the Captain, you are confined to Security.
I thought for a minute we had a problem.
Oh?
Yes. It looked like Korris was going to hold that little girl as a hostage.
That is not our way. Cowards take hostages. Klingons do not.
Ri'ario.
Lieutenant. The Klingon vessel has to arrived. They have requested return of the renegades.
They will be tried and executed, sir.
I know. Lieutenant, understand that I am not unmindful of the mixed feelings you must have about this incident.
Thank you, sir. Are there no other options, sir?
None that I can see.
He seems to be handling this quite well, sir.
So far. He must be torn. These are his people.
The Klingon vessel is within range, sir. They are requesting visual contact.
Open frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
K'NERA:We are in position now to receive the criminals.
We're prepared to transfer.
Captain. Request permission to address the Captain on the Klingon vessel. I know it is against standard procedure, but there is something I must say.
Permission granted.
K'Mongi B'Mus.
K'NERA:G'Armond T'Ris. What is it you want?
To plead.
K'NERA:You waste your time. Their actions threaten the alliance. They disobeyed and must be punished.
Yes, they must be punished, but not executed with dishonour.
K'NERA:Why do you care?
What burns in their eyes, fires my soul. I hear their words, and I see it all as it was. Part of me longs for that time.
K'NERA:It's bred in the bone. We all do.
Then send them to a planet in the Halee system, where they can meet death on their feet with a weapon in their hands, not tied and helpless.
K'NERA:When one of us dies that way it diminishes all of us.
Yes.
K'NERA:Brother, I feel as you. I too wish they could fly free, but I have no choice.
Sir.
K'NERA:We await the transfer.
Lieutenant Yar, escort the prisoners to the Transporter room.
Aye, sir.
This is Ramos. The forcefield in Security Three has been broken.
Lieutenant Yar to Bridge.
There's been an escape. At least one of my security is dead.
So is Konmel. Korris is loose and armed.
Keep me informed, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
Data, visual on K'Nera.
Visual on, sir.
Captain, there will be a short delay. Korris has escaped.
K'NERA:He is a trained Klingon warrior, Captain. Perhaps more than you can handle. It is not a disgrace to request our assistance.
I think we can handle the situation.
He's up there!
Captain, Korris is in main Engineering.
Commander Korris.
This is a futile effort.
You cannot win.
I will speak only to my countryman!
Only to Worf!
Captain, he has a phaser aimed directly at the dilithium crystal chamber.
At that range, one blast and
I understand, Lieutenant.
Captain, permission to leave the Bridge.
We'll both go.
What's the situation?
He's on the second level armed with a phaser. We do not have a clear field of fire.
How do you suggest we proceed?
Wait him out.
Captain, let me talk to him.
I do not think that's a good idea, Worf. Right now he's running on adrenalin. Let it cool. There's no where he can go.
He will wait only as long as he believes it is to his advantage. The moment it is not, he will fire his phaser into the dilithium crystal chamber.
That would destroy the Enterprise and him along with it.
Yes. He knows.
Talk to him, Worf.
Brother, I knew you would come.  Now I, we have a chance. I could not do it alone, but I would rather die here, than let the traitors of Kling pick the meat from my bones. With you it will work.
What will work?
I will demand Captain Picard give us access to the battle bridge. We will separate from the rest of the ship, then together we will light up the galaxy. Imagine the fear which will roll before us.
Captain Picard will not comply.
He can not, dare not refuse us. In order to save themselves, they will give us what we demand. Then, brother, we are free.
Put down the phaser.
Wait. I do not believe this.
Believe it.
I have tasted your heart. You have been with them, but you are still of us. Do not deny the challenge of your destiny. Get off your knees and soar. Open your eyes and let the dream take flight.
My brother, it is you who does not see. You look for battles in the wrong place. The test of the warrior is not without, it is within. Here, here we meet the challenge. It is the weaknesses in here a warrior must overcome.
No.
You have talked of glory and of conquest and legends we will write.
Yes, the birthright of every Klingon.
Yet in all you say, where are the words duty, honour, loyalty. Without which a warrior is nothing.
What are you saying? Living among these humans has sucked the Klingon heart out of you.
Put down the phaser.
You are a sham! My words were dust upon the ground. Your blood has no fire. You are weak like them. I don't care what you look like you are no Klingon.
Perhaps not.
Wait.
Mister La Forge, open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Commander K'Nera, this is Captain Picard.
K'NERA:Yes, Captain?
Korris and the other Klingon are dead.
K'NERA:May I speak with Lieutenant Worf?
Yes, Commander?
K'NERA:How did they die?
They died well.
Do you wish the bodies returned?
K'NERA:They are now only empty shells. Dispose of them as you see fit. Worf, when your tour of duty on the Enterprise is complete. consider serving with us. Your training and experience would be of benefit to us, and perhaps there are some things we could teach you.
I am honoured. Thank you.
I was just being polite, sir.
Ah. Commendable, Lieutenant. Mister La Forge, set course for Starbase Eighty four.
Aye, sir.
Really. I have no desire to leave the Enterprise.
Good.
Coordinates set in, Captain.
Speed, warp five.
Aye, sir, warp five.
And Mister Worf, the Bridge wouldn't be the same without you. Engage.
